Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0857.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
PART 1
LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of health
and human services for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027,
from the following funds:
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 15,742.2
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Average population 852.0
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 40,546,087,300
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 15,318,800
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 40,525,768,500
Federal revenues:
Capped federal revenues 524,885,300
Social security act, temporary assistance for
needy families 556,702,200
Total other federal revenues 27,210,631,000
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 186,827,000
Total private revenues 218,112,100
Michigan merit award trust fund 190,768,700
Total other state restricted revenues 4,303,601,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 7,339,241,200
Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORT
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 996.5
Unclassified salaries--FTEs 6.0 $ 1,474,500
Administrative hearings officers 9,123,400
Child welfare institute--FTEs 59.0 10,278,600
Coordinated children's healthcare policy and
supports--FTEs 74.0 22,820,800
Demonstration projects--FTEs 7.0 6,779,000
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Departmental administration and management--
FTEs 613.4 106,252,100
Legal services 100,000
Office of inspector general--FTEs 219.1 31,979,500
Property management 35,894,900
Terminal leave payments 6,639,100
Training and program support--FTEs 24.0 3,729,000
Worker's compensation 8,494,200
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 243,565,100
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential 1,635,100
IDG from department of technology, management,
and budget - office of retirement services 600
Federal revenues:
Social security act, temporary assistance for
needy families 17,645,300
Capped federal revenues 16,924,400
Total other federal revenues 72,719,700
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 86,000
Total private revenues 4,052,300
Total other state restricted revenues 16,062,600
State general fund/general purpose $ 114,439,100
Sec. 103. CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT
Full-time equated classified positions 187.0
Child support enforcement operations--FTEs 181.0 $ 30,774,000
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Child support incentive payments 24,409,600
Legal support contracts 129,023,300
State disbursement unit--FTEs 6.0 7,402,200
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 191,609,100
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Capped federal revenues 16,273,100
Total other federal revenues 153,463,700
State general fund/general purpose $ 21,872,300
Sec. 104. COMMUNITY SERVICES AND OUTREACH
Full-time equated classified positions 56.0
Bureau of community services and outreach--FTEs 24.0 $ 3,691,000
Community services and outreach administration-
-FTEs 17.0 6,907,000
Community services block grant 37,170,600
Diaper assistance grant 6,404,400
Homeless programs--FTEs 4.0 34,884,000
Housing and support services 13,031,000
Kids' food basket 525,000
Runaway and homeless youth grants 12,533,800
Senior university 400,000
Weatherization assistance 22,633,700
Weatherization assistance IIJA--FTEs 11.0 40,024,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 178,204,500
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Social security act, temporary assistance for
needy families 29,033,100
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Capped federal revenues 110,696,500
Total other federal revenues 14,050,700
HR-1 costs fund 315,400
State general fund/general purpose $ 24,108,800
Sec. 105. CHILDREN'S SERVICES AGENCY - CHILD
WELFARE
Full-time equated classified positions 3,813.7
Adoption subsidies $ 228,000,000
Adoption support services--FTEs 10.0 38,935,800
Attorney general contract 5,191,100
Child abuse and neglect - children's justice
act--FTE 1.0 631,500
Child care fund 339,928,700
Child care fund - indirect cost allotment 3,500,000
Child protection 2,050,300
Child welfare administration travel 390,000
Child welfare licensing--FTEs 53.0 7,826,600
Child welfare local office staff - noncaseload
compliance--FTEs 353.0 43,983,900
Child welfare medical/psychiatric evaluations 7,118,300
Children's protective services - caseload
staff--FTEs 1,461.0 179,594,900
Children's protective services supervisors--
FTEs 387.0 51,197,700
Children's services administration--FTEs 206.2 29,873,800
Children trust Michigan--FTEs 12.0 5,200,900
Contractual services, supplies, and materials 9,852,000
Court-appointed special advocates 2,250,000
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Education planners--FTEs 15.0 2,030,300
Family preservation and prevention services
administration--FTEs 9.0 1,466,800
Family preservation programs--FTEs 34.0 59,859,300
Foster care payments 365,706,300
Foster care services - caseload staff--FTEs 838.0 103,282,100
Foster care services supervisors--FTEs 227.0 32,955,600
Guardianship assistance program 12,800,000
Interstate compact 179,600
Peer coaches--FTEs 45.5 6,738,700
Permanency resource managers--FTEs 28.0 3,743,200
Prosecuting attorney contracts 8,142,800
Second line supervisors and technical staff--
FTEs 126.0 20,990,800
Settlement monitor 2,261,700
Strong families/safe children 10,075,400
Title IV-E compliance and accountability
office--FTEs 4.0 484,800
Youth in transition--FTEs 4.0 7,390,400
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,593,633,300
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential 244,400
Federal revenues:
Social security act, temporary assistance for
needy families 291,416,300
Capped federal revenues 104,646,500
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Total other federal revenues 272,617,800
Special revenue funds:
Local funds - county chargeback 48,503,000
Private - collections 1,500,000
HR-1 costs fund 1,999,200
Children's trust fund 2,895,300
Total other state restricted revenues 3,600,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 866,210,800
Sec. 106. CHILDREN'S SERVICES AGENCY - JUVENILE
JUSTICE
Full-time equated classified positions 189.5
Bay Pines Center--FTEs 53.0 $ 7,845,000
Committee on juvenile justice administration--
FTEs 2.5 376,600
Committee on juvenile justice grants 3,000,000
Community support services--FTEs 2.0 1,856,800
County juvenile officers 3,977,600
Juvenile justice, administration and
maintenance--FTEs 21.0 5,605,500
Michigan youth treatment center--FTEs 111.0 16,567,300
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 39,228,800
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Capped federal revenues 7,754,800
Total other federal revenues 268,200
Special revenue funds:
Local funds - state share education funds 1,527,500
Local funds - county chargeback 10,493,300
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


State general fund/general purpose $ 19,185,000
Sec. 107. PUBLIC ASSISTANCE
Full-time equated classified positions 1.0
Family independence program 82,485,000
Family independence program - clothing
allowance 10,000,000
Family independence program - child
supplemental payment 23,240,100
Food assistance program benefits 3,446,187,200
Indigent burial 2,384,700
Low-income home energy assistance program 174,951,600
Michigan energy assistance program--FTE 1.0 100,000,000
Prenatal and infant support program 20,000,000
Refugee assistance program 7,954,200
State disability assistance payments 4,543,800
State supplementation 58,085,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,929,831,600
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Social security act, temporary assistance for
needy families 107,019,200
Capped federal revenues 182,905,800
Total other federal revenues 3,441,477,200
Special revenue funds:
Child support collections 9,908,100
Low-income energy assistance fund 100,000,000
Public assistance recoupment revenue 4,811,300
Supplemental security income recoveries 1,797,500
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


State general fund/general purpose $ 81,912,500
Sec. 108. LOCAL OFFICE OPERATIONS AND SUPPORT
SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 5,959.2
Administrative support workers--FTEs 127.0 $ 15,415,500
Adult services local office staff--FTEs 550.0 71,524,000
Contractual services, supplies, and materials 33,567,000
Donated funds positions--FTEs 159.0 28,001,600
Elder Law of Michigan MiCAFE contract 450,000
Electronic benefit transfer (EBT) 7,198,000
Employment and training support services 3,869,100
Food assistance reinvestment--FTEs 16.0 3,841,100
Local office policy and administration--FTEs 122.0 22,319,600
Medical/psychiatric evaluations 166,200
Public assistance local office staff--FTEs 4,985.2 596,101,300
SSI advocacy legal services grant 975,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 783,428,400
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from department of corrections 120,200
IDG from department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential 8,303,900
Federal revenues:
Social security act, temporary assistance for
needy families 66,586,000
Capped federal revenues 54,067,800
Total other federal revenues 214,841,600
Special revenue funds:
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Local funds - donated funds 4,473,100
Private funds - donated funds 10,262,500
Private revenues 250,000
HR-1 costs fund 98,792,600
State general fund/general purpose $ 325,730,700
Sec. 109. DISABILITY DETERMINATION SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 628.4
Disability determination operations--FTEs 624.3 $ 126,213,900
Retirement disability determination--FTEs 4.1 662,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 126,875,900
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from department of technology, management,
and budget - office of retirement services 838,600
Federal revenues:
Total other federal revenues 123,235,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 2,802,000
Sec. 110. BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM
ADMINISTRATION AND SPECIAL PROJECTS
Full-time equated classified positions 98.6
Behavioral health program administration--FTEs 59.0 $ 50,171,200
Community substance use disorder prevention,
education, and treatment--FTEs 6.6 78,186,700
Family support subsidy 17,173,100
Federal and other special projects 2,535,600
Gambling addiction--FTEs 4.0 9,534,000
Mental health diversion council 3,850,000
Office of recipient rights--FTEs 25.0 3,629,500
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Opioid response activities--FTEs 4.0 122,165,100
Protection and advocacy services support 194,400
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 287,439,600
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Social security act, temporary assistance for
needy families 17,173,100
Total other federal revenues 160,072,500
Special revenue funds:
Total private revenues 2,704,700
Total other state restricted revenues 67,389,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 40,099,800
Sec. 111. BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 16.0
Autism services $ 560,716,600
Behavioral health community supports and
services--FTEs 12.0 45,628,700
Certified community behavioral health clinic
demonstration 916,062,700
Civil service charges 297,500
Community mental health non-Medicaid services 125,578,200
Federal mental health block grant--FTEs 4.0 27,491,100
Health homes 50,239,800
Healthy Michigan plan - behavioral health 518,153,900
Medicaid mental health services 3,663,869,500
Medicaid substance use disorder services 84,902,600
Multicultural integration funding 17,284,900
Nursing home PAS/ARR-OBRA 18,813,600
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


State disability assistance program substance
use disorder services 2,018,800
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,031,057,900
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Social security act, temporary assistance for
needy families 421,000
Capped federal revenues 184,500
Total other federal revenues 4,119,475,400
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 9,943,600
Total other state restricted revenues 142,088,900
State general fund/general purpose $ 1,758,944,500
Sec. 112. STATE PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALS AND
FORENSIC MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 2,320.6
Average population 852.0
Caro Regional Mental Health Center -
psychiatric hospital - adult--FTEs 432.7 $ 71,981,700
Average population 145.0
Center for forensic psychiatry--FTEs 624.5 129,037,800
Average population 240.0
Developmental disabilities council and
projects--FTEs 10.0 3,244,200
Gifts and bequests for patient living and
treatment environment 1,000,000
IDEA, federal special education 120,000
Kalamazoo Psychiatric Hospital - adult--FTEs 473.2 74,708,100
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Average population 170.0
Purchase of medical services for residents of
hospitals and centers 445,600
Revenue recapture 750,100
Southeast Michigan state psychiatric hospital--
FTEs 746.2 136,384,200
Average population 297.0
Special maintenance 924,600
State hospital administration--FTEs 34.0 5,879,400
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 424,475,700
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Total other federal revenues 38,993,800
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 24,110,800
Total private revenues 1,000,000
Total other state restricted revenues 19,189,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 341,181,900
Sec. 113. HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES POLICY AND
INITIATIVES
Full-time equated classified positions 77.3
Certificate of need program administration--
FTEs 11.3 $ 2,783,000
Child advocacy centers 1,407,000
Child advocacy centers - supplemental grants 2,000,000
Crime victim grants administration services--
FTEs 15.0 3,161,700
Crime victim justice assistance grants 78,579,300
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Crime victim rights services grants 19,869,900
Crime victim rights sustaining grants--FTEs 2.0 30,000,000
Domestic violence prevention and treatment--
FTEs 15.6 20,507,300
Human trafficking intervention services--FTE 1.0 200,000
Michigan essential health provider 3,519,600
Minority health grants and contracts--FTEs 3.0 1,169,300
Nurse education and research program--FTEs 3.0 828,300
Policy and planning administration--FTEs 19.9 2,836,900
Primary care services--FTEs 3.0 3,813,300
Rape prevention and services--FTEs 0.5 7,216,600
Rural health services 175,000
Rural health transformation program--FTEs 3.0 250,000,000
Uniform statewide sexual assault evidence kit
tracking system 369,500
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 428,436,700
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from department of licensing and regulatory
affairs 828,300
IDG from department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential 2,400
IDG from department of treasury, Michigan
finance authority 117,700
Federal revenues:
Social security act, temporary assistance for
needy families 6,575,900
Capped federal revenues 11,912,900
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Total other federal revenues 336,240,500
Special revenue funds:
Total private revenues 855,000
Child advocacy centers fund 1,407,000
Compulsive gaming prevention fund 1,040,500
Crime victims rights fund 18,798,200
Sexual assault victims' prevention and
treatment fund 3,000,000
Total other state restricted revenues 3,444,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 44,214,000
Sec. 114. EPIDEMIOLOGY, EMERGENCY MEDICAL
SERVICES, AND LABORATORY
Full-time equated classified positions 448.9
Bioterrorism preparedness--FTEs 53.0 $ 31,265,300
Childhood lead program--FTEs 4.5 2,358,300
Emergency medical services program--FTEs 27.0 7,276,700
Epidemiology administration--FTEs 73.5 27,115,500
Healthy homes program--FTEs 62.0 51,885,600
Laboratory services--FTEs 102.0 32,065,500
Newborn screening follow-up and treatment
services--FTEs 10.5 10,370,600
PFAS and environmental contamination response--
FTEs 46.0 18,583,900
Vital records and health statistics--FTEs 70.4 11,886,400
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 192,807,800
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


IDG from department of environment, Great
Lakes, and energy 2,525,000
Federal revenues:
Total other federal revenues 79,336,700
Special revenue funds:
Total private revenues 1,342,600
Total other state restricted revenues 34,295,700
State general fund/general purpose $ 75,307,800
Sec. 115. LOCAL HEALTH AND ADMINISTRATIVE
SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 197.6
AIDS prevention, testing, and care programs--
FTEs 79.0 $ 111,041,200
Cancer prevention and control program--FTEs 18.0 15,915,500
Chronic disease control and health promotion
administration--FTEs 28.4 10,570,700
Community health programs--FTEs 5.0 16,273,300
Diabetes and kidney program--FTEs 8.0 4,233,100
Essential local public health services 81,419,300
Local health services--FTEs 4.3 9,610,400
Medicaid outreach cost reimbursement to local
health departments 12,500,000
Public health administration--FTEs 8.0 2,196,900
Sexually transmitted disease control program--
FTEs 20.0 8,655,500
Smoking prevention program--FTEs 15.0 6,495,700
Violence prevention--FTEs 11.9 17,366,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 296,277,600
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Social security act, temporary assistance for
needy families 2,300
Total other federal revenues 91,667,800
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 10,150,000
Total private revenues 74,556,600
Total other state restricted revenues 15,292,600
State general fund/general purpose $ 104,608,300
Sec. 116. FAMILY HEALTH SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 135.9
Child and adolescent health care and centers $ 41,242,700
Dental programs--FTEs 3.6 7,028,700
Drinking water declaration of emergency 3,971,000
Family, maternal, and child health
administration--FTEs 50.0 10,683,200
Family planning local agreements 15,810,700
Immunization program--FTEs 20.8 19,229,300
Local MCH services 7,018,100
Pregnancy prevention program 1,297,900
Prenatal care outreach and service delivery
support--FTEs 19.5 45,944,400
Special projects 6,789,100
Sudden and unexpected infant death and
suffocation prevention program 321,300
Women, infants, and children program
administration and special projects--FTEs 42.0 19,880,200
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Women, infants, and children program local
agreements and food costs 251,285,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 430,501,600
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Social security act, temporary assistance for
needy families 500,000
Total other federal revenues 272,269,600
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 42,817,700
Total private revenues 64,785,700
Total other state restricted revenues 3,270,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 46,858,100
Sec. 117. CHILDREN'S SPECIAL HEALTH CARE
SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 51.8
Bequests for care and services--FTEs 9.8 $ 2,415,300
Children's special health care services
administration--FTEs 42.0 9,377,900
Medical care and treatment 443,164,400
Outreach and advocacy 6,722,200
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 461,679,800
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Total other federal revenues 252,754,900
Special revenue funds:
Total private revenues 1,037,200
Total other state restricted revenues 4,582,400
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


State general fund/general purpose $ 203,305,300
Sec. 118. AGING SERVICES
Community services $ 58,901,900
Employment assistance 3,500,000
Nutrition services 50,004,200
Respite care program 7,268,700
Senior volunteer service programs 4,765,300
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 124,440,100
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Total other federal revenues 67,787,400
Special revenue funds:
Total private revenues 300,000
Michigan merit award trust fund 4,068,700
Total other state restricted revenues 2,800,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 49,484,000
Sec. 119. HEALTH AND AGING SERVICES
ADMINISTRATION
Full-time equated classified positions 561.2
Aging services administration--FTEs 43.0 $ 9,819,200
Health services administration--FTEs 518.2 146,649,500
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 156,468,700
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Total other federal revenues 100,050,600
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 187,700
Total private revenues 1,721,300
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Total other state restricted revenues 3,994,400
State general fund/general purpose $ 50,514,700
Sec. 120. HEALTH SERVICES
Adult home help services $ 800,184,800
Ambulance services 25,335,200
Auxiliary medical services 5,126,300
Dental clinic program 1,000,000
Dental services 336,287,500
Federal Medicare pharmaceutical program 410,467,600
Federally qualified health centers 157,182,600
Health plan services 8,609,060,500
Healthy Michigan plan 6,195,577,200
Home health services 18,690,200
Hospice services 258,260,400
Hospital services and therapy 688,595,200
Integrated care organizations 676,213,300
Long-term care services 2,586,950,000
Maternal and child health 37,267,500
Medicaid home- and community-based services
waiver 603,442,900
Medicare premium payments 1,049,501,000
Personal care services 5,035,500
Pharmaceutical services 405,935,200
Physician services 138,041,600
Program of all-inclusive care for the elderly 326,992,100
School-based services 196,691,300
Special Medicaid reimbursement 370,654,700
Transportation 26,057,200
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 23,928,549,800
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Total other federal revenues 17,109,327,300
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 34,530,400
Total private revenues 28,551,500
Michigan merit award trust fund 186,700,000
Total other state restricted revenues 3,626,823,100
State general fund/general purpose $ 2,942,617,500
Sec. 121. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Bridges information system $ 121,783,300
Child support automation 45,186,700
Comprehensive child welfare information system 8,761,900
Information technology services and projects 173,071,200
Michigan Medicaid information system 104,265,300
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 453,068,400
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential 609,700
Federal revenues:
Social security act, temporary assistance for
needy families 12,295,000
Capped federal revenues 17,359,400
Total other federal revenues 282,148,900
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 3,900
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Total private revenues 5,187,500
Total other state restricted revenues 14,573,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 120,891,000
Sec. 122. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Full-time equated classified positions 3.0
Competitive community health infrastructure
grants $ 14,000,000
Emergency services local office allocations 7,553,900
Health and human services grants 12,000,000
Health services administration--FTEs 3.0 4,000,000
Housing and community development grants 3,000,000
Local office staff travel 8,327,400
Michigan agricultural surplus system 12,045,000
Michigan clinical consultation and care 5,789,000
Nursing facility staffing initiative 10,000,000
Opioid response activities 75,500,000
Permanent supportive housing 5,000,000
Property management 8,718,700
State hospital administration 3,600,000
State psychiatric DSH disallowance 54,722,900
Uterine fibroid study 250,000
Water affordability 10,000,000
Weatherization assistance 10,000,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 244,506,900
Appropriated from:
IDG from department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential 92,900
Federal revenues:
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Social security act, temporary assistance for
needy families 8,035,000
Capped federal revenues 2,159,600
Total other federal revenues 7,831,400
Special revenue funds:
Total private revenues 20,005,200
Certificate of need fees 2,822,000
Child care home and center licenses fund 2,499,700
Fees and collections 10,000,000
HR-1 costs fund 39,200
Laboratory services fees 500,000
Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund 75,500,000
Newborn screening fees 10,000,000
Total other state restricted revenues 68,800
State general fund/general purpose $ 104,953,100

PART 2
PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027
GENERAL SECTIONS
Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the
state constitution of 1963, for the current fiscal year, total
state spending under part 1 from state sources is
$11,833,610,900.00 and state spending under part 1 from state
sources to be paid to local units of government is
$2,397,961,800.00. The following itemized statement identifies
appropriations from which spending to local units of government
will occur:
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT
Child support incentive payments $ 9,754,900
Legal support contracts 1,400
COMMUNITY SERVICES AND OUTREACH
Community services and outreach administration 1,000
Homeless programs 10,000
Housing and support services 138,500
CHILDREN'S SERVICES AGENCY – CHILD WELFARE
Child care fund 208,675,600
Child care fund - indirect cost allotment 3,500,000
Child welfare licensing 26,500
Child welfare medical/psychiatric evaluations 15,100
Children trust Michigan 35,100
Contractual services, supplies, and materials 50,700
Family preservation programs 100
Foster care payments 2,117,400
Prosecuting attorney contracts 1,235,600
Strong families/safe children 35,000
Youth-in-transition 700
CHILDREN'S SERVICES AGENCY – JUVENILE JUSTICE
Bay Pines Center 40,700
Community support services 118,400
County juvenile officers 67,900
PUBLIC ASSISTANCE
Indigent burial 2,800
Michigan energy assistance program 439,300
State disability assistance payments 256,300
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


LOCAL OFFICE OPERATIONS AND SUPPORT SERVICES
Contractual services, supplies, and materials 82,800
Employment and training support services 5,400
DISABILITY DETERMINATION SERVICES
Disability determination operations 3,300
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION AND
SPECIAL PROJECTS
Behavioral health program administration 42,600
Community substance use disorder prevention,
education, and treatment 8,688,500
Gambling addiction 1,065,000
Mental health diversion council 113,900
Opioid response activities 927,800
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES
Autism services 189,487,300
Behavioral health community supports and
services 407,300
Certified community behavioral health clinic
demonstration 183,500,000
Community mental health non-Medicaid services 125,578,200
Health homes 3,163,900
Healthy Michigan plan - behavioral health 48,553,300
Medicaid mental health services 1,264,786,600
Medicaid substance use disorder services 29,231,400
Multicultural integration funding 519,000
Nursing home PAS/ARR-OBRA 3,834,900
State disability assistance program substance
use disorder services 1,539,000
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


STATE PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALS AND FORENSIC MENTAL
HEALTH SERVICES
Caro Regional Mental Health Center -
psychiatric hospital – adult 68,500
Center for forensic psychiatry 696,600
Kalamazoo Psychiatric Hospital - adult 84,200
Southeast Michigan state psychiatric hospital 21,600
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES POLICY AND
INITIATIVES
Crime victim rights services grants 4,454,800
Crime victims rights sustaining grants 7,343,700
Domestic violence prevention and treatment 72,200
Primary care services 10,300
EPIDEMIOLOGY, EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES, AND
LABORATORY
Emergency medical services program 6,700
Epidemiology administration 521,000
Healthy homes program 1,233,400
Laboratory services 94,600
PFAS and environmental contamination response 500
LOCAL HEALTH AND ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
AIDS prevention, testing, and care programs 2,663,100
Cancer prevention and control program 15,000
Essential local public health services 69,050,700
Local health services 1,356,800
Public health administration 200
Sexually transmitted disease control program 720,400
Smoking prevention program 242,900
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


FAMILY HEALTH SERVICES
Dental programs 2,000,000
Drinking water declaration of emergency 70,700
Family planning local agreements 4,165,000
Immunization program 1,000,000
Pregnancy prevention program 65,000
Prenatal care outreach and service delivery
support 7,464,100
CHILDREN'S SPECIAL HEALTH CARE SERVICES
Medical care and treatment 943,000
Outreach and advocacy 3,176,000
AGING SERVICES
Community services 32,428,100
Nutrition services 14,513,000
Respite care program 5,664,000
Senior volunteer service programs 1,217,000
HEALTH AND AGING SERVICES ADMINISTRATION
Aging services administration 123,800
Health services administration 303,000
HEALTH SERVICES
Adult home help services 86,000
Ambulance services 1,216,000
Dental services 717,400
Federally qualified health centers 800,100
Healthy Michigan plan 907,500
Hospital services and therapy 613,000
Long-term care services 124,067,800
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Medicaid home- and community-based services
waiver 15,862,900
Personal care services 24,000
Physician services 1,378,000
Transportation 401,000
ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Emergency services local office allocations 2,045,000
TOTAL OF PAYMENTS TO LOCAL UNITS OF GOVERNMENT $ 2,397,961,800
Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are
subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101
to 18.1594.
Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1:
(a) "AIDS" means acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
(b) "CCBHC" means certified community behavioral health
clinic.
(c) "CMHSP" means a community mental health services program
as that term is defined in section 100a of the mental health code,
1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1100a.
(d) "CMS" means the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services.
(e) "CPT" means current procedural terminology.
(f) "Current fiscal year" means the fiscal year ending
September 30, 2027.
(g) "Department" means the department of health and human
services.
(h) "Director" means the director of the department.
(i) "EPSDT" means early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and
treatment.
(j) "Federal poverty level" means the poverty guidelines
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


revised periodically and published in the Federal Register by the
Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services under the Secretary's authority to revise the poverty line
under 42 USC 9902.
(k) "FQHC" means federally qualified health center.
(l) "FTE" means full-time equated.
(m) "GME" means graduate medical education.
(n) "Health plan" means, at a minimum, an organization that
meets the criteria for delivering the comprehensive package of
services under the department's comprehensive health plan.
(o) "HEDIS" means health care effectiveness data and
information set.
(p) "HMO" means health maintenance organization.
(q) "IDEA" means the individuals with disabilities education
act, 20 USC 1400 to 1482.
(r) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant.
(s) "MCH" means maternal and child health.
(t) "Medicaid" means benefits under the medical assistance
program established under title XIX of the social security act, 42
USC 1396 to 1396w-8, and administered by the department under the
social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b.
(u) "Medicare" means benefits under the federal Medicare
program established under title XVIII of the social security act,
42 USC 1395 to 1395mmm.
(v) "MiCAFE" means Michigan's coordinated access to food for
the elderly.
(w) "MIChild" means the program described in section 1670 of
this part.
(x) "MiSACWIS" means Michigan statewide automated child
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


welfare information system.
(y) "PACE" means program of all-inclusive care for the
elderly.
(z) "PAS/ARR-OBRA" means the preadmission screening and annual
resident review required under the omnibus budget reconciliation
act of 1987, section 1919(e)(7) of the social security act, 42 USC
1396r.
(aa) "PATH" means Partnership. Accountability. Training. Hope.
(bb) "PFAS" means perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl
substances.
(cc) "PIHP" means an entity designated by the department as a
regional entity or a specialty prepaid inpatient health plan for
Medicaid mental health services, services to individuals with
developmental disabilities, and substance use disorder services.
Regional entities are described in section 204b of the mental
health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1204b. Specialty prepaid
inpatient health plans are described in section 109f of the social
welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.109f.
(dd) "Previous fiscal year" means the fiscal year ending
September 30, 2026.
(ee) "Quarterly basis" means February 1, April 1, July 1, and
September 30 of the current fiscal year.
(ff) "Semiannual basis" means March 1 and September 30 of the
current fiscal year.
(gg) "Settlement" means the settlement agreement entered in
the case of Dwayne B. v Snyder, Docket No. 2:06-cv-13548 in the
United States District Court for the Eastern District of Michigan.
(hh) "SSI" means supplemental security income.
(ii) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


of representatives appropriations subcommittees on the department
budget, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house
of representatives policy offices, and the state budget office.
(jj) "Temporary assistance for needy families" or "TANF" or
"title IV-A" means part A of title IV of the social security act,
42 USC 601 to 619.
(kk) "Title IV-B" means part B of title IV of the social
security act, 42 USC 621 to 629m.
(ll) "Title IV-D" means part D of title IV of the social
security act, 42 USC 651 to 669b.
(mm) "Title IV-E" means part E of title IV of the social
security act, 42 USC 670 to 679c.
(nn) "Title X" means subchapter VIII of the public health
service act, 42 USC 300 to 300a-8, which establishes grants to
states for family planning services.
Sec. 204. A department or agency shall use the internet to
fulfill the reporting requirements of this part, make each report
readily accessible to the public, and conspicuously post each
required report in a single archivable location on the department's
or agency's Michigan.gov website not later than the due date
required for each report. In addition to placing all reports
required in the current fiscal year on the department's or agency's
website, the department or agency shall maintain on its website all
reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by
fiscal year in the same single archivable location. The department
or agency shall also transmit all required reports for the current
fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other
required recipients by email.
Sec. 205. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the
following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1:
(a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign
goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of
comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are
available.
(b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are
competitively priced and of comparable quality.
(c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and
operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of
comparable quality.
Sec. 206. To the extent permissible under the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, the director of
each department or agency receiving appropriations in part 1 shall
take all reasonable steps to ensure geographically disadvantaged
business enterprises compete for and perform contracts to provide
services or supplies, or both. The director shall strongly
encourage firms with which the department or agency contracts to
subcontract with certified geographically disadvantaged business
enterprises for services, supplies, or both. As used in this
section, "geographically disadvantaged business enterprises" means
that term as defined in Executive Directive No. 2023-1.
Sec. 207. Consistent with section 217 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, each department and agency
receiving appropriations in part 1 shall prepare a report on out of
state travel expenses not later than January 1. The report must
list all travel by classified and unclassified employees outside
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


this state in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or
in part with funds appropriated in the department's or agency's
budget. The department or agency shall submit the report to the
standard report recipients and to the house and senate
appropriations committees. The report must include all of the
following information:
(a) The dates of each travel occurrence.
(b) The total transportation and related expenses of each
travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general
fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal
revenues, and other revenues.
Sec. 208. (1) In addition to any other requirements under this
part, if the department is authorized under this part to expend
funds in addition to those appropriated in part 1, the department
must do all of the following:
(a) Not later than November 1, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office that
details all of the following:
(i) The type of funding received during the previous fiscal
year that was authorized in part 2 of the article that made
appropriations for the department in the previous fiscal year.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) How much of the funding was spent and for what purpose or
purposes.
(b) Not later than 60 days after receipt of funds authorized
under this part, provide a report to the chairpersons of the house
and senate appropriations committees, the house and senate fiscal
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


agencies, and the state budget office that details all of the
following:
(i) The type of funding received.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) The anticipated or actual amount to be spent and the
specified purpose or purposes.
(c) Not later than February 15, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office with
an estimate of funding authorized by this part that the department
anticipates it will receive in the subsequent fiscal year,
identifying all of the following:
(i) The type or types of funding anticipated.
(ii) The amount or amounts of funding anticipated.
(iii) The purpose or purposes of the funding.
(2) If another reporting requirement under this part would
provide substantially similar information on a substantially
similar timeframe as would be reported under subsection (1),
subsection (1) does not apply.
Sec. 209. Not later than December 15, the state budget office
shall prepare and submit a report that provides for estimates of
the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the
close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the
projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation
lapses by major departmental program or program areas. The state
budget office shall submit the report to the standard report
recipients and the chairpersons of the senate and house
appropriations committees.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Sec. 210. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $100,000,000.00 for
federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Federal
contingency authorization must not be made available to increase
TANF authorization.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $50,000,000.00 for state
restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under
this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have
been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section
393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $30,000,000.00 for local
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $45,000,000.00 for private
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(5) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $100,000,000.00 for state
restricted Medicaid caseload reserve fund contingency
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not
available for expenditure until they have been transferred to
another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management
and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. It is the intent of the
legislature that this authorization must only be used to address
caseload costs in the traditional Medicaid program and the Healthy
Michigan plan.
Sec. 211. A department or agency shall cooperate with the
department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a
searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that
includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for each
department or agency:
(a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category.
(b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit.
(c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor,
including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and
payment description.
Sec. 212. Not later than 14 days after the release of the
executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate
with the state budget office to provide an annual report on
estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund
projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the
previous 2 fiscal years. The report must be submitted to the
standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate
and house of representatives appropriations committees.
Sec. 214. A department or agency that receives an
appropriation under this part or part 1 must provide an annual
report to the standard report recipients detailing federal policy
changes that do, or are expected to do, any of the following:
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


(a) Affect the operations of the department, including
reductions in federal revenue. For federal revenue reductions, the
annual report must detail the impact on the department or agency
and residents of this state, including, but not limited to, all of
the following information:
(i) The amount of additional state revenue required to replace
the lost federal revenue.
(ii) The services the department or agency will have to reduce
or eliminate due to the lost revenue.
(iii) The anticipated fiscal impact on residents of this state.
(b) Affect an industry, community, population, or other group
regulated or served by, or that otherwise engages with, the
department or agency.
(c) Create a regulatory gap that could negatively impact the
public.
(d) Increase the department's or agency's costs.
(e) Reduce or eliminate a program that provides services to
residents of this state.
Sec. 215. If either of the following events occurs, not later
than 30 days after the event occurs, the department shall notify
the standard report recipients of that fact:
(a) A legislative objective of this part or of a bill or
amendment to a bill to amend the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280,
MCL 400.1 to 400.119b, cannot be implemented because implementation
would conflict with or violate federal law.
(b) A federal grant for which a notice of an award has been
received cannot be used or will not be used.
Sec. 216. (1) In addition to funds appropriated in part 1 for
all programs and services, there is appropriated, for write-offs of
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


accounts receivable, deferrals, and for prior year obligations in
excess of applicable prior year appropriations, an amount equal to
total write-offs and prior year obligations, but not to exceed
amounts available in prior year revenues.
(2) The department's ability to satisfy appropriation fund
sources in part 1 is not limited to collections and accruals
pertaining to services provided in the current fiscal year and
includes reimbursements, refunds, adjustments, and settlements from
prior years.
Sec. 217. Not later than February 1 of the current fiscal
year, the department shall submit, to the standard report
recipients, a report on the detailed names and amounts of estimated
federal, restricted, private, and local sources of revenue that
support the appropriations in each of the line items in part 1 for
the previous fiscal year. The report must itemize, rather than
aggregate, specific revenue sources deposited into the generic
statewide integrated governmental management application (SIGMA)
fund numbers 1200, 1274, 4000, and 5000.
Sec. 218. As required under part 23 of the public health code,
1978 PA 368, MCL 333.2301 to 333.2321, the appropriations in part 1
must include the following:
(a) Immunizations.
(b) Communicable disease control.
(c) Sexually transmitted infection control.
(d) Tuberculosis control.
(e) Prevention of gonorrhea eye infection in newborns.
(f) Screening newborn infants for the conditions listed in
section 5431 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.5431,
or recommended by the newborn screening quality assurance advisory
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


committee created under section 5430 of the public health code,
1978 PA 368, MCL 333.5430.
(g) Health and human services annex of the Michigan Emergency
Management Plan.
(h) Prenatal care.
(i) Mental health.
Sec. 219. (1) The department may contract with the Michigan
Public Health Institute for the design and implementation of
projects and for other public health-related activities prescribed
in section 2611 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL
333.2611. The department may develop a master agreement with the
Michigan Public Health Institute to carry out the activities
described in this subsection for up to a 1-year period.
(2) On a semiannual basis, the department shall submit, to the
standard report recipients, a report that includes all of the
following:
(a) A detailed description of each funded project.
(b) The amount allocated for each project, the appropriation
line item from which the allocation is funded, and the source of
financing for each project.
(c) The expected project duration.
(d) A detailed spending plan for each project, including a
list of all subgrantees and the amount allocated to each
subgrantee.
(3) On a semiannual basis, the department shall provide, to
the standard report recipients, a copy of all reports, studies, and
publications produced by the Michigan Public Health Institute, its
subcontractors, or the department with the funds appropriated in
the department's budget in the previous fiscal year and allocated
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


to the Michigan Public Health Institute.
Sec. 220. The department shall ensure that faith-based
organizations are able to apply and compete for services, programs,
or contracts that the organizations are qualified and suitable to
fulfill. The department shall not disqualify faith-based
organizations solely on the basis of the religious nature of the
organizations or the guiding principles or statements of faith for
the organizations.
Sec. 221. In accordance with section 1b of the social welfare
act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1b, the department shall treat part 1 and
this part as a time-limited addendum to the social welfare act,
1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b.
Sec. 222. (1) Not later than 30 days before the implementation
date of a major policy change, the department shall report the
change to the standard report recipients.
(2) The department shall make the department's entire policy
and procedures manual available and accessible to the public on the
department's website.
(3) The department shall attach each policy bulletin issued
during the previous calendar year to the report under section 248.
Sec. 223. The department may establish and collect fees for
publications, videos and related materials, conferences, and
workshops. Collected fees are appropriated when received and must
be used to offset expenditures for publication printing and
mailing, costs of the publications, videos and related materials,
conferences, and workshops. The department shall not collect fees
under this section that exceed the cost of the expenditures. If
collected fees are appropriated under this section in an amount
that exceeds the current fiscal year appropriation, not later than
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


30 days after the collected fee appropriation, the department shall
notify the standard report recipients of that fact.
Sec. 224. The department may retain all of this state's share
of food assistance overissuance collections as an offset to general
fund/general purpose costs. Retained collections must be applied
against federal funds deductions in all appropriation units where
department costs related to the investigation and recoupment of
food assistance overissuances are incurred. Retained collections in
excess of the investigation and recoupment costs must be applied
against the federal funds deducted in the departmental
administration and support appropriation unit.
Sec. 226. If the revenue collected by the department from fees
and collections exceeds the amount appropriated in part 1, the
revenue may be carried forward with the approval of the state
budget director into the subsequent fiscal year. The revenue
carried forward under this section must be used as the first source
of funds in the subsequent fiscal year.
Sec. 227. If the department receives tobacco tax funds and
Healthy Michigan fund revenue from part 1, not later than April 1
of the current fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the
standard report recipients, a report on both of the following
activities during the previous fiscal year:
(a) Tobacco tax revenue appropriations in the Medicaid
program.
(b) Information for each project implemented with revenue
under this section, including all of the following:
(i) The project's name.
(ii) The appropriation line item and amount.
(iii) The project's target population.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


(iv) A description of the project.
(v) The outcomes or accomplishments of the project.
Sec. 228. If the department is authorized under federal law or
the law of this state to collect an overpayment owed to the
department, beginning 60 days after the initial notification date
of the overpayment amount, the department may assess a penalty of
1% per month. If an overpayment is caused by department error, a
penalty may be assessed 6 months after the initial notification
date of the overpayment amount. The department shall not collect
penalty interest in an amount that exceeds the amount of the
original overpayment. This state's share of any funds collected
under this section must be deposited in the general fund of this
state.
Sec. 229. The state budget director shall take steps to ensure
that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under
the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. Any state fiscal
recovery funds that would otherwise lapse after September 30, 2026,
are automatically reappropriated for the same purpose as originally
authorized and available for expenditure through December 31, 2026,
and any subsequent financial close out period.
Sec. 230. (1) Not later than March 1 and June 1 of the current
fiscal year, the department shall submit, to the standard report
recipients, a report on the status of the implementation of any
noninflationary, noncaseload, programmatic funding increases in the
current fiscal year from the previous fiscal year. The report must
confirm the implementation of already-implemented funding increases
and provide an explanation for any planned implementation of
funding increases that have not yet occurred. For any planned
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


implementation of funding increases that have not yet occurred, the
report must include an expected implementation date and the reason
for delayed implementation.
(2) For any programmatic funding increases not reported as
implemented or in process under subsection (1), the department
shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a status update
not later than June 1 of the current fiscal year.
Sec. 231. (1) The department shall not expend the funds
appropriated in part 1 to enter into any contract with a Medicaid
managed care organization of MI Choice Waiver, MI Coordinated
Health, or behavioral health unless the Medicaid managed care
organization agrees to do all of the following:
(a) Continue the direct care wage increase funded at $3.40 per
hour for the services noted in the department's Medicaid provider
letter L 21-76 under the Medicaid managed care organization's
relevant program.
(b) Ensure, to the greatest extent possible, that the full
amount of funds appropriated for direct care worker wages, except
for costs incurred by the employer, including payroll taxes, is
provided to direct care workers through maintained increased wages.
(c) Permit a direct care worker to elect, in writing or
electronically, to not receive the wage increase provided in this
section.
(2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients
that includes the following information by program and provider
type for the previous fiscal year:
(a) Hours of service that qualified for the direct care worker
wage increase.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


(b) The aggregate increase in wages attributable to the
funding appropriated in part 1.
(c) A comparison of the projected increase included in the
capitation rates and the reported amount expended on the wage
increase.
Sec. 232. The department shall provide the approved spending
plan for each line item receiving an appropriation in the current
fiscal year to the senate and house of representatives
appropriations subcommittees on the department budget and the
senate and house fiscal agencies not later than 60 days after
approval by the department or not later than January 15 of the
current fiscal year, whichever is earlier. In all places that a
line-item appropriation number is listed, a line-item appropriation
name must be included. The spending plan must include the following
information regarding planned expenditures for each category:
allocation in the previous period, change in the allocation, and
new allocation. The spending plan must include the following
information regarding each revenue source for the line item:
category of the fund source indicated by general fund/general
purpose, state restricted, local, private, or federal. Figures
included in the approved spending plan must not be assumed to
constitute the actual final expenditures, as line items may be
updated on an as-needed basis to reflect changes in projected
expenditures and projected revenue. The department shall supplement
the spending plan information by providing a list of all active
contracts and grants in the department's contract system. For
amounts listed in the other contracts category of each spending
plan, the department shall include the name of the line item and
the name of the fund source for each contract, grant, and amount
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


for the current fiscal year. For amounts listed in the all other
costs category of each spending plan, the department shall provide
a list detailing planned expenditures and amounts for the current
fiscal year and include the name of the line item and the name of
the fund source related to each expenditure and amount.
Sec. 233. If the state administrative board, acting under
section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount
appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent
resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and
serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the
particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution.
Sec. 234. The department shall receive and retain copies of
all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department
shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term
and long-term retention of records. The department may
electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required
by federal and state guidelines.
Sec. 235. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to
restrict or impede a marginalized community's access to government
resources, programs, or facilities.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, local governments
shall report any action or policy that attempts to restrict or
interfere with the duties of the local health officer.
Sec. 236. (1) The department shall maximize the utilization of
its in-person state workforce. The department shall prioritize
occupancy utilization of office space for each division within the
department. Employees with job responsibilities that require the
employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall
be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


the timesheet were actually worked.
(2) The department shall comply with requirements set by the
office of state employer on in-person work and utilization and
occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure in-person work is
optimized and occupancy rates are 80 percent or higher, subject to
market conditions.
(3) The department shall adhere to the rules and regulations
of civil service, which state that the standard biweekly work
period for a full-time employee in the classified services is the
equivalent of 80 hours of work. The department shall establish
policies and processes to ensure all employees are working their
jobs during agreed-upon business hours.
Sec. 238. Not later than 6 months after the state budget
office issues work project letters, a department and an agency
shall submit an annual report that summarizes all work project
accounts. The report must include all of the following:
(a) A list of all work project accounts.
(b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts
expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each
account.
(c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously
designated work project accounts, the name and description of the
work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed
amounts.
Sec. 239. For behavioral and physical health services provided
through managed care or the fee-for-service program, the department
shall require, for the nonfacility component of the reimbursement
rate, at least the same reimbursement for that service, if that
service is provided through telemedicine, as if the service
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


involved face-to-face contact between the health care professional
and the patient.
Sec. 240. To the extent possible, the department shall not
expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized
work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted.
Sec. 241. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year,
the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a
report on total actual expenditures in the previous fiscal year for
advertising and media outreach, including the purpose, amount, and
fund source by program or appropriation line item.
Sec. 242. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year,
the department shall submit a description of programs report to the
standard report recipients. For each program, the report must
include the appropriation unit; the line item name and number; the
appropriation history; the program name; the program overview; a
financing summary; and, where applicable, the program's legal
basis, effectiveness, and outcomes.
Sec. 243. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027 are estimated at $174,401,600.00. From this amount, total
department appropriations for pension-related legacy costs are
estimated at $174,401,600.00. Total department appropriations for
retiree health care legacy costs are estimated at $0.00.
Sec. 244. On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit,
to the standard report recipients, a report on any line-item
appropriation for which the department estimates total annual
expenditures would exceed the funds appropriated for the line-item
appropriation by 5% or more. The department shall provide a
detailed explanation for any relevant line-item appropriation
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


exceedance and identify the corrective actions undertaken to
mitigate line-item appropriation expenditures from exceeding the
funds appropriated for the line-item appropriation by a greater
amount. This section does not apply for line-item appropriations
that are part of the May revenue estimating conference caseload and
expenditure estimates.
Sec. 245. Not later than April 1, the department shall provide
to the standard report recipients a copy of its annual strategic
plan prepared in compliance with section 363 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1363. The plan must include the
mission, vision, goals, strategies, and performance measures of the
department.
Sec. 246. The department shall report on any court settlement
that may require further legislative review of state statutory
programs or regulations in this state.
Sec. 247. Not later than November 15, the department shall
disclose on a publicly accessible website private and other third-
party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year.
The report must include the amount of funding received, the
specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding
was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. The report
must be submitted to the standard report recipients and to the
chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 248. Not later than April 1, the department shall report
on each specific policy change made to implement a public act
affecting the department that took effect during the previous
calendar year. The report must include a reference to the public
act that necessitates the policy change. The department shall
submit the report to the standard report recipients, the senate and
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


house appropriations committees, and the joint committee on
administrative rules.
Sec. 249. (1) The state budget director shall take steps to
ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state
under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. The state budget
director may reallocate appropriated funds for the purpose of fully
utilizing state fiscal recovery funds that are in jeopardy of not
meeting the expenditure deadline for reasons that may include, but
are not limited to, completed projects coming in under budget or
funds that were not fully used by subrecipients. The state budget
director shall reallocate any of the funds reallocated under this
subsection to the programs or purposes specified in this section.
Any funds reallocated are unappropriated and immediately
reappropriated for the following purposes:
(a) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of corrections.
(b) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of state police.
(2) All applicable guidance, implementation, and reporting
provisions under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law
117-2 must be followed for state fiscal recovery funds reallocated
and reappropriated under subsection (1).
(3) The state budget director shall notify the senate and
house appropriations committees in writing not later than 1
business day after making any reallocations under subsection (1).
The notice required under this subsection must include all of the
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


following:
(a) The authorized program under which funds were originally
appropriated.
(b) The amount of the reallocation.
(c) The program or the purpose of the funds that were
reallocated.
(d) The department to which the funds were reallocated under
subsection (1).
(e) The amount reallocated to each program or purpose.
Sec. 250. (1) Within 30 days after the enactment of this act,
the house and senate shall provide to the state budget office a
jointly agreed upon list of legislatively directed spending items
as that term is defined in section 1364 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, funded in part 1 The list
must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded
items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and
364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and
18.1364a.
(2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 the department or agency
administering the grant shall post a report in a publicly
accessible location on its website beginning March 15 of the
current fiscal year. The department or agency shall update the
report and shall post an updated report not later than June 15 of
the current fiscal year and again not later than September 15 of
the current fiscal year. The department shall include in the report
the most comprehensive information the department has available at
the time of posting for grants awarded.
Sec. 253. (1) The department shall ensure that each federally
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


recognized tribe is able to apply and compete for services,
programs, grants, and contracts.
(2) For competitive grant programs described in this part,
each federally recognized tribe is eligible to apply for grant
funds made available to organizations exempt from federal income
tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986,
26 USC 501, and to local units of government.
Sec. 263. (1) Except as provided in this subsection, before
submission of a waiver, state plan amendment, or similar proposal
to CMS or another federal agency, the department shall notify the
standard report recipients of the planned submission. This
subsection does not apply to the submission of a waiver, state plan
amendment, or similar proposal that does not propose a material
change or is outside of the ordinary course of a waiver, state plan
amendment, or similar proposal.
(2) On a semiannual basis, the department shall submit, to the
standard report recipients, a report that summarizes the status of
any new or ongoing discussions with CMS, the United States
Department of Health and Human Services, or another federal agency
regarding any potential or future waiver applications and the
status of any submitted waivers that have not yet received federal
approval. If there is not a reportable item at the time that a
semiannual report is due, a report is not required.
Sec. 264. The department shall not take disciplinary action
against an employee of the department for communicating with a
member of the senate or house of representatives or a member's
staff, unless the communication is prohibited by law and the
department is exercising its authority as provided by law.
Sec. 270. The department shall advise the legislature of the
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


receipt of a notification from the attorney general's office of a
legal action in which expenses had been recovered under section 10b
of the medicaid false claims act, 1977 PA 72, MCL 400.610b. If
applicable, not later than February 1 of the current fiscal year,
the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a
report that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:
(a) The total amount recovered from the legal action.
(b) The program or service for which the money was originally
expended.
(c) Details on the disposition of the funds recovered, such as
the appropriation or revenue account in which the money was
deposited.
(d) A description of the facts involved in the legal action.
Sec. 274. On the day that is 1 week after the day that the
governor submits the executive budget proposal for the ensuing
fiscal year to the legislature, the department, in collaboration
with the state budget office, shall submit, to the standard report
recipients, a report on spending and revenue projections for each
of the capped federal funds listed in this subsection. The report
must contain actual spending and revenue in the previous fiscal
year, spending and revenue projections for the current fiscal year
as enacted, and spending and revenue projections in the executive
budget proposal for the immediately ensuing fiscal year for each
individual line item for the department budget. The report must
also include federal funds transferred to other departments. The
capped federal funds include, but are not limited to, all of the
following:
(a) TANF.
(b) Title XX social services block grant.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


(c) Title IV-B subpart I child welfare services block grant.
(d) Title IV-B subpart II promoting safe and stable families
funds.
(e) Low-income home energy assistance program.
Sec. 275. (1) On a quarterly basis, the department, with the
approval of the state budget director, is authorized to realign
sources between other federal, TANF, and capped federal financing
authorizations to maximize federal revenues. The realignment of
financing must not produce any of the following:
(a) A gross increase or decrease in the department's total
individual line item authorizations.
(b) A net increase or decrease in total federal revenues.
(c) A net increase in TANF authorization.
(2) On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit, to the
standard report recipients, a report on the realignment of federal
fund sources transacted to date in the current fiscal year under
subsection (1), including the dates, line items, and amounts of the
transactions. If, at the time a quarterly report is due, a
transaction was not made under subsection (1), a report is not
required.
(3) Not later than 30 days after the date on which year-end
book closing is completed, the department shall submit, to the
standard report recipients, a report on the realignment of federal
fund sources that took place as part of the year-end closing
process for the previous fiscal year.
Sec. 290. Any public advertisement for public assistance must
inform the public of the welfare fraud hotline operated by the
department.
Sec. 291. (1) The department shall not release funds to
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


agencies providing physical and behavioral health services that are
used to increase the hourly wage rate for direct care workers until
the contractors, subcontractors, or providers receiving funding to
support the direct care wage increases have provided documentation
that demonstrates the distribution of payments to eligible staff of
the wage increases provided under sections 231, 1644, and 1645 of
article 6 of 2025 PA 22, as required in the contract between each
individual PIHP and the department.
(2) The department shall require each contractor,
subcontractor, or provider described in subsection (1) that receive
funds to provide a wage increase for direct care workers to comply
with performance-related metrics to maintain their eligibility for
funding. The performance-related metrics must include, but are not
limited to, all of the following:
(a) Efforts to improve data collection to quantify the number
of direct care workers, including by type, employer, compensation
and benefits, job classification, region of the state, and other
relevant information.
(b) Accounting of the total hours worked under which a wage
increase was applied under sections 231, 1644, and 1645 of article
6 of 2025 PA 22 by county in which the worker was employed.
(3) The department shall require each contractor,
subcontractor, or provider described in subsection (1) to ensure
that the funds appropriated in this section are only used to
provide the direct care worker wage increase, except for costs
incurred by the employer, including payroll taxes.
(4) The department shall require an annual report from the
contractors, subcontractors, and providers described in subsection
(2). Not later than February 1 of the current fiscal year, the
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


department must submit the annual reports to the standard report
recipients. The report required under this subsection must be
submitted to the department not later than 60 days after the end of
the contract period and must include the following information:
(a) The amount of funding used to maintain the direct care
worker wage increase.
(b) A comparison of the amount of funding appropriated and the
amount of funding expended for the direct care worker wage
increase.
(c) An explanation for any difference in amount appropriated
and amount expended for the direct care worker wage increase.
(d) Confirmation that any unexpended or unencumbered funds
appropriated for the direct care worker wage increase were returned
to the department.
Sec. 295. Not later than April 1 of the current fiscal year,
the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a
report on funds appropriated for the healthy moms, healthy babies
initiative. The report must include the budgeted amount, year-to-
date expenditures, remaining balance of appropriations, and the
percent of budget spent for each appropriation related to the
initiative. The report must also include information on how the
funds have assisted with meeting the goals and outcomes of the
initiative.
Sec. 297. On a quarterly basis, the department or agency
receiving appropriations in part 1 shall report on the number of
full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service
classification, including a comparison by line item of the number
of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated
in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. The
report must be submitted to the senate and house appropriations
committees and to the standard report recipients.

DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT
Sec. 301. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child
welfare institute, the department shall train private child placing
agency staff in the pre-service training requirements for child
welfare caseworkers and supervisors. The department shall allocate
$1,000,000.00 to provide private child placing agency staff an
opportunity to complete the training in a virtual format at the
staff's private child placing agency facility. If a private child
placing agency prefers a hybrid training format that includes
virtual and in-person instruction, the department may utilize the
$1,000,000.00 allocated under this section to make that training
format available to the private child placing agency staff.
Sec. 302. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for property
management, $44,613,600.00 is appropriated for facilities or
materials, equipment, other contracts, and all other costs. From
the funds appropriated in this section, the department shall employ
market analyses, office space utilization data, contract
negotiations or renegotiations, and any other appropriate
mechanisms to assess and determine the minimum required square
footage of leased or owned office space essential for departmental
operations. The number and geographic placement of local county
offices active as of September 30, 2026, must be preserved,
regardless of any alterations in physical addresses or
modifications to leased or owned office space resulting from
contract negotiations or property management efficiency efforts by
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


the department.

CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT
Sec. 401. (1) The appropriations in part 1 assume a total
federal child support incentive payment of $26,500,000.00.
(2) From the federal money received for child support
incentive payments, $12,000,000.00 must be retained by this state
and expended for child support program expenses.
(3) From the federal money received for child support
incentive payments, $14,500,000.00 must be paid to counties based
on each county's performance level for each of the performance
measures under 45 CFR 305.2.
(4) If the child support incentive payment to this state from
the federal government is greater than $26,500,000.00, then 100% of
the amount in excess must be retained by this state and is
appropriated until the total retained by this state reaches
$15,397,400.00.
(5) If the child support incentive payment to this state from
the federal government is greater than the amount needed to satisfy
subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4), the additional funds are
subject to appropriation by the legislature.
(6) If the child support incentive payment to this state from
the federal government is less than $26,500,000.00, then the state
share and the county share must each be reduced by 50% of the
shortfall.
Sec. 409. (1) If statewide retained child support collections
exceed $38,300,000.00, 75% of the amount in excess of
$38,300,000.00 is appropriated to legal support contracts. The
excess appropriation may be distributed to eligible counties to
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


supplement, but not supplant, county title IV-D funding.
(2) Each county whose retained child support collections in
the current fiscal year exceed its fiscal year 2004-2005 retained
child support collections, excluding tax offset and financial
institution data match collections in both the current fiscal year
and fiscal year 2004-2005, shall receive its proportional share of
the 75% excess appropriation.
Sec. 410. (1) If title IV-D-related child support collections
are escheated, the state budget director is authorized to adjust
the sources of financing for the funds appropriated in part 1 for
legal support contracts to reduce federal authorization by 66% of
the escheated amount and increase general fund/general purpose
authorization by the same amount. The adjustment is required to
offset the loss of federal revenue due to the escheated amount
being counted as title IV-D program income in accordance with 45
CFR 304.50.
(2) Not later than 30 days after an adjustment under
subsection (1), the department shall notify the standard report
recipients of the adjustment.

COMMUNITY SERVICES AND OUTREACH
Sec. 453. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
homeless programs, the department shall allocate funds to the
emergency shelter program to support efforts of shelter providers
to move homeless individuals and households into permanent housing
as quickly as possible. The funds must be equal to or exceed the
amount that a provider would receive if the provider is paid a
$19.00 per diem rate. Expected outcomes are increased shelter
discharges to stable housing destinations, decreased recidivism
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


rates for shelter clients, and a reduction in the average length of
stay in emergency shelters.
(2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a
report on the total amount expended for the emergency shelter
program in the prior 2 fiscal years, the total number of shelter
nights provided, and the average length of stay in an emergency
shelter.
Sec. 454. The department shall allocate the full amount of
funds appropriated in part 1 for homeless programs to provide
services for homeless individuals and families, including, but not
limited to, third-party contracts for emergency shelter services.
Sec. 455. As a condition of receipt of federal TANF revenue,
after admitting a family to a homeless shelter, the homeless
shelter and human services agencies shall collaborate with the
department to obtain necessary TANF eligibility information on the
family as soon as possible. From the funds appropriated in part 1
for homeless programs, the department is authorized to make
allocations of TANF revenue only to the homeless shelters and human
services agencies that report necessary data to the department to
meet TANF eligibility reporting requirements. Homeless shelters or
human services agencies that do not report necessary data to the
department to meet TANF eligibility reporting requirements shall
not receive reimbursements that exceed the per diem amount the
homeless shelters or human service agencies received in fiscal year
2000. The use of TANF revenue under this section is not an ongoing
commitment of funding.
Sec. 456. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for homeless
programs, the department shall allocate $10,000.00 to reimburse
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


public service agencies that provide documentation of paying birth
certificate fees on behalf of category 1 homeless clients at county
clerk's offices. Each public service agency must be reimbursed for
the cost of the birth certificate fees quarterly until the
allocation is fully spent.
Sec. 457. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for homeless
programs, the department shall allocate $8,500,000.00 of TANF
revenue to support family shelters or families who are homeless and
at risk of being homeless. Funds appropriated under this section
must be used as follows:
(a) $3,000,000.00 for emergency hotels for families
experiencing homelessness.
(b) $3,500,000.00 for assistance and supports to families
engaged with child welfare. This may include, but is not limited
to, eviction diversion, first month's rent and deposit, and utility
arrears.
(c) $2,000,000.00 for creating additional spaces at family
homeless shelters that have been in operation for at least 24
months.
Sec. 458. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for homeless
programs, the department shall require any entities receiving
direct or indirect state funds to report data to a Homeless
Management Information System that satisfies the baseline data
collection requirements.
Sec. 459. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for homeless
programs, the department shall allocate $2,000,000.00 of TANF
revenue to acquire and develop for individuals and families
noncongregate shelter that utilizes options under a Housing First
model and prioritizes providing stable and permanent housing
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


without preconditions or requirements, such as sobriety or
participation in treatment programs. Eligible uses for this funding
may include, but are not limited to, hotels, motels, dormitories,
recuperative care facilities, and other facilities that offer
noncongregate shelter.
Sec. 460. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for kids' food
basket, the department shall allocate $525,000.00 to fund a project
with a nonprofit, community-based organization organized under the
laws of this state that is exempt from federal income tax under
section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501,
and is located in a city with a population between 185,000 and
200,000 and in a county with a population between 600,000 and
700,000, according to the most recent federal decennial census. The
nonprofit organization recipient must have an existing network of
food delivery to low-income children in not less than 3 counties in
this state. The nonprofit organization shall use the funds to
expand its services to additional schools and communities. The
funding may be used to cover employee costs, food and supplies,
equipment, and other operational costs identified by the
organization to support its mission and goals.
Sec. 462. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for senior
university, the department shall allocate $400,000.00 to a
community action alliance located in a city with a population over
500,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census to
improve connectivity and computer skills to seniors.
Sec. 463. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for runaway
and homeless youth grants and domestic violence prevention and
treatment, the department is authorized to make allocations of TANF
revenue only to agencies that report necessary data to the
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


department to meet TANF eligibility reporting requirements.
Sec. 464. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for diaper
assistance grant, the department shall allocate grants to diaper
assistance programs, maternity homes, local county offices, and
other nonprofit agencies that distribute diapers free of charge and
were established as of January 1, 2020. The funds must be used only
to purchase diapering supplies and to cover related administrative
costs. Not more than 10% of the funds appropriated in part 1 are
expendable for administrative purposes.
(2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a
report on the distribution of diapering supplies that includes, but
is not limited to, the names and locations of the entities
described in subsection (1) that distribute diaper supplies and the
total amount of diapering supplies distributed to each entity.
(3) Funds appropriated for diaper assistance grant are
considered work project funds, do not lapse at the end of the
fiscal year, and are available for expenditures for projects under
this section until the projects have been completed. The following
is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget
act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the work project is to provide funding for
grants for eligible entities to distribute diapers free of charge.
(b) The work project will be accomplished through partnerships
with diaper assistance programs, maternity homes, and other
nonprofit agencies.
(c) The total estimated cost of the work project is
$6,404,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date for the work project is
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


September 30, 2030.
Sec. 465. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
community services and outreach administration, $2,950,000.00 must
be distributed as provided in subsection (2). Michigan 2-1-1 must
continue to seek funding from local United Way organizations and
other nonprofit organizations and foundations.
(2) Funds distributed under subsection (1) must be distributed
to Michigan 2-1-1, a nonprofit corporation organized under the laws
of this state that is exempt from federal income tax under section
501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501, and
whose mission is to coordinate and support a statewide 2-1-1
system. Michigan 2-1-1 shall use the funds only to fulfill the
Michigan 2-1-1 business plan adopted by Michigan 2-1-1 in January
2005.
(3) Michigan 2-1-1 shall refer any received calls that report
fraud, waste, or abuse of state-administered public assistance to
the department.
(4) Michigan 2-1-1 shall submit, to the department, the senate
and house of representatives standing committees with primary
jurisdiction over matters relating to human services and
telecommunications on 2-1-1 system performance, and the standard
report recipients, a report that includes, but is not limited to,
call volume by health and human service needs and unmet needs
identified through caller data and number and the percentage of
callers referred to public or private provider types.
Sec. 466. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year,
the department shall submit to the standard report recipients a
report on the runaway homeless youth program that includes, but is
not limited to, all of the following:
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


(a) A list of counties served and the amount of funding
allocated to each county.
(b) The amount of funding being allocated to previously
underserved communities and how capacity has been expanded or is
planned to be expanded in those communities.
(c) Identified barriers that have hindered providers from
expanding capacity.

CHILDREN'S SERVICES AGENCY - CHILD WELFARE
Sec. 501. (1) A goal is established that not more than 25% of
all children in foster care at any given time during the current
fiscal year, unless contrary to the best interest of the child,
will have been in foster care for 24 months or more.
(2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a
report describing the steps that will be taken to achieve the goal
under subsection (1). The report must also include the following:
(a) An explanation of the most significant barriers that
prevent long-term foster children from permanent placements.
(b) The number of children currently in foster care for longer
than 24 months and the percentage of those children who meet any of
the following requirements:
(i) Had paid Medicaid behavioral health claims or encounters
within the last year.
(ii) Were living in a relative placement, a child caring
institution, or a licensed foster home.
(iii) Were within the ages of 0-5, 6-11, or 12-17 years of age.
(c) The total number of children in foster care as of October
1 of the current fiscal year.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Sec. 502. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for foster
care, the department shall reimburse Indian tribal governments for
50% of the foster care expenditures for children who are under the
jurisdiction of Indian tribal courts and are not otherwise eligible
for federal foster care cost sharing. However, the department may
reimburse up to 100% of the foster care expenditures for an Indian
tribal government that enters into a state-tribal Title IV-E
agreement allowed under this state's Title IV-E state plan.
Sec. 505. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year,
the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a
report on youth referred or committed to the department for care or
supervision in the previous fiscal year that outlines the number of
youth served by the department in the juvenile justice system by
the type of setting for each youth.
Sec. 506. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for attorney
general contract, not later than March 1 of the current fiscal
year, the department shall submit, to the standard report
recipients, a report on the juvenile justice system in any county
in which funds appropriated in part 1 are expended. The report must
include, but not be limited to, all of the following:
(a) The number of youth referred or committed to the
department for care or supervision in the previous fiscal year and
in the first quarter of the current fiscal year.
(b) The number of youth referred or committed to the care or
supervision of the county in which funds appropriated in part 1
were expended for the previous fiscal year and the first quarter of
the current fiscal year.
(c) The type of setting for each youth referred or committed
for care or supervision, any applicable performance outcomes, and
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


identified financial costs or savings.
(d) The required and actual staff-to-youth ratios.
Sec. 507. The department's ability to satisfy appropriation
deductions in part 1 for foster care private collections is not
limited to collections and accruals pertaining to services provided
only in the current fiscal year and may include revenues collected
during the current fiscal year for services provided in prior
fiscal years.
Sec. 508. (1) In addition to the amount appropriated in part 1
for children trust Michigan, money granted or money received as
gifts or donations to the children's trust fund created in 1982 PA
249, MCL 21.171 to 21.172, is appropriated for expenditure.
(2) For the funds described in subsection (1), the department
shall ensure that administrative delays are avoided and local grant
recipients and direct service providers receive money in an
expeditious manner. The department and the state board as that term
is defined in section 2 of the child abuse and neglect prevention
act, 1982 PA 250, MCL 722.601, shall make the children's trust fund
contract funds available to grantees not later than 31 days after
the start date of the funded project.
Sec. 509. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
adoption support services, the department shall maintain a rate
structure that pays for cases based on the average length of time
it takes to reach adoption finalization by case characteristics for
licensed child placing agencies contracted with the department that
provide adoption services for youth in foster care.
(2) For cases accepted before the implementation of the new
rate structure described in subsection (1), the department shall
maintain the increase of contracted rates paid to private child
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


placing agencies, including the $23.00 per diem for all foster
youth from the date of the case acceptance to the date of adoption
petition acceptance or 150 days, whichever occurs sooner, for
licensed child placing agencies contracted with the department to
provide adoption services for foster youth. The per diem rate must
be separate from the outcome-based reimbursement system and must
not be deducted from the total reimbursement an agency receives for
the applicable placement or finalization rate of an adoption.
Sec. 510. The department shall submit reports on a monthly
basis to the standard report recipients on all of the following:
(a) The number of children awaiting placement in a residential
setting by child caring institution.
(b) The reasons for the denial of placements that were
referred within the month, including, but not limited to, facility
bed shortages, placement process delays, facility hold, or other
reasons.
(c) The number of incentive payments that were awarded by the
department by child caring institution.
(d) The number of incentive payments that were denied by the
department by child caring institution.
(e) Of the denials identified in subdivision (d), the
department shall provide the rationale for denial of incentive
payments including, but not limited to, refusal of placement, lack
of staffing, or other reasons.
Sec. 511. The department shall submit, to the standard report
recipients and the senate and house of representatives standing
committees that cover subject matters dealing with families and
human services, reports on a semiannual basis that include the
number and percentage of children who received timely physical and
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


mental health examinations after entry into foster care. The goal
of the program is for not less than 85% of children to have an
initial medical and mental health examination that is not later
than 30 days after entry into foster care.
Sec. 512. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for foster
care payments, the department shall allocate $500,000.00 of TANF
revenue to provide luggage to a child who is being removed from the
child's home or changing placement and is a TANF eligible
individual. The luggage provided under this section is considered
to belong to the child and may not be confiscated by the department
or the child's foster parent. The department is not required to
provide new luggage under this section to a child who is changing
placement and has had luggage previously provided by the
department.
(2) The department may partner with local charities to
establish and maintain the supply of luggage to be used to
transport a child's personal belongings. Additionally, the
department may accept donations of luggage to fulfill the
requirements of this section.
(3) As used in this section, "luggage" means any of the
following:
(a) A suitcase of any size.
(b) A duffel bag that holds at least 30 liters.
Sec. 513. (1) The department shall not expend funds
appropriated in part 1 to pay for the department's direct placement
of a child in an out-of-state facility unless all of the following
conditions are met:
(a) An appropriate placement is not available in this state,
as determined by the department's interstate compact office.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


(b) An out-of-state placement exists that is nearer to the
child's home than the closest appropriate in-state placement, as
determined by the department's interstate compact office.
(c) The out-of-state facility meets all of the licensing
standards for a comparable facility in this state.
(d) The out-of-state facility meets all of the applicable
licensing standards of the state in which it is located.
(e) The department has visited the site of the out-of-state
facility; has reviewed the facility records, licensing records, and
reports; and believes that the facility is an appropriate placement
for the child.
(2) The department shall not expend money for a child placed
in an out-of-state facility without approval of the executive
director of the children's services agency.
(3) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit, to the state court administrative office
and the standard report recipients, a report on the number of
Michigan children residing in out-of-state facilities in the
previous fiscal year, the total cost and average per diem cost of
the out-of-state placements to this state, a list of each out-of-
state placement arranged by the Michigan county of residence for
each child, and a list of out-of-state facilities that were visited
by the department before the child's placement.
Sec. 514. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for foster
care payments, the department shall maintain a statewide respite
care services network available to licensed foster parents and
unlicensed relative caregivers that care for children in foster
care.
(2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a
report on the total number of licensed foster parents and
unlicensed relative caregivers that were provided respite services,
the average amount of respite time per month, and the total amount
of funding spent on respite services during the previous fiscal
year.
Sec. 515. If a children's protective services caseworker
requests approval for another children's protective services
caseworker or other department employee to accompany the caseworker
on a home visit because the caseworker believes that it would be
unsafe to conduct the home visit alone, the department shall not
deny the request.
Sec. 516. (1) From funds appropriated in part 1 for child care
fund, the administrative or indirect cost payment equal to 10% of a
county's total monthly gross expenditures must be distributed to
the county on a monthly basis, and a county is not required to
submit documentation to the department for any of the expenditures
that are covered under the 10% payment as described in section
117a(4)(b)(ii) and (iv) of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL
400.117a.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child care fund
– indirect cost allotment, the department shall allocate
$3,500,000.00 to counties and tribal governments that receive
reimbursements in part 1 from child care fund.
(3) The amount described in subsection (2) must be distributed
to each county or tribal government in the same proportion as
indirect cost allotments are provided to counties in the same
manner described in section 117a of the social welfare act, 1939 PA
280, MCL 400.117a.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Sec. 517. For a child placed in a family foster care home
located out of this state, the department may ask a state or
private child placing agency contracted by the receiving state to
carry out required visits and any additional visits that the
department finds necessary.
Sec. 518. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year,
the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a
report on the cumulative child care fund expenditures of in-home
juvenile justice care that are eligible for the 75% state and 25%
local split required under section 117a(4)(i) of the social welfare
act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.117a. Eligible expenditures include
community-based juvenile supervision, services, and related
practices, and per diem rates for the use of respite and shelter
for less than 30 days. The report must also include the
expenditures by county, the type of service provided, and the
number of youth receiving care.
Sec. 520. Not later than February 15 of the current fiscal
year, the department shall submit, to the standard report
recipients, a report on the number of days of care and expenditures
by funding source for the previous fiscal year for out-of-home
placements by specific placement programs for child abuse or child
neglect and juvenile justice, including, but not limited to, paid
relative placement, department direct family foster care, private-
agency-supervised foster care, private child caring institutions,
county-supervised facilities, and independent living. The report
must also include the number of days of care for department-
operated residential juvenile justice facilities.
Sec. 522. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for youth
in transition, the department shall allocate $750,000.00 for
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


scholarships through the fostering futures scholarship program in
the Michigan education trust to youth who were in foster care
because of child abuse or child neglect and are attending a college
or a career technical educational institution located in this
state. One hundred percent of the funds appropriated must be used
to fund scholarships for the youth described in this section.
(2) Not later than June 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a
report that includes the number of youth who applied for
scholarships under this section, the number of youth who received
scholarships under this section and the amount of each scholarship,
and the total amount of funds spent or encumbered in the current
fiscal year.
Sec. 523. Not later than February 15 of the current fiscal
year, the department shall submit, to the standard report
recipients, a report on the MI Family Together program. The report
must include both of the following:
(a) Utilization and outcome data based on families served.
(b) For each program, information on any innovations or
expansions that may increase child safety and reduce risk.
Sec. 524. As a condition of receiving funds appropriated in
part 1 for strong families/safe children, not later than October 1
of the current fiscal year, counties shall submit the service
spending plan to the department for approval. Not later than 30
calendar days after receipt of a properly completed service
spending plan, the department shall approve the service spending
plan.
Sec. 525. The department shall maintain the same on-site
evaluation processes for privately operated child welfare and
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


juvenile justice residential facilities as is used to evaluate
state-operated facilities. Penalties for noncompliance must be the
same for privately operated child welfare and juvenile justice
residential facilities and state-operated facilities.
Sec. 526. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for court-
appointed special advocates, the department shall allocate
$2,250,000.00 to fund a project with a nonprofit, community-based
organization organized under the laws of this state that is exempt
from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal
revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501, located in a charter township
with a population between 18,000 and 19,000 that is located in a
county with a population between 600,000 and 700,000, according to
the most recent federal decennial census. The nonprofit
organization recipient must have an existing network of affiliate
programs operating in not less than 25 counties in this state. The
recipient nonprofit organization shall use the funds to recruit,
screen, train, and supervise volunteers who provide advocacy
services on behalf of abused and neglected children.
Sec. 528. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child care
fund, the department shall allocate $3,730,300.00 to support the
annual basic grant to counties with a population of less than
75,000, according to the most recent federal decennial census, and
as described in section 117e of the social welfare act, 1939 PA
280, MCL 400.117e, and to eligible tribal entities. The basic grant
must be $56,520.00 to eligible counties and tribal entities.
Sec. 529. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for family
preservation programs, the department shall maintain the total
combined funding levels of the MI Family Together program at an
amount not less than the amount provided as of September 30, 2025.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


Sec. 530. (1) All master contracts relating to foster care and
adoption services as funded by the appropriations in section 105 of
part 1 must be performance-based contracts that employ a client-
centered and results-oriented process that is based on measurable
performance indicators and desired outcomes and includes an annual
assessment of the quality of services provided.
(2) Not later than February 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a
report detailing measurable performance indicators, desired
outcomes, and an assessment of the quality of services provided by
the department during the previous fiscal year.
Sec. 532. Beginning on October 1 of the current fiscal year,
the department shall hold semiannual meetings with state and
private residential providers to receive feedback and discuss
potential improvements to the residential system.
Sec. 534. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year,
the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a
report on the adoption subsidies expenditures from the previous
fiscal year. The report must include, but is not limited to, the
range of non-$0.00 annual adoption support subsidy amounts, for
both Title IV-E eligible cases and state-funded cases, paid to
adoptive families; the number of Title IV-E and state-funded cases;
the number of cases in which an adoption support subsidy request by
an adoptive parent was denied by the department; and the number of
adoptive parents who requested a renegotiation of their adoption
support subsidy contract.
Sec. 537. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year,
the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a
report on the following information for cases of child abuse or
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


child neglect from the previous fiscal year:
(a) The total number of relative care placements.
(b) The total number of relative care placements into
unlicensed relative homes.
(c) The total number of relative care placements into licensed
relative homes.
(d) The total number of unlicensed relative providers with a
relative placement that were denied a foster home license due to
not meeting the standards established for foster care licensing in
this state.
(e) From a sample of cases, a list of the reasons documented
by the department for denial of relative foster home licensure.
(f) For licensed or approved relative caregivers with
placements, the status of Title IV-E claims for foster care
maintenance payments and foster care administrative payments.
Sec. 540. If a physician or psychiatrist who is providing
services to a state or court ward placed in a residential facility
submits a formal request to the department to change the
psychotropic medication for a ward, the department shall, if the
ward is a state ward, make a determination on the proposed change
not later than 7 business days after the request or, if the ward is
a temporary court ward, seek parental consent not later than 7
business days after the request. If the determination or parental
consent is not provided by the seventh business day, the department
shall petition the court for the determination or consent on the
eighth business day.
Sec. 546. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for foster
care payments and from child care fund, the department shall pay an
administrative rate before incentive payments of not less than
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


$60.20 to providers of general foster care, independent living, and
trial reunification services.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department
shall pay providers of independent living plus services per diem
statewide rates for staff-supported housing at a rate of $252.30
and host-home housing at a rate of $119.95. The independent living
plus program provides staff-supported housing and services for
foster youth 16 years of age to 19 years of age who, because of
their individual needs and assessments, are not initially
appropriate for general independent living foster care.
(3) If required by the federal government to meet Title IV-E
requirements, on a quarterly basis, providers of foster care
services shall submit a report on expenditures to the department to
identify actual costs of providing foster care services.
Sec. 547. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the
guardianship assistance program, the department shall pay a minimum
rate that is not less than the approved age-appropriate payment
rates for youth placed in family foster care.
(2) The department shall submit, to the standard report
recipients, a report that includes quarterly data on the number of
children enrolled in the guardianship assistance and foster care –
children with serious emotional disturbance waiver programs.
Sec. 550. (1) The department shall not offset against
reimbursements to counties or seek reimbursement from counties for
charges that were received by the department more than 12 months
before the department seeks to offset against reimbursement. A
county shall not request reimbursement, and reimbursements must not
be paid, for a charge that is more than 12 months after the date of
service or original status determination when initially submitted
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


by the county.
(2) Not later than 12 months after a date of service, a
service provider shall submit a request for payment. A request for
payment submitted later than 12 months after the date of service
requires the provider to submit an exception request to the county
or the department for approval or denial.
(3) A county is not subject to any offset, chargeback, or
reimbursement liability for a prior expenditure resulting from an
error in a foster care fund source determination.
Sec. 551. Not later than 30 days after a county requests a
clarification through the department's child care fund management
unit email address, the department shall respond to the request.
Sec. 552. Sixty days after a county's child care fund review
is completed, including the receipt of all requested documentation
from the county, the department shall provide the results of the
review to the county. In the review, the department shall not
evaluate the relevancy, quality, effectiveness, efficiency, or
impact of the services provided to youth by the county's child care
fund programs. The department shall not release the results of a
county's child care fund review to a third party without the
permission of the county.
Sec. 554. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for foster
care payments, the department shall allocate $50,000.00 to a
nonprofit organization organized under the laws of this state that
is exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the
internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501; operates on a 100%
volunteer basis with a board of directors consisting of not more
than 15 members; is a dedicated community of individuals that give
their time, talent, and resources to provide the best quality
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


shopping environment that they can to local children in need; and
provides clothing, shoes, toys, linens, nursery furniture,
strollers, car seats, school supplies, hygiene products, and safety
equipment to local foster children and their families free of
charge.
Sec. 557. If a vehicle that is owned by the state is available
and not scheduled for use by other state workers, the department
may consider a children's protective services caseworker or a
foster care caseworker driving the vehicle to a foster home visit
or driving the vehicle to the caseworker's own home as an allowable
use of the vehicle if the driving would be helpful to the
caseworker in conducting the caseworker's work.
Sec. 559. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
adoption support services, not later than December 1 of the current
fiscal year, the department shall allocate $500,000.00 to a grant
recipient to operate and expand its adoptive parent mentor program
to provide a listening ear, knowledgeable guidance, and community
connections to adoptive parents and children who were adopted in
this state or another state.
(2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the
grant recipient shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a
report on the program described in subsection (1), including, but
not limited to, the number of cases served and the number of cases
in which the program prevented an out-of-home placement.
Sec. 562. If a foster parent transports a foster child to
parent-child visitation, the department shall reimburse the foster
parent for the foster parent's time and travel. As part of the
foster care parent contract, the department shall provide written
confirmation to foster parents that states that the foster parents
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


have the right to request reimbursement for all parent-child
visitations. Not later than 60 days after receiving a request from
a foster parent for eligible reimbursement, the department shall
provide the reimbursement. If the foster parent is unable to
transport a foster child to parent-child visitation, the private
child placing agency may provide transportation and shall receive
reimbursement from the department not later than 60 days after the
private child placing agency submits a request for eligible
reimbursement.
Sec. 564. (1) The department shall maintain a clear policy for
parent-child visitations. All of the following individuals shall
meet an 85% success rate, after accounting for factors outside of
caseworker control:
(a) Caseworkers and supervisors of local county offices.
(b) Caseworkers and supervisors of child placing agencies.
(2) In accordance with the court-ordered number of required
meetings between caseworkers and a parent, the caseworkers shall
achieve a success rate of 85%, after accounting for factors outside
of caseworker control.
(3) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a
report on the following:
(a) The percentage of success rates for parent-child
visitations and court-ordered required meetings under subsections
(1) and (2) for the previous fiscal year.
(b) The barriers to achieve the success rates described in
subsections (1) and (2) and how this information is tracked.
Sec. 568. (1) The department shall ensure each youth
transitioning out of foster care is given assistance with obtaining
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


a driver license or state identification card and is issued a copy
of the youth's Social Security number, as required by department
policy. Assistance must be provided to each youth who is eligible
to obtain a driver license or state identification card and, based
on the youth's citizenship and legal residency status, a Social
Security card.
(2) Not later than April 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a
report on the number of youth who obtained a driver license or
state identification card, the number of youth who obtained a
Social Security card, and the number of youth who were eligible but
did not receive a driver license, state identification card, or
Social Security card and an explanation as to why the youth did not
receive the documents.
Sec. 569. The department shall reimburse each private child
placing agency that completes an adoption at the rate on the date
when the petition for adoption and the required support
documentation were accepted by the court and not the rate on the
date when the court's order placing for adoption was entered.
Sec. 574. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for foster
care payments, $1,375,000.00 is allocated to support family
incentive grants to private and community-based foster care service
providers and relative caregivers for assistance with home
improvements to alleviate safety concerns or obtain items needed to
ensure compliance with licensing rule requirements and to
accommodate children in foster care.
(2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a
report on the total amount expended in the previous year for grants
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


to private and community-based foster care service providers for
home improvements or physical exams described in subsection (1) and
the number of grants issued.
Sec. 575. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for children's
services administration, the department shall allocate $200,000.00
to provide support and coordinated services to the kinship
caregiver advisory council. The responsibilities of the council may
include all of the following:
(a) Establishing a public awareness campaign to educate the
public about kinship caregivers and this state's efforts to better
serve kinship caregivers.
(b) Consulting and coordinating with the kinship caregiver
navigator program to collect aggregate data on individuals being
served by the kinship caregiver navigator program, including
information on what services the individuals need.
(c) Consulting and collaborating with the provider of the
kinship caregiver navigator program on the design and
administration of the program.
(d) Establishing, maintaining, and updating a list of local
support groups and programs that provide services to kinship
families and, in order to obtain a better understanding of the
issues facing kinship families, devising a plan of action for
engaging with the groups and programs on the list.
(e) Developing methods to promote and improve collaboration
between state, county, and local governments and agencies and
private stakeholders for all of the following reasons:
(i) To obtain a broad understanding of the characteristics and
prevalence of kinship caregiving.
(ii) To improve service delivery.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


(iii) To include the methods in the council's recommendations.
Sec. 578. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for foster
care payments, the department shall allocate Title IV-E passthrough
funds for educational programs to strengthen this state's child
welfare workforce. The department shall enter into contractual
arrangements with 1 or more state universities to provide bachelor
of social work and master of social work educational training,
including field placements and stipends for tuition and educational
expenses. In exchange, students completing eligible educational
programs are contractually obligated to work for Michigan child
welfare agencies for a minimum of 4 months for every semester they
receive the stipend. The matching funds for the Title IV-E funds
must be provided by the participating state universities from the
expenses incurred for training child welfare students who
participate in the program.
(2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a
report on the status of pilot programs under subsection (1) that
includes, but is not limited to, the total number of applicants,
the total number of program participants, a list of state
universities that participated in the pilot programs, and the total
amount of matching funds that each state university contributed to
the programs.
Sec. 581. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for foster
care payments, the department shall allocate at least $50,000.00
for caseworkers to provide immediate assistance with urgent needs,
including, but not limited to, food, clothing, and other basic
necessities, for children, including children who are victims of
human trafficking, on the children's removal from the children's
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


homes or other dangerous environments.
Sec. 583. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year,
the department shall submit, to the standard report recipients and
the senate and house of representatives standing committees that
cover subject matters dealing with families and human services, a
report that includes all of the following:
(a) The number and percentage of foster parents that closed
their license in the previous fiscal year, the reasons the foster
parents left, and how the figures compare to the figures for prior
fiscal years.
(b) The number and percentage of foster parents successfully
retained in the previous fiscal year and how the figures compare to
the figures for prior fiscal years.
(c) The number and percentage of licensed foster homes that
closed their license because they adopted their foster child based
on survey data from foster parents closing the foster parents'
licenses.
Sec. 585. Each month, the department shall make available at
least 1 pre-service training class in which new caseworkers for
private foster care and adoption agencies can enroll.
Sec. 588. (1) Concurrently with public release, the department
shall transmit, without revision, all reports from the court-
appointed settlement monitor, including, but not limited to, the
needs assessment and period outcome reporting, to the standard
report recipients.
(2) Not later than October 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit, to the standard report recipients, a
detailed plan that addresses the status and progress toward exiting
the settlement by September 30 of the current fiscal year. The
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


report must include an update on the department's child welfare
initiative.
Sec. 589. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child
care fund, the department shall pay 100% of the administrative rate
for all new cases referred to providers of foster care services.
(2) On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit a
report, to the standard report recipients, on the monthly number of
all foster care cases administered by the department and all foster
care cases administered by private providers.
Sec. 592. On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit,
to the chairs of the senate and house of representatives standing
oversight committees and the standard report recipients, a report
that includes data from children's protective services staff for
each of the following for the most recent quarter before the
applicable report is submitted:
(a) The percent of investigations commenced in 24 hours
immediately after receiving a report.
(b) The percent of central registry reviews performed for
required individuals.
(c) The percent of face-to-face contacts made within the
established timeframe required by the department.
(d) In appropriate cases, the percent of sibling placement
evaluations completed when 1 or more children remain in the home
after a child has been removed.
(e) The percent of supervisory reviews performed in a timely
manner.
(f) The results of a department survey of children's
protective services investigators on the number of investigators
who are concerned for their own personal safety.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


(g) The percent of investigators using the mobile application
or another tool to document compliance.
Sec. 593. The department shall conduct an annual review in
each county to determine if the county has adopted and implemented
standard child abuse and child neglect investigation and interview
protocols under section 8(6) of the child protection law, 1975 PA
238, MCL 722.628.
Sec. 594. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for foster
care payments, the department shall support regional resource teams
to provide for the recruitment, retention, and training of foster
and adoptive parents and shall expand the Michigan youth
opportunities initiative to all counties of this state. The purpose
of the funding is to increase the number of annual inquiries from
prospective foster parents, increase the number of nonrelative
foster homes that achieve licensure each year, increase the annual
retention rate of nonrelative foster homes, reduce the number of
older foster youth placed outside of family settings, and provide
older youth with enhanced support in transitioning to adulthood.
Sec. 598. Partial child care fund reimbursements to counties
for undisputed charges must not be made later than 45 business days
after receipt of the required forms and documentation. Not later
than 15 business days after receiving a request from a county for
reimbursement of a disputed charge, the department shall commence
activity to investigate and resolve the disputed reimbursement
charge. The activity to investigate and resolve a disputed
reimbursement charge may include, but is not limited to, the use of
a formal appeals process under applicable law and the department
chargeback policy. Not later than 45 business days after a properly
corrected submission by the county, the department shall reimburse
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


the county for the corrected charge or charges.

PUBLIC ASSISTANCE
Sec. 601. After a client agrees to the release of the client's
name and address to the local housing authority, the department
shall request from the local housing authority information
regarding whether the housing unit for which vendoring has been
requested meets applicable local housing codes. Vendoring must be
terminated if the local housing authority indicates in writing that
the unit does not meet local housing codes and until the local
housing authority indicates in writing that the local housing codes
have been met.
Sec. 602. The department shall conduct a full evaluation of an
individual's assistance needs if the individual has applied for
disability more than 1 time in a 1-year period.
Sec. 603. For any change in the income of a recipient of the
food assistance program, the family independence program, or state
disability assistance that results in a benefit decrease, the
department shall notify the recipient of the amount of the decrease
not later than 15 work days before the first day of the month in
which the decrease takes effect.
Sec. 604. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for state
disability assistance payments, the department shall operate a
state disability assistance program. Except as provided in
subsection (3), to be eligible for the program, an individual must
be a needy citizen of the United States or alien exempted from the
SSI citizenship requirement who is not less than 18 years of age,
or an emancipated minor, and meets 1 or more of the following
requirements:
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


(a) Is a recipient of SSI, Social Security, or medical
assistance due to disability or being 65 years of age or older.
(b) Is an individual with a physical or mental impairment that
meets federal SSI disability standards, except that the minimum
duration of the disability must be 90 days. Substance use disorder
alone is not a basis for eligibility.
(c) Is a resident of an adult foster care facility, a home for
the aged, a county infirmary, or a substance use disorder treatment
center.
(d) Is an individual receiving 30-day postresidential
substance use disorder treatment.
(e) Is an individual diagnosed as having AIDS.
(f) Is an individual receiving special education services
through a local intermediate school district.
(g) Is a caretaker of a disabled individual who meets the
requirements specified in subdivision (a), (b), (e), or (f).
(2) An applicant for or recipient of state disability
assistance is considered needy if the applicant or recipient does
both of the following:
(a) Meets the same asset test as is applied for the family
independence program.
(b) Has a monthly budgetable income that is less than the
payment standards.
(3) Except for an individual described in subsection (1)(c) or
(d), an individual is not disabled under this section if the
individual's drug addiction or alcoholism is a contributing factor
material to the determination of disability.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) "Material to the determination of disability" means that,
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


if the individual stopped using drugs or alcohol, the individual's
remaining physical or mental limitations would not be disabling. If
the individual's remaining physical or mental limitations would be
disabling, then the drug addiction or alcoholism is not material to
the determination of disability and the individual may receive
state disability assistance, but the individual must actively
participate in a substance abuse treatment program, and the
assistance must be paid to a third party or through vendor
payments.
(b) "Substance abuse treatment" includes receipt of inpatient
or outpatient services or participation in Alcoholics Anonymous or
a similar program.
Sec. 605. The level of reimbursement provided to state
disability assistance recipients in licensed adult foster care
facilities must be the same as the prevailing SSI rate under the
personal care category.
Sec. 606. County department offices shall require each
recipient of family independence program and state disability
assistance who has applied with the Social Security Administration
for SSI to sign a contract to repay any assistance rendered through
the family independence program or state disability assistance
program on receipt of retroactive SSI benefits.
Sec. 607. (1) The department's ability to satisfy
appropriation deductions in part 1 for state disability
assistance/supplemental security income recoveries and public
assistance recoupment revenues is not limited to recoveries and
accruals pertaining to state disability assistance, or family
independence program grant payments provided only in the current
fiscal year and may include revenues collected during the current
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


year that are prior-year-related and not a part of the department's
accrued entries.
(2) The department may use SSI recoveries to satisfy the
deduct in any line in which the revenues are appropriated,
regardless of the source from which the revenue is recovered.
Sec. 608. An adult foster care facility that provides
domiciliary care or personal care to a resident receiving SSI or a
home for the aged serving a resident receiving SSI shall not
require a resident described in this section to reimburse the home
for the aged or adult foster care facility for care at a rate in
excess of a rate that is authorized by the legislature. To the
extent permitted by federal law, an adult foster care facility and
home for the aged that serves a resident receiving SSI is not
prohibited from accepting a third-party payment in addition to SSI
if the payment is not for food, clothing, or shelter, or would
result in a reduction in the resident's SSI payment.
Sec. 609. The department shall not reduce the state
supplementation level under the SSI program for the personal
care/adult foster care and home for the aged categories during the
current fiscal year. Not later than 30 days before a proposed
reduction in the state supplementation level, the department shall
notify the legislature of the proposed reduction.
Sec. 610. (1) The department shall grant an exemption from the
good-cause criteria for the state emergency relief program if an
emergency results from an unexpected expense related to maintaining
or securing employment.
(2) In determining housing affordability eligibility for state
emergency relief, a group is considered to have sufficient income
to meet ongoing housing expenses if the group's total housing
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


obligation does not exceed 75% of the group's total net income.
(3) The department shall not make a state emergency relief
payment to an individual who has been found guilty of fraud in
obtaining public assistance.
(4) The department shall not make a state emergency relief
payment to an individual who is an out-of-state or nonlegal
resident.
(5) The department shall distribute a state emergency relief
payment for rent assistance directly to a landlord and shall not
add the payment to a Michigan bridge card.
Sec. 611. The state supplementation level under the SSI
program for the living independently category or living in the
household of another category must not exceed the minimum state
supplementation level as required under federal law.
Sec. 613. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
indigent burial, the department shall provide a reimbursement for
the final disposition of an indigent individual. A reimbursement
under this section must comply with all of the following:
(a) The maximum allowable reimbursement for the final
disposition is $960.00.
(b) The adult burial with services allowance is $875.00.
(c) The adult burial without services allowance is $610.00.
(d) The infant burial allowance is $240.00.
(e) The adult cremation with services allowance is $640.00.
(f) The adult cremation without services allowance is $390.00.
(g) The maximum allowable reimbursement if an irrevocable
funeral agreement exists is $260.00.
(2) The department shall reimburse up to $80.00 for a
cremation permit fee and for mileage at the standard rate for an
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


eligible cremation. A reimbursement under this subsection must take
into consideration whether an indigent individual's religious
preference prohibits cremation.
(3) An application for burial services must be made no later
than 20 business days after the burial, cremation, or donation
takes place. A friend or relative of the indigent individual may
supplement the burial payment in any amount up to $6,000.00 for
additional services. A funeral director, with written authorization
provided by a relative of the indigent individual, is deemed an
authorized representative for burial benefits.
(4) By January 31 of the current fiscal year, the department
shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on burial
service payments issued from the state emergency relief program
during the previous fiscal year. The report must include the number
of applicants denied and the number of payments by the following
burial service categories:
(a) Fetus or infant less than 1 month of age.
(b) Burial with memorial service.
(c) Burial without memorial service.
(d) Cremation with memorial service.
(e) Cremation without memorial service.
(f) Transportation of a donated or unclaimed body being
cremated.
(g) Cremation permit fee for an unclaimed body.
(h) Disposition of an unclaimed body.
(i) Payment if an irrevocable funeral agreement exists.
(j) An unclaimed body received by a university.
Sec. 614. By January 15 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


on the number and percentage of state disability assistance
recipients who were determined to be eligible for federal SSI
benefits in the previous fiscal year.
Sec. 615. Except as required by federal law, the department
shall not use funds appropriated in part 1 to provide public
assistance to an individual who is not a United States citizen,
permanent resident alien, or refugee. This section does not
prohibit the department from entering into a contract with a food
bank, emergency shelter provider, or another human service agency
that may, as a normal part of doing business, provide food or
emergency shelter.
Sec. 616. The department shall require a retailer that
participates in the electronic benefits transfer program to charge
no more than a $2.50 fee for cash back as a condition of
participation.
Sec. 619. The department shall not deny a title IV-A
assistance and food assistance benefit under 21 USC 862a to an
individual who has been convicted of a felony for the possession,
use, or distribution of a controlled substance, if both of the
following are met:
(a) The act that resulted in the conviction occurred after
August 22, 1996.
(b) The individual is not in violation of the individual's
probation or parole requirements.
Sec. 620. (1) The department shall determine a Medicaid
applicant's Medicaid eligibility not later than 90 days after the
Medicaid applicant completes a Medicaid application if the Medicaid
applicant's disability is an eligibility factor. For other Medicaid
applicants, including an applicant who is a patient of a nursing
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


home, the department shall determine the applicant's Medicaid
eligibility within 45 days after receiving the Medicaid applicant's
application.
(2) On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit a report
to the standard report recipients on the number of recipients who
were ineligible for Medicaid after Medicaid eligibility
redeterminations. The report must include, in a monthly data
format, the number of recipients who had their eligibility examined
directly, through an ex parte eligibility process or through a
passive eligibility process. The report must also include a copy of
each baseline and monthly report that the department provides to
CMS for unwinding data reporting and the number of recipients who
did not respond to the department through eligibility outreach or
data requests.
Sec. 625. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for SSI
advocacy legal services grant, the department shall allocate
$975,000.00 as a grant to the Michigan State Bar Foundation. The
purpose of the grant is to assist current or potential recipients
of state disability assistance who have applied for or wish to
apply for SSI or other federal disability benefits. The Michigan
State Bar Foundation shall provide a list of newly eligible SSI
recipients to the department to verify that services are provided
to department referrals.
Sec. 645. The department shall consider an individual or
family to be homeless for purposes of eligibility for state
emergency relief, if the individual or family is living temporarily
with another in order to escape domestic violence. The department
shall define and verify domestic violence in the same manner as the
department defines and verifies that term in the department's
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


policies on good cause for not cooperating with child support and
paternity requirements.
Sec. 653. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for food
assistance program benefits, an individual who is the victim of
domestic violence or human trafficking and who does not qualify for
any other exemption may be exempt from the 3-month in 36-month
limit on receiving food assistance under 7 USC 2015. The department
may extend the exemption for an additional 3 months if an
individual described in this section demonstrates to the department
a continuing need.
Sec. 654. The department shall notify a recipient of food
assistance program benefits that the recipient's benefits can be
spent with the recipient's Michigan bridge card at many farmers
markets in this state. The department shall also provide a
recipient with information about the double up food bucks program
that is administered by the Fair Food Network. The information
about the double up food bucks program must include, but is not
limited to, information that if the recipient spends $20.00 at a
participating farmers market through the program, the recipient may
receive an additional $20.00 to buy Michigan produce.
Sec. 655. Not later than 14 days after the spending plan for
low-income home energy assistance program is approved by the state
budget office, the department shall provide the spending plan,
including itemized projected expenditures and itemized expenditures
for the previous fiscal year, to the standard report recipients.
Sec. 669. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for family
independence program – clothing allowance, the department shall
allocate $10,000,000.00 for the annual clothing allowance. The
department shall grant the allowance to eligible children in a
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


family independence program group.
Sec. 672. (1) By February 15 of the current fiscal year, the
department's office of inspector general shall submit a report to
the standard report recipients on the department's efforts to
reduce the inappropriate use of Michigan bridge cards and food
assistance program trafficking. The department shall provide
information on the number of recipients of services who used their
Michigan bridge card inappropriately and the current status of each
case, the number of recipients whose benefits were permanently and
temporarily revoked as a result of inappropriately using their
Michigan bridge cards, and the number of retailers that were fined
or removed from the electronic benefit transfer program for
permitting the inappropriate use of Michigan bridge cards. The
report must also include the number of Michigan bridge card
trafficking instances and overall welfare fraud referrals, that
includes, but is not limited to, information on the number of
investigations completed, fraud and intentional program violation
dollar amounts identified, the number of referrals to prosecutors,
the number of administrative hearing referrals and waivers, and the
number of program disqualifications imposed. The report must
distinguish between savings and cost avoidance. As used in this
subsection:
(a) "Cost avoidance" includes expenditures avoided due to
front-end eligibility investigations and other preemptive actions
undertaken in the prevention of fraud.
(b) "Savings" includes receivables established from instances
of fraud committed.
(2) If a fourth Michigan bridge card has been issued to a
household in a 12-month period, the department shall notify the
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


household that the household has reached the number of issued cards
threshold. At a household's fifth and each subsequent card
replacement request, a card will not be issued until a recipient
from the household has spoken directly to the local office district
manager or county director. The district manager or county director
may issue a new Michigan bridge card based on the district
manager's or county director's assessment of the recipient's
situation and the recipient's explanation.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Food assistance trafficking" means the buying and selling
of food assistance benefits for cash or items not authorized under
7 USC 2036b.
(b) "Inappropriate use" means not used to meet a family's
ongoing basic needs, including, but not limited to, food, clothing,
shelter, utilities, household goods, personal care items, and
general incidentals.
Sec. 677. (1) The department shall establish a state goal for
the percentage of family independence program cases involved in
employment activities. The percentage established must not be less
than 50%. The goal for long-term employment must be 15% of cases
for 6 months or more.
(2) The department shall submit an annual report, providing
quarterly data, to the standard report recipients on the number of
cases referred to PATH, the current percentage of family
independence program cases involved in PATH employment activities,
an estimate of the current percentage of family independence
program cases that meet federal work participation requirements on
the whole, and an estimate of the current percentage of the family
independence program cases that meet federal work participation
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


requirements for those cases referred to PATH.
(3) The department shall submit a report to the standard
report recipients. The report must include quarterly data on all of
the following:
(a) The number and percentage of nonexempt family independence
program recipients who are employed.
(b) The average and range of wages of employed family
independence program recipients.
(c) The number and percentage of employed family independence
program recipients who remain employed for 6 months or more.
Sec. 678. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for family
independence program – child supplemental payment, the department
shall allocate $16,240,100.00 of TANF revenue to provide a
supplemental payment for the current fiscal year for each child
under 6 years of age within a family receiving cash assistance. Not
later than November 30 of the current fiscal year, the department
shall distribute an equal payment based on the funds available in
part 1 and the total number of children under 6 years of age who
are within a family receiving cash assistance.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for family
independence program – child supplemental payment, the department
shall allocate $7,000,000.00 of TANF revenue to provide a
supplemental payment for the current fiscal year for each child 6
years of age or older but under 14 years of age within a family
receiving cash assistance. Not later than November 30 of the
current fiscal year, the department shall distribute an equal
payment based on the funds available in part 1 and the total number
of children who are 6 years of age or older but under 14 years of
age within a family receiving cash assistance.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


(3) By February 1 of the current fiscal year, the department
shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the
amount of funding distributed under this section and shall include
the number of family independence program cases, the number of
family independence program eligible children by age group, and the
amount of funding distributed by age category.
Sec. 686. (1) The department shall confirm that an individual
who presents a personal identification issued by another state and
is seeking assistance through the family independence program, food
assistance program, state disability assistance program or medical
assistance program is not receiving benefits from another state.
(2) The department shall confirm the address provided by an
individual who is seeking family independence program benefits or
state disability assistance benefits.
(3) The department shall prohibit an individual who has
property assets assessed at a value higher than $200,000.00 from
receiving assistance through a department-administered program,
unless prohibiting assistance would violate a federal law or
guideline.
(4) The department shall make a reasonable attempt to obtain
an up-to-date telephone number for an individual seeking medical
assistance benefits during the eligibility determination or
redetermination process for the individual.
Sec. 687. (1) On a quarterly basis, the department shall
compile and make available a report on its website that contains
all of the following information about the family independence
program, state disability assistance, the food assistance program,
indigent burial, Medicaid, and state emergency relief:
(a) The number of applications received.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n


(b) The number of applications approved.
(c) The number of applications denied.
(d) The number of applications pending and neither approved
nor denied.
(e) The number of cases opened.
(f) The number of cases closed.
(g) The number of cases at the beginning of the quarter and
the number of cases at the end of the quarter.
(2) The department shall compile and make the information
provided under subsection (1) available for this state as a whole
and for each county and shall report the information separately for
each program listed in subsection (1).
(3) On a quarterly basis, the department shall compile and
make available a report on its website of the following family
independence program information:
(a) The number of new applicants who successfully met the
requirements of the 10-day assessment period for PATH.
(b) The number of new applicants who did not meet the
requirements of the 10-day assessment period for PATH.
(c) The number of cases sanctioned because of a school truancy
policy.
(d) The number of cases closed because of the lifetime limits.
(e) The number of first-, second-, and third-time sanctions.
(f) The number of children 0 to 5 years of age who are living
in a family independence program-sanctioned household.
Sec. 689. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
prenatal and infant support program, the department shall allocate
$20,000,000.00 of TANF revenue for programs that are intended to
improve the economic stability of households with very young
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

100
children.
(2) In allocating the funds referenced in subsection (1), the
department shall give preference to programs that demonstrate the
following:
(a) Effectiveness in improving the economic stability of
households with pregnant women at a minimum of 20 weeks gestation,
and with young children.
(b) Partnerships with local health care providers and
nonprofit human service agencies that provide for improved maternal
and infant health outcomes.
(c) Compliance with TANF requirements established by the
Administration for Children and Families within the United States
Department of Health and Human Services.
(3) By September 30 of the current fiscal year, the
department, through agreements with contracted implementing
agencies, shall report to the standard report recipients
information for the previous fiscal year on the aggregated
demographic data of all program recipients regardless of underlying
funding source. The report must include, but not be limited to,
aggregated recipient data from contracted implementing agencies
with each contracted implementing agency providing the age, race,
ethnicity, Hispanic or Latino origin, federal poverty level,
funding source, and zip codes of all program recipients.

CHILDREN'S SERVICES AGENCY – JUVENILE JUSTICE
Sec. 701. Unless required by a change to federal law or the
law of this state or at the request of a provider, the department
shall not alter the terms of a signed contract with a private
residential facility that serves children who are under state or
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

101
court supervision without receiving written consent from a
representative of the private residential facility.
Sec. 702. (1) Not later than December 10 of the current fiscal
year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report
recipients on all of the following for the prior fiscal year:
(a) The average daily population by month of youth residing at
state-run juvenile justice facilities.
(b) The total number of beds at each facility, separated by
those that are staffed and unstaffed, for each month.
(c) The average daily number of available beds by month.
(d) The average number of staff vacancies by month.
(2) The information in subsection (1) must be itemized by each
facility.
Sec. 706. A county is subject to a 50% chargeback for the use
of an alternative regional detention service, if the detention
service does not fall under the basic grant provision of section
117e of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.117e, or if a
county operates the detention service program primarily with
professional rather than volunteer staff.
Sec. 707. To be reimbursed for child care fund expenditures, a
county shall submit to the department the report required under
section 117a(11) of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL
400.117a, to enable the department to document a potential
federally claimable expenditure.
Sec. 708. (1) As a condition of receiving funds appropriated
in part 1 for the child care fund line item, by October 15 of the
current fiscal year, a county shall have an approved service
spending plan for the current fiscal year. Not later than August 15
of the current fiscal year, a county shall submit the county's
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

102
service spending plan for the following fiscal year to the
department for approval. The department shall approve a county's
service spending plan not later than 30 calendar days after the
department receives a properly completed service spending plan from
the county that complies with the requirements of the social
welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b. The department
shall notify and submit revisions to a service spending plan to a
county whose service spending plan is not approved after initial
submission. The department shall not request any additional
revisions to a county's service spending plan outside of the
requested revision notification submitted to the county by the
department. The department shall notify a county that its service
spending plan is approved not later than 30 days after the
department considers the county's revisions to the county's service
spending plan.
(2) A county shall submit an amendment to its county service
spending plan for the current fiscal year to the department not
later than August 30 of the current fiscal year. A county shall
submit payable estimates for the current fiscal year to the
department not later than September 15 of the current fiscal year.
(3) Not later than February 15 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients
on the number of counties that fail to submit a service spending
plan by August 15 of the previous fiscal year and the number of
service spending plans not approved by October 15. The report must
include the number of county service spending plans that were not
initially approved by the department and the number of service
spending plans that were not approved by the department after being
resubmitted by the county after revisions were requested by the
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

103
department under subsection (1).
Sec. 709. The department's master contract for juvenile
justice residential foster care services must prohibit a contractor
from denying a referral for placing a youth, or terminating a
youth's placement, if the youth's assessed treatment needs are in
alignment with the facility's residential program type, as
identified by a court or the department. The master contract must
also require that a youth placed in a juvenile justice residential
foster care facility has regularly scheduled treatment sessions
with a licensed clinician, regularly scheduled reviews with a
licensed psychiatrist for medication management, and has access to,
or regular sessions with a licensed psychologist or a psychiatrist,
as clinically indicated.

LOCAL OFFICE OPERATIONS AND SUPPORT SERVICES
Sec. 801. The department shall submit a quarterly report that
contains monthly data to the standard report recipients on the most
recent food assistance program error rate derived from the active
cases, reported to the United States Department of Agriculture Food
and Nutrition Service for the supplemental nutrition assistance
program.
Sec. 807. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Elder Law
of Michigan MiCAFE contract, the department shall allocate not less
than $450,000.00 to the Elder Law of Michigan MiCAFE to assist this
state's elderly population in participating in the food assistance
program. Of the $450,000.00 allocated under this section, the
department shall use $225,000.00 of general fund/general purpose
revenue as state matching funds to receive not less than
$225,000.00 in funding from the United States Department of
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

104
Agriculture to provide outreach program activities as part of a
statewide food assistance hotline. The outreach program activities
may include eligibility screening and information services.
Sec. 825. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall provide an individual with not more than $2,000.00
for vehicle repairs, including a repair done in the previous 12
months. The $2,000.00 limit described in this section includes the
combined total of payments made by the department and the work
participation program.
(2) By February 1 of the current fiscal year, the department
shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that
details the total amount of funding distributed and the total
number of payments made for vehicle repairs.
Sec. 826. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for local
office policy and administration, not less than $300,000.00 is
allocated for the department to contract with the Prosecuting
Attorneys Association of Michigan to provide the support and
services necessary to increase the capability of this state's
prosecutors, adult protective service system, and criminal justice
system to effectively identify, investigate, and prosecute elder
abuse and financial exploitation.
(2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the
Prosecuting Attorneys Association of Michigan shall submit a report
to the department on the efficacy of the contract. The department
shall submit the report to the standard report recipients not later
than 30 days after the department receives the report from the
Prosecuting Attorneys Association of Michigan.
Sec. 850. (1) The department shall maintain each out-stationed
eligibility specialist in a community-based organization, community
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

105
mental health agency, nursing home, adult placement and independent
living setting, FQHC, and hospital, unless the community-based
organization, community mental health agency, nursing home, adult
placement and independent living setting, FQHC, or hospital
requests to discontinue the positions at its facility.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for donated funds
positions, the department shall enter into a contract with any
agency that is able and eligible under federal law to provide the
required matching funds for federal funding, as determined by
federal law.
(3) A contract for a donated funds position for assistance
payments must include, but not be limited to, performance metrics
on both of the following topics:
(a) Meeting a standard of promptness for processing an
application for Medicaid and other public assistance programs under
the law of this state.
(b) Meeting required standards for error rates in determining
programmatic eligibility, as determined by the department.
(4) The department shall fill an additional donated funds
position only after a new contract has been signed with an agency.
The position must be abolished when the contract expires or is
terminated.
(5) The department shall classify as a limited-term FTE a new
employee who is hired to fill a donated funds position contract or
is hired to fill a vacancy from an employee who transferred to a
donated funds position.
(6) By March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department
shall submit a report to the standard report recipients detailing
information on the donated funds positions. The report must
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

106
include, but is not limited to, the total number of occupied
positions, the total private contribution of the positions, and the
total cost to this state for a nonsalary expenditure for the
donated funds position employees.

DISABILITY DETERMINATION SERVICES
Sec. 890. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for disability
determination services, the department shall maintain the unit
rates in effect on September 30, 2019 for medical consultants
performing disability determination services, including physicians,
psychologists, and speech-language pathologists.

BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION AND SPECIAL PROJECTS
Sec. 901. The department shall use the funds appropriated in
part 1 to support a system of comprehensive community mental health
services under the full authority and responsibility of local
CMHSPs or PIHPs in accordance with the mental health code, 1974 PA
258, MCL 330.1001 to 330.2106, the Medicaid provider manual,
federal Medicaid waivers, and all other applicable federal law and
the law of this state.
Sec. 902. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall make a final authorization to a CMHSP or PIHP on
the execution of a contract between the department and the CMHSP or
PIHP. The contract must contain an approved plan and budget and any
policy and procedure governing the obligations and responsibilities
of each party to the contract. Each contract with a CMHSP or PIHP
that the department is authorized to enter into under this
subsection must include a provision that the contract is not valid
unless the total dollar obligation for all of the contracts between
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

107
the department and the CMHSPs or PIHPs entered into under this
subsection for the current fiscal year does not exceed the amount
of money appropriated in part 1 for the contracts authorized under
this subsection.
(2) The department shall immediately submit a report to the
standard report recipients if either of the following occurs:
(a) The department enters into a new contract with a CMHSP or
PIHP that would affect a rate or expenditure.
(b) The department amends a contract that the department has
entered into with a CMHSP or PIHP that would affect a rate or
expenditure.
(3) The report required by subsection (2) must include
information about any changes to the contract and the change's
effects on rates and expenditures.
Sec. 904. (1) Not later than September 30 of the current
fiscal year, the department shall provide a report on the CMHSPs,
PIHPs, and designated regional entities for substance use disorder
prevention and treatment to the standard report recipients that
includes the information required by this section.
(2) The report required under subsection (1) must contain,
unless otherwise noted, information for each CMHSP and PIHP and a
statewide summary, as follows:
(a) A statewide summary of the demographic description of
service recipients that, minimally, includes reimbursement
eligibility, client population group, age, ethnicity, housing
arrangements, and diagnosis.
(b) Per capita expenditures in total and by client population
group.
(c) A statewide summary of Medicaid-funded cost information
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

108
for the 3 diagnosis groups of adults with a mental illness,
children with a serious emotional disturbance, and individuals with
an intellectual or developmental disability. The statewide summary
must, minimally, include expenditures by service category for each
of the 3 diagnosis groups described in this subdivision and cases,
units, and cost of each specific service code index or health care
common procedure coding system code for each of the 3 diagnosis
groups.
(d) Financial information on non-Medicaid mental health
services by general fund cost reporting category.
(e) Information about access to each CMHSP, PIHP, and
designated regional entity for substance use disorder prevention
and treatment, that includes, but is not limited to, all of the
following:
(i) The number of individuals receiving requested services.
(ii) The number of individuals who requested services but did
not receive services.
(f) The number of second opinions requested under the mental
health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1001 to 330.2106, and the
determination of any appeals.
(g) Lapses and carryforwards during the previous fiscal year
for each CMHSP, PIHP, and designated regional entity for substance
use disorder prevention and treatment.
(h) Performance indicator information required to be submitted
to the department in the contracts with each PIHP.
(i) Administrative expenditures of each CMHSP and PIHP that
include a breakout of the salary, benefits, and pension of each
executive-level staff, which includes, but is not limited to, the
director, chief executive, and chief operating officer.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

109
(3) The report required under subsection (1) must contain the
following information from the previous fiscal year on substance
use disorder prevention, education, and treatment programs:
(a) A statewide summary of the demographic description of
service recipients that, minimally, must include reimbursement
eligibility, primary substance of abuse, age, ethnicity, housing
arrangements, and sex at birth.
(b) The expenditures stratified by department-designated
regional entities for substance use disorder prevention and
treatment, by fund source, by subcontractor, by population served,
and by service type.
(c) The expenditures per state client, with data on the
distribution of expenditures reported using a histogram approach.
(d) The number of services provided by subcontractor and by
service type. Additionally, data on length of stay, referral
source, and participation in other state programs.
(e) The collections from other first- or third-party payers,
private donations, or other state or local programs, by department-
designated regional entities for substance use disorder prevention
and treatment, by subcontractor, by population served, and by
service type.
(f) Information about access to CMHSPs, PIHPs, and designated
regional entities for substance use disorder prevention and
treatment that includes, but is not limited to, the following:
(i) The number of individuals receiving requested services.
(ii) The number of individuals who requested services but did
not receive services.
(4) The department shall include the data reporting
requirements described in subsections (2) and (3) in the
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

110
department's annual contract with each CMHSP, PIHP, and designated
regional entity for substance use disorder prevention and
treatment.
(5) The department shall take all reasonable actions to ensure
that the data required are complete and consistent among all
CMHSPs, PIHPs, and designated regional entities for substance use
disorder prevention and treatment.
Sec. 907. (1) The department shall expend the amount
appropriated in part 1 for community substance use disorder
prevention, education, and treatment to coordinate care and
services provided to individuals with severe and persistent mental
illness and substance use disorder diagnoses.
(2) Each managing entity shall continue current efforts to
collaborate on the delivery of services to clients with mental
illness and substance use disorder diagnoses, with the goal of
providing services in an administratively efficient manner.
Sec. 909. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for health
homes, the department shall use available revenue from the
marihuana regulatory fund established in section 604 of the medical
marihuana facilities licensing act, 2016 PA 281, MCL 333.27604, to
improve physical health, expand access to substance use disorder
prevention and treatment services, and strengthen the existing
prevention, treatment, and recovery systems.
Sec. 910. The department shall ensure that substance use
disorder treatment is provided to applicants and recipients of
public assistance through the department who are required to obtain
substance use disorder treatment as a condition of eligibility for
public assistance.
Sec. 911. (1) The department shall ensure that a contract with
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

111
a CMHSP or PIHP requires the CMHSP or PIHP to implement programs to
encourage the diversion of individuals with a serious mental
illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability
from possible jail incarceration, when appropriate.
(2) Each CMHSP or PIHP shall have jail diversion services and
shall work toward establishing working relationships with
representative staff of local law enforcement agencies, including
county prosecutors' offices, county sheriffs' offices, county
jails, municipal police agencies, municipal detention facilities,
and the courts. Written interagency agreements describing what
services each participating agency is prepared to commit to the
local jail diversion effort and the procedures to be used by local
law enforcement agencies to access mental health jail diversion
services are strongly encouraged.
Sec. 912. The department shall contract directly with the
Salvation Army Harbor Light program, at an amount not less than the
amount provided during the fiscal year ending September 30, 2020,
to provide non-Medicaid substance use disorder services if the
local coordinating agency or the department confirms the Salvation
Army Harbor Light program meets the standard of care established by
the department. The standard of care must include, but is not
limited to, using a medication assisted treatment option.
Sec. 915. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community
substance use disorder prevention, education, and treatment and
opioid response activities, the department shall, to the extent
possible, provide grants, pursuant to federal law, to local public
entities that provide substance use disorder services and to 1
private entity that has a statewide contract to provide community-
based substance use disorder services.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

112
Sec. 916. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for behavioral
health program administration, the department shall allocate
$100,000.00 as a grant to a nonprofit mental health clinic located
in a county with a population between 290,000 and 300,000 according
to the most recent federal decennial census that provides
counseling services, accepts clients regardless of their ability to
pay for services through sliding scale copayments and volunteer
services, and uses fundraising to support their clinic.
Sec. 917. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for opioid
response activities, the department shall allocate $55,000,000.00
from the Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund created under
section 3 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.253,
to programs and services to address the opioid crisis in a manner
consistent with the opioid judgement, settlement, or compromise of
claims pertaining to violations, or alleged violations, of law
related to the manufacture, marketing, distribution, dispensing, or
sale of opioids. The funds must be allocated as follows:
(a) $8,500,000.00 for the following youth and young adult
prevention programs:
(i) $3,000,000.00 for school-based prevention programs.
(ii) $5,500,000.00 for out-of-school youth programming that
prevents substance use.
(b) $6,000,000.00 to support families impacted by the opioid
epidemic.
(c) $10,000,000.00 for Naloxone distribution.
(d) $5,000,000.00 for mobile treatment programs.
(e) $5,500,000.00 for peer recovery support services programs.
(f) $5,000,000.00 for competitive grants to substance use
disorder short-term recovery housing organizations.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

113
(g) $10,000,000.00 for competitive grants to sober living
organizations.
(h) $5,000,000.00 to invest in tribal communities.
(2) If any allocations remain after the completion of the
projects listed in subsection (1)(a) to (h), the department may
expend remaining funds for additional opioid response activities
that are consistent with the purposes outlined in this section.
(3) On a semiannual basis, the department shall submit to the
standard report recipients a report on all of the following:
(a) Total revenues deposited into and expenditures and
encumbrances from the Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund
since the creation of the fund.
(b) Revenues deposited into and expenditures and encumbrances
from the Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund during the
previous 6 months.
(c) Estimated revenues to be deposited into and the spending
plan for the Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund for the next
12 months.
Sec. 918. On a quarterly basis, providing monthly data, the
department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients
on the amount of funding paid to PIHPs to support the Medicaid
managed mental health care program. The report must include
information on the total paid to each PIHP, per capita rate paid
for each eligibility group for each PIHP, the number of cases in
each eligibility group for each PIHP, and a year-to-date summary of
eligibles and expenditures for the Medicaid managed mental health
care program.
Sec. 920. As part of the Medicaid rate-setting process for
behavioral health services, the department shall work with PIHP
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

114
network providers and actuaries to include, as part of the Medicaid
rate, state and federal wage and compensation increases that
directly impact staff who provide Medicaid-funded community living
supports, personal care services, respite services, skill-building
services, and other supports and services that the department
determines are similar.
Sec. 924. From the funds appropriated in part 1, for the
purposes of actuarially sound rate certification and approval for
Medicaid behavioral health managed care programs, the department
shall maintain a minimum fee schedule of not less than $66.00 per
hour for behavioral technicians providing autism services that are
reimbursed under CPT code 97153.
Sec. 926. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
community substance use disorder prevention, education, and
treatment, $1,000,000.00 is allocated for a specialized substance
use disorder detoxification project administered by a 9-1-1 service
district in conjunction with a substance use and case management
provider. The project must be located at a hospital within a 9-1-1
service district with at least 600,000 residents and 15 member
communities and that is located within a county with a population
of at least 1,500,000 according to the most recent federal
decennial census.
(2) The substance use and case management provider receiving
funds under this section shall collect and submit to the department
data on the outcomes of the project throughout the duration of the
project and the department shall submit a report on the project's
outcomes to the standard report recipients.
Sec. 928. (1) Each PIHP shall provide, from the PIHP's
internal resources, local funds to be used as a part of the state
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

115
match required under the Medicaid program in order to increase
capitation rates for PIHPs. The local funds must not include either
of the following:
(a) State funds received by a CMHSP for services provided to
non-Medicaid recipients.
(b) The state matching portion of the Medicaid capitation
payments made to a PIHP.
(2) Not later than April 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall report to the standard report recipients on the
lapse by PIHP from the previous fiscal year and the projected lapse
by PIHP in the current fiscal year.
Sec. 935. A county required under the mental health code, 1974
PA 258, MCL 330.1001 to 330.2106, to provide matching funds to a
CMHSP for mental health services rendered to residents in the
county's jurisdiction shall pay the matching funds in equal
installments on not less than a quarterly basis throughout the
fiscal year, with the first payment being made by October 1 of the
current fiscal year.
Sec. 940. (1) In accordance with section 236 of the mental
health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1236, the department shall review
expenditures for each CMHSP to identify any CMHSP with a projected
allocation surplus and to identify any CMHSP with a projected
allocation shortfall. The department shall encourage the board of a
CMHSP with a projected allocation surplus to concur with the
department's recommendation to reallocate the projected surplus to
a CMHSP with a projected allocation shortfall.
(2) A CMHSP that has its projected surplus reallocated during
the current fiscal year as described in subsection (1) is not
eligible for an additional funding reallocation during the
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

116
remainder of the current fiscal year, unless the CMHSP is
responding to a public health emergency as determined by the
department.
(3) A CMHSP shall report to the department on a proposed
reallocation described in this section at least 30 days before the
reallocation takes effect.
(4) The department shall notify the chairs of the
appropriation subcommittees on the department budget when a request
is made and when the department grants approval for a reallocation
described in subsection (1). Not later than February 1 of the
current fiscal year, the department shall submit a report on the
amount of funding reallocated in the previous fiscal year to the
standard report recipients.
Sec. 942. A CMHSP shall provide at least 30 days' notice
before reducing, terminating, or suspending a service provided by
the CMHSP to a CMHSP client, unless the service is authorized by a
physician and the service no longer meets established criteria for
medical necessity.
Sec. 960. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for autism
services, the department shall continue to cover all Medicaid
autism services to Medicaid enrollees eligible for the services
that were covered on January 1, 2019.
(2) To restrain cost increases in the autism services line
item, the department shall do all of the following:
(a) Require consultation with the client's evaluation
diagnostician and PIHP to approve the client's ongoing therapy for
3 years, unless the client's evaluation diagnostician recommended
an evaluation before the 3 years or if a clinician on the treatment
team recommended an evaluation for the client before the third
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

117
year.
(b) Limit the authority to perform a diagnostic evaluation for
Medicaid autism services to qualified licensed practitioners as
determined by the department.
(c) Allow and expand the utilization of telemedicine and
telepsychiatry to increase access to diagnostic evaluation
services.
(d) Coordinate with the department of insurance and financial
services on oversight for compliance with the Paul Wellstone and
Pete Domenici mental health parity and addiction equity act of
2008, Public Law 110-343, as it relates to autism spectrum disorder
services, to ensure appropriate cost sharing between public and
private payers.
(e) Require that Medicaid eligibility be confirmed through
prior evaluations conducted by qualified licensed practitioners as
determined by the department.
(f) Maintain regular statewide provider trainings on autism
spectrum disorder standard clinical best practice guidelines for
treatment and diagnostic services.
(3) By March 1 of the current fiscal year, the department
shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on total
autism services spending broken down by PIHP and CMHSP for the
previous fiscal year and current fiscal year and total
administrative costs broken down by PIHP, CMHSP, and the type of
administrative cost for the previous fiscal year and current fiscal
year.
Sec. 962. For special projects involving high-need children or
adults, including the not guilty by reason of insanity population,
the department may contract directly with providers of services to
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

118
the children and adults described in this section.
Sec. 965. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department and each PIHP shall maintain the comparison rate and any
associated reimbursement rate of the bundled rate H0020 for the
administration and services of methadone at not less than $19.00.
Sec. 972. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for behavioral
health program administration, the department shall allocate not
less than $9,386,400.00 of general fund/general purpose revenue and
any associated federal match or federal grant funding, including,
but not limited to, associated federal 988 grant funding for the
mental health telephone access line known as the Michigan crisis
and access line (MiCAL), to provide for both of the following in
accordance with section 165 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258,
MCL 330.1165:
(a) Primary coverage in a region where a regional national
suicide prevention lifeline center does not provide coverage.
(b) Statewide secondary coverage.
Sec. 974. The department and a PIHP shall allow an individual
with an intellectual or developmental disability who receives
supports and services from a CMHSP to instead receive supports and
services from another provider if the individual is eligible and
qualified to receive supports and services from another provider.
Other providers may include, but are not limited to, MIChoice and
PACE.
Sec. 978. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community
substance use disorder prevention, education, and treatment and
recovery community organizations, the department shall allocate
$1,200,000.00 as grants for recovery community organizations in
accordance with section 273b of the mental health code, 1974 PA
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

119
258, MCL 330.1273b. A grant must be used to offer or expand
recovery support center services or recovery community center
services to individuals seeking long-term recovery from substance
use disorders.
Sec. 994. (1) Not later than June 1 of the current fiscal
year, the department shall seek, if necessary, federal approval
through either a waiver request or state plan amendment to allow a
CMHSP, PIHP, or subcontracting provider agency that is reviewed and
accredited by a national accrediting entity for behavioral health
care services to be considered in compliance with state program
review and audit requirements that are addressed and reviewed by
that national accrediting entity.
(2) Not later than September 30 of the current fiscal year,
the department shall report to the standard report recipients all
of the following:
(a) The status of the federal approval process required in
subsection (1).
(b) A list of each CMHSP, PIHP, and subcontracting provider
agency that is considered to be in compliance with state program
review and audit requirements under subsection (1).
(c) For each CMHSP, PIHP, or subcontracting provider agency
described in subdivision (b), both of the following:
(i) The state program review and audit requirements that the
CMHSP, PIHP, or subcontracting provider agency is considered to be
in compliance with.
(ii) The national accrediting entity that reviewed and
accredited the CMHSP, PIHP, or subcontracting provider agency.
(3) The department shall continue to comply with the laws of
this state and federal law and shall not initiate an action that
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

120
negatively impacts beneficiary safety. Any cost savings attributed
to this action must be reinvested back into services.
(4) As used in this section, "national accrediting entity"
means the Joint Commission, formerly known as the Joint Commission
on Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations; the Commission on
Accreditation of Rehabilitation Facilities; the Council on
Accreditation; the URAC, formerly known as the Utilization Review
Accreditation Commission; the National Committee for Quality
Assurance; or another appropriate entity, as approved by the
department.
Sec. 995. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for mental
health diversion council, the department shall allocate
$3,850,000.00 to continue to implement the jail diversion programs
that are intended to address the recommendations of the mental
health diversion council.
(2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients
on the planned allocation of the funds appropriated for the mental
health diversion council.
(3) As used in this section, "mental health diversion council"
means the council as that term is defined in section 207e of the
mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1207e.
Sec. 996. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for family
support subsidy, the department shall make monthly payments of
$300.36 to a parent or legal guardian of a child approved for the
family support subsidy by a CMHSP.
Sec. 997. The department shall use population data from the
most recent federal data from the United States Census Bureau in
determining the distribution of substance use disorder block grant
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

121
funds.
Sec. 998. If the department decides to use census data to
distribute state general funds to CMHSPs, the department shall use
the most recent federal data from the United States Census Bureau.

BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES
Sec. 1001. Not later than May 15 of the current fiscal year,
each CMHSP shall submit a report to the department that identifies
populations being served by the CMHSP broken down by program
eligibility category. The report must also include the percentage
of the operational budget that is related to program eligibility
enrollment. Not later than June 30 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit the reports described in this section to
the standard report recipients.
Sec. 1002. The funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used
by the department to expand the certified community behavioral
health clinic demonstration.
Sec. 1003. The department shall notify the Community Mental
Health Association of Michigan when developing a policy or
procedure that will impact a PIHP or CMHSP.
Sec. 1004. The department shall submit a report to the
standard report recipients on any rebased formula changes to either
Medicaid behavioral health services or non-Medicaid mental health
services 90 days before the department implements the formula
change. The notification must include a table showing the changes
in funding allocation by PIHP for Medicaid behavioral health
services or by CMHSP for non-Medicaid mental health services.
Sec. 1005. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
health homes, the department shall maintain the number of
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

122
behavioral health homes and maintain the number of substance use
disorder health homes, in place by PIHP region as of September 30
of the previous fiscal year. The department may expand the number
of behavioral health homes and the number of substance use disorder
health homes in a PIHP region added after October 1 of the current
fiscal year.
(2) On a semiannual basis, the department shall submit a
report to the standard report recipients on the number of
individuals being served and expenditures incurred by each PIHP
region by site.
Sec. 1006. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
certified community behavioral health clinics, not later than May 1
of the current fiscal year the department shall submit to the
standard report recipients an outcomes report for CCBHCs during the
previous fiscal year that includes both statewide and CCBHC site-
specific information on all of the following:
(a) The total number of distinct individuals served by the
CCBHCs.
(b) The percentage of individuals served by the CCBHCs that
were Medicaid recipients.
(c) The percentage of individuals served by the CCBHCs that
were not Medicaid recipients.
(d) The total number of CCBHC daily visits.
(e) Total number of CCBHC services provided, broken down by
the 9 core CCBHC services.
(f) Total expenditures from base and supplemental payments.
(g) Staffing and staff vacancy levels of the CCBHCs.
(h) The amount of prospective payment system rates for each
CCBHC over the entire demonstration period allocated across the 9
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

123
service types.
(i) The total expenditures by CCBHC in the previous fiscal
year.
(j) The total cost factors and implications in interpreting
how CCBHCs deliver care over the course of the demonstration
period.
(k) The comparison of costs for a random sample of enrollees
between care provided by a CCBHC provider and a Medicaid provider
that is not a CCBHC. The sample must include participants known to
have received services at CCBHC providers and Medicaid providers
that are not CCBHCs.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for certified
community behavioral health clinics, the department shall submit
the CCBHC cost efficiency evaluation to the standard report
recipients not later than 7 business days after the department's
receipt of the final information required from the relevant
contractors.
Sec. 1008. (1) A PIHP and CMHSP shall do all of the following:
(a) Work to reduce administration costs by ensuring that PIHP
and CMHSP responsible functions are efficient in allowing optimal
transition of dollars to the direct services considered most
effective in assisting individuals served. Any consolidation of
administrative functions must demonstrate, by independent analysis,
a reduction in dollars spent on administration resulting in greater
dollars spent on direct services. Savings resulting from increased
efficiencies must not be applied to PIHP and CMHSP net assets,
internal service fund increases, building costs, increases in the
number of PIHP and CMHSP personnel, or other areas not directly
related to the delivery of improved services.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

124
(b) Take an active role in managing mental health care by
ensuring consistent and high-quality service delivery throughout
its network and promote a conflict-free care management
environment.
(c) Ensure that direct service rate variances are related to
the level of need or other quantifiable measures to ensure that the
most money possible reaches direct services.
(d) Whenever possible, promote fair and adequate direct care
reimbursement, including, but not limited to, fair wages for direct
service workers.
(2) Not later than June 30 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients
on any actual reduction of administrative costs over the prior 2
fiscal years.
Sec. 1010. (1) The department shall use the funds appropriated
in part 1 for behavioral health community supports and services to
reduce waiting lists at state-operated hospitals and centers
through cost-effective community-based and residential services,
including, but not limited to, assertive community treatment,
forensic assertive community treatment, crisis stabilization units
in accordance with chapter 9A of the mental health code, 1974 PA
258, MCL 330.1971 to 330.1979, and psychiatric residential
treatment facilities in accordance with section 137a of the mental
health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1137a.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for behavioral
health community supports and services, the department shall
allocate $30,450,000.00 to reimburse private providers for
intensive psychiatric treatments and services that are provided
outside of state-operated hospitals and centers and for support
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

125
efforts related to overseeing community-based programs placement.
(3) If a private provider has an existing wait list for
intensive psychiatric treatments and services, a reimbursement to
the private provider under this section must not be conditioned on
the private provider giving wait-list priority to individuals
placed with funds appropriated in this section.
(4) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients
on all of the following:
(a) The types of community supports and services purchased.
(b) The quantity, measured by days or other relevant unit of
service, of each community support and service purchased.
(c) The quantifiable impact of the purchase of community
supports and services, including the number of individuals served,
the number of successful discharges, and the number of re-
escalations to either the discharging entity or a state psychiatric
hospital.
Sec. 1014. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 to
agencies providing physical and behavioral health services to
multicultural populations, the department shall award grants in
accordance with the requirements of subsections (2) and (3). This
state is not liable for any spending above the contract amount. The
department shall not release funds until reporting requirements
under section 1014 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121 are satisfied.
(2) The department shall require each contractor described in
subsection (1) that receives greater than $1,000,000.00 in state
grant funding to comply with performance-related metrics to
maintain their eligibility for funding. The performance-related
metrics shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

126
(a) Each contractor or subcontractor shall have accreditations
that attest to their competency and effectiveness as behavioral
health and social service agencies.
(b) Each contractor or subcontractor shall have a mission that
is consistent with the purpose of the multicultural agency.
(c) Each contractor shall validate that any subcontractors
utilized within these appropriations share the same mission as the
lead agency receiving funding.
(d) Each contractor or subcontractor shall demonstrate cost-
effectiveness.
(e) Each contractor or subcontractor shall ensure their
ability to leverage private dollars to strengthen and maximize
service provision.
(f) Each contractor or subcontractor shall provide timely and
accurate reports regarding the number of clients served, units of
service provision, and ability to meet their stated goals.
(3) The department shall require each contractor described in
subsection (1) to ensure that the funds appropriated in this
section are only used on proven or established programs.
(4) The department shall require an annual report from the
contractors described in subsection (2). The annual report, due 60
days following the end of the contract period, must include
specific information on services and programs provided, the client
base to which the services and programs were provided, information
on any wraparound services provided, and the expenditures for those
services. Not later than February 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department must submit the annual reports to the standard report
recipients.
Sec. 1034. (1) PIHPs must verify, on a quarterly basis, to the
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

127
department and to the standard report recipients that every
provider within the PIHP's provider network receives not less than
the applicable reimbursement rates or fees required in sections 924
and 231 of this part. The verification under this subsection must
provide actual claims and utilization data.
(2) The department shall seek CMS approval to exclude PIHPs
that are not compliant with subsection (1) from all performance
incentives available to PIHPs.
(3) The department shall audit the claims and utilization data
provided in this section. If the department audit determines that a
PIHP reimburses any provider within that PIHP's provider network at
a rate less than the applicable reimbursement rates or fees
required in sections 924 and 231 of this part, the department shall
notify that PIHP that it is not eligible for performance incentives
funded in part 1. Not later than 10 days after a notification to a
PIHP under this subsection, the department shall notify the
standard report recipients that the PIHP is not eligible for
performance incentives funded in part 1.

STATE PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALS AND FORENSIC MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES
Sec. 1051. The department shall continue a revenue recapture
project to generate additional revenues from third parties related
to cases that have been closed or are inactive. A portion of
revenues collected through the project's efforts may be used for
departmental costs and contractual fees associated with retroactive
collections under the project and to improve ongoing departmental
reimbursement management functions.
Sec. 1052. The department shall use gifts and bequests
received for patient living and treatment environments for
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

128
additional private funds to provide specific enhancements for
individuals residing at state-operated facilities. The department
shall use the gifts and bequests consistent with the stipulation of
the donor. The department shall use gift and bequest donations
within 3 years unless otherwise stipulated by the donor.
Sec. 1055. (1) The department shall not implement a closure or
consolidation of a state hospital, center, or agency, until each
CMHSP or PIHP affected by the closure or consolidation has programs
and services in place for the individuals currently in the
hospital, center, or agency that is to be closed or consolidated,
and has a plan for providing services to the individuals who would
have been admitted to the hospital, center, or agency.
(2) A closure or consolidation is dependent on adequate
department-approved CMHSP and PIHP plans that include a discharge
and aftercare plan for each individual currently in a facility
described in subsection (1). A discharge and aftercare plan must
address an individual's housing needs. A homeless shelter or
similar temporary shelter arrangement is inadequate to meet an
individual's housing needs.
(3) Four months after a closure is certified under section
19(6) of the state employees' retirement act, 1943 PA 240, MCL
38.19, the department shall provide a closure plan to the standard
report recipients.
(4) On the closure of a hospital, center, or agency and after
transitional costs have been paid, the remaining balances of funds
appropriated for the hospital, center, or agency must be
transferred to CMHSPs or PIHPs responsible for providing services
for individuals previously served by the hospital, center, or
agency.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

129
Sec. 1056. The department may collect revenue for patient
reimbursement from first- and third-party payers, including
Medicaid and local county CMHSP payers, to cover the cost of
patient placement in state hospitals and centers. The department
may adjust financing sources for patient reimbursement based on
actual revenues earned. If the revenue collected exceeds current
year expenditures, the revenue may be carried forward with approval
of the state budget director. The department shall use the revenue
carried forward as a first source of funds in the subsequent year.
Sec. 1058. Effective October 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department, in consultation with the department of technology,
management, and budget, may maintain a bid process to identify 1 or
more private contractors to provide food and custodial services for
the administrative areas at a state hospital identified by the
department as capable of generating savings through the outsourcing
of food and custodial services.
Sec. 1059. (1) The department shall identify specific outcomes
and performance measures for state-operated hospitals and centers.
Unless specified, the outcomes and performance measures must be
calculated on an average monthly basis from the previous calendar
year, as follows:
(a) The average wait time from the time of the receipt of a
court order for the treatment of an individual who is determined
incompetent to stand trial until the individual's admission to the
center for forensic psychiatry or other state-operated psychiatric
hospital.
(b) The average number of individuals determined not guilty by
reason of insanity by an order of the court who, on the first day
of each month, are waiting to receive admission into the center for
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

130
forensic psychiatry or other state-operated psychiatric hospital.
(c) The average number of adults who, on the first day of each
month, are waiting to receive admission into another state-operated
hospital or center through the civil admissions process.
(d) The average number of children who, on the first day of
each month, are waiting to receive admission into another state-
operated hospital or center through the civil admissions process.
(e) The average wait time for an adult who is awaiting
admission into another state-operated hospital or center through
the civil admissions process.
(f) The average wait time for a child who is awaiting
admission into another state-operated hospital or center through
the civil admissions process.
(g) The number of individuals determined not guilty by reason
of insanity or incompetent to stand trial by an order of the court
who have been determined to be ready for discharge to the
community, and the average wait time between being determined to be
ready for discharge to the community and actual community
placement.
(h) The number of adults admitted through the civil admission
process that have been determined to be ready for discharge to the
community, and the average wait time between being determined to be
ready for discharge to the community and actual community
placement.
(i) The number of children admitted through the civil
admission process that have been determined to be ready for
discharge to the community, and the average wait time between being
determined to be ready for discharge to the community and actual
community placement.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

131
(j) The most recent 12-month total number of individuals
determined not guilty by reason of insanity by an order of the
court ordering the individual to be admitted into the center for
forensic psychiatry or other state-operated psychiatric hospital.
(k) The most recent 12-month total number of adults requested
to be admitted to a state-operated hospital or center through the
civil admissions process.
(l) The most recent 12-month total number of children requested
to be admitted to a state-operated hospital or center through the
civil admissions process.
(m) The number of individuals determined not guilty by reason
of insanity by an order of the court who were removed from the
admissions waiting list and the reason for the removal from the
admissions waiting list.
(n) The number of adults awaiting admission through the civil
admission process removed from the admission waiting list and the
reason for the removal from the admission waiting list.
(o) The number of children awaiting admission through the
civil admission process removed from the admission waiting list and
the reason for the removal from the admission waiting list.
(p) The number of individuals determined not guilty by reason
of insanity by an order of the court and not admitted into the
center for forensic psychiatry or other state-operated hospital or
center, and the rationale for the individual not being admitted.
(q) The number of adults not admitted into the other state-
operated hospitals or centers through the civil admissions process
and the rationale for the individual not being admitted.
(r) The number of children not admitted into a state-operated
hospital or center through the civil admission process and the
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

132
rationale for the individual not being admitted.
(2) Not later than April 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients
of this part on the outcomes and performance measures required
under subsection (1).
Sec. 1060. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year,
the department shall submit a report on mandatory overtime, staff
turnover, and staff retention at the state psychiatric hospitals
and centers to the standard report recipients. The report must
include, but is not limited to, the following:
(a) The number of direct care and clinical staff positions
that are currently vacant by hospital, and how that number compares
to the number of vacancies during the previous fiscal year.
(b) A breakdown of voluntary and mandatory overtime hours
worked by position and by hospital, and how that breakdown compares
to the breakdown of voluntary and mandatory overtime hours during
the previous fiscal year.
(c) The ranges of wages paid by position and by hospital, and
how the ranges of wages paid compare to wages paid during the
previous fiscal year.
Sec. 1063. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
southeast Michigan state psychiatric hospital, the department shall
maintain a psychiatric transitional unit and children's transition
support team. The unit and support team described in this
subsection shall augment the continuum of behavioral health
services for high-need youth and provide additional continuity of
care and transition into supportive community-based services.
(2) The outcome and performance measures for the unit and
support team described in subsection (1) include, but are not
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

133
limited to, the following:
(a) The rate of rehospitalization for youth served through the
unit or support team at 30 and 180 days.
(b) The measured change in the Michigan Child and Adolescent
Needs and Strengths tool for youth and families served through the
unit or support team.

HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES POLICY AND INITIATIVES
Sec. 1140. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for primary
care services, $400,000.00 is allocated to free health clinics
operating in this state. The department shall distribute the funds
equally to each free health clinic. As used in this section, "free
health clinic" means a nonprofit organization that uses a volunteer
health professional to provide care to an uninsured individual.
Sec. 1143. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for primary
care services, the department shall allocate no less than
$675,000.00 for island primary health care access and services
including island clinics, in the following amounts:
(a) Beaver Island, $250,000.00.
(b) Mackinac Island, $250,000.00.
(c) Drummond Island, $150,000.00.
(d) Bois Blanc Island, $25,000.00.
Sec. 1145. The department shall take steps necessary to work
with the Indian Health Service, tribal health program facilities,
or Urban Indian Health Program facilities, that provide services
under a contract with a Medicaid managed care entity to ensure that
the facilities described in this section receive the maximum amount
allowable under federal law for Medicaid services.
Sec. 1146. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for domestic
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

134
violence prevention and treatment, the department shall allocate
$1,000,000.00 to support programs that serve survivors of domestic
violence, sexual violence, and human trafficking. The funds
appropriated in this section must be allocated in the following
manner:
(a) $500,000.00 must be used to provide technical assistance,
training, and support to victim service organizations and must be
allocated to a nonprofit organization organized under the laws of
this state that is exempt from federal income tax under section
501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501. To be
eligible for funding under this subsection, the nonprofit
organization must be a statewide tribal domestic violence and
sexual assault coalition serving the tribes located in this state
recognized as the Tribal Coalition in this state by the Office on
Violence Against Women within the United States Department of
Justice.
(b) $500,000.00 must be allocated to a nonprofit organization
organized under the laws of this state that is exempt from federal
income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of
1986, 26 USC 501, recognized as the Domestic and Sexual Violence
Coalition in this state by the Office on Violence Against Women
within the United States Department of Justice.
Sec. 1153. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for crime
victim rights sustaining grants, the department shall allocate
$102,600.00 of state general fund/general purpose revenue for a
sexual assault nurse examiners program at a hospital that is
located in a city with a population between 21,600 and 21,700 in a
county with a population between 64,300 and 64,400, according to
the most recent federal decennial census. The funds allocated under
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

135
this section must be used to support staff compensation and
training, victim needs, and community awareness, education, and
prevention programs.
Sec. 1155. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the
uniform statewide sexual assault evidence kit tracking system, in
accordance with the final report of the Michigan sexual assault
evidence kit tracking and reporting commission, the department
shall allocate $369,500.00 for administering a uniform statewide
sexual assault evidence kit tracking system. The system must
include all of the following:
(a) A uniform statewide system to track the submission and
status of sexual assault evidence kits.
(b) A uniform statewide system to audit untested kits that
were collected on or before March 1, 2015 and were released by
victims to law enforcement.
(c) Secure electronic access for victims.
(d) The ability to accommodate concurrent data entry with kit
collection through mechanisms that include, but are not limited to,
web entry through computers or smartphones, and through scanning
devices.
(2) The sexual assault evidence tracking fund established in
section 1451 of 2017 PA 158 shall continue to be maintained in the
department of treasury. Money in the sexual assault evidence
tracking fund at the close of a fiscal year remains in the sexual
assault evidence tracking fund, does not revert to the general
fund, and is appropriated as provided by law for the development
and implementation of a uniform statewide sexual assault evidence
kit tracking system as described in subsection (1).
Sec. 1157. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

136
advocacy centers - supplemental grants, the department shall
allocate $2,000,000.00 to provide additional funding to child
advocacy centers to support the general operations of child
advocacy centers. The department shall allocate the additional
funding to each center according to the formula under this section.
The department shall set a formula in consultation with children's
advocacy centers of Michigan (CAC-MI) to allocate the additional
funding. The formula must include base funding for each program and
factors, such as the number of children in the service area, square
miles of the service area, and prior service levels. The purpose of
the additional funding is to increase the amount of services
provided to children and their families who are victims of abuse
over the amount provided in the previous fiscal year.
(2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit to the standard report recipients a report
on the distribution of child advocacy center – supplemental grants
funding from the previous fiscal year. The report must include the
amount allocated to each specific child advocacy center or other
community-based child protection entity, including, but not limited
to, child abuse councils.
Sec. 1158. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for crime
victim rights sustaining grants, the department shall allocate
$29,897,400.00 to supplement the loss of federal victims of crime
act and state crime victim rights funding. The department must
distribute the funds consistent with the regular allocation formula
for crime victim justice grants and crime victim rights services
grants.
Sec. 1160. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year,
the department shall submit to the standard report recipients a
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

137
report on the distribution of crime victim rights justice
assistance grants, crime victim rights services grants, and crime
victim rights sustaining grants from the previous fiscal year. The
report must include the amount allocated to nonprofit agencies for
crime victim services listed by agency and the amount of funding
that the department has used for administrative purposes.

EPIDEMIOLOGY, EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES, AND LABORATORY
Sec. 1180. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
epidemiology administration and for childhood lead program, the
department shall maintain a public health drinking water program
and maintain enhanced efforts to monitor child blood lead levels.
The public health drinking water program shall ensure that
appropriate investigations of potential health hazards occur for
all community and noncommunity drinking water supplies where
chemical exceedances of action levels, health advisory levels, or
maximum contaminant limits are identified. The goals of the
childhood lead program must include improving the identification of
children affected by lead exposure, improving the timeliness of
case follow-up, and attaining nurse care management for children
with lead exposure, and to achieve a long-term reduction in the
percentage of children in this state with elevated blood lead
levels.
Sec. 1181. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
epidemiology administration, the department shall maintain a vapor
intrusion response program. The vapor intrusion response program
shall assess risks to public health at vapor intrusion sites and
respond to vapor intrusion risks if appropriate. The goals of the
vapor intrusion response program must include reducing the number
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

138
of individuals who are exposed to toxic substances through vapor
intrusion and improving health outcomes for individuals who are
identified as having been exposed to vapor intrusion.
Sec. 1182. Not later than April 1 of the current fiscal year,
the department shall submit a report to the standard report
recipients on the expenditures and activities undertaken by the
lead abatement program during the previous fiscal year using the
funds previously appropriated for the healthy homes program. The
report must include, but is not limited to, a funding allocation
schedule, the expenditures by category of expenditure and by
subcontractor, a description of program elements, the number of
housing units abated of lead-based paint hazards by zip code, and a
description of program accomplishments and progress.

LOCAL HEALTH AND ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Sec. 1220. The amount appropriated in part 1 for
implementation of the 1993 additions of or amendments to sections
9161, 16221, 16226, 17015, and 17515 of the public health code,
1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9161, 333.16221, 333.16226, 333.17015, and
333.17515, must be used to reimburse local health departments for
costs incurred to implement section 17015(18) of the public health
code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17015.
Sec. 1221. If a county that participates in a district health
department or has an associated arrangement with another local
health department takes action to stop participating in that
arrangement after October 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department may assess a penalty from the local health department's
operational accounts in an amount equal to no more than 6.25% of
the local health department's essential local public health
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

139
services funding. The department shall assess a penalty only if a
county requests the dissolution of the health department.
Sec. 1222. (1) The department shall prospectively allocate
funds appropriated in part 1 for essential local public health
services to local health departments to support immunizations,
infectious disease control, sexually transmitted disease control
and prevention, hearing screening, vision services, food
protection, public water supply, private groundwater supply, and
on-site sewage management. The department shall consult with the
department of agriculture and rural development before allocating
funds for food protection under this section. The department shall
consult with the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy
before allocating funds for public water supply, private
groundwater supply, and on-site sewage management under this
section.
(2) The department shall not distribute funds under subsection
(1) to a county unless the county maintains local spending in the
current fiscal year in an amount that is equal to or exceeds the
amount the county expended in fiscal year 1992-1993 for the
services described in subsection (1).
(3) Not later than February 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients
on the planned allocation of the funds appropriated for essential
local public health services.
(4) The department shall continue to implement the
distribution formula for allocating essential local public health
services funding to local health departments as specified in
section 1234 of article X of 2018 PA 207.
(5) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for essential local
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

140
public health services, each local public health department is
allocated not less than the amount allocated to that local public
health department during the previous fiscal year.
Sec. 1227. The department shall establish criteria for all
funds allocated for health and wellness initiatives. The criteria
must include a requirement that a program receiving funding is
evidence-based and supported by research, includes interventions
that have been shown to demonstrate outcomes that lower cost and
improve quality, and is designed for statewide impact. The
department shall give preference to a program that uses the funding
as match for additional resources, including, but not limited to,
federal sources.
Sec. 1231. (1) From the funds appropriated for local health
services, up to $4,750,000.00 is allocated for grants to local
health departments to support PFAS response and emerging public
health threat activities. The department shall allocate a portion
of the funding in a collaborative fashion with local health
departments in jurisdictions experiencing PFAS contamination. The
department shall allocate the remainder of the funding to address
infectious and vector-borne disease threats, and other
environmental contamination issues, including, but not limited to,
vapor intrusion, drinking water contamination, and lead exposure.
The department shall allocate the funding to address issues
including, but not limited to, staffing, planning and response, and
creating and disseminating materials related to PFAS contamination
issues and other emerging public health issues and threats.
(2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients
on actual expenditures in the previous fiscal year and planned
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

141
spending in the current fiscal year of the funds described in
subsection (1). The report must include recipient entities, the
amount of allocation, the general category of allocation, and
detailed uses.
Sec. 1232. The department may work to ensure that the United
States Department of Defense reimburses the state for costs
associated with PFAS and environmental contamination response at
military training sites and support facilities.
Sec. 1233. The department shall not expend general fund and
state restricted fund appropriations in part 1 for PFAS and
environmental contamination response if federal funding or private
grant funding is available for the same expenditures.
Sec. 1239. The department shall participate in and give
necessary assistance to the Michigan PFAS action response team
(MPART) pursuant to Executive Order No. 2019-03. The department
shall collaborate with MPART and other departments to carry out
appropriate activities, actions, and recommendations as coordinated
by MPART. Efforts must be continuous to ensure that the
department's activities are not duplicative with activities of
another department or agency.
Sec. 1240. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for chronic
disease control and health promotion administration, $70,000.00 is
allocated to support a rare disease advisory council and the
responsibilities of the rare disease advisory council, which may
include all of the following:
(a) Developing a list of rare diseases.
(b) Posting the list of rare diseases on the department's
website.
(c) Updating the list of rare diseases.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

142
(d) Annually investigating and reporting to the legislature on
1 rare disease on the list, and including legislative
recommendations in the report.
Sec. 1241. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
community health programs, the department shall support preventive
health supports and services in regions with high health care
access and outcome disparities. The department shall use the funds
appropriated pursuant to this section to provide for all of the
following:
(a) Financial support for the operation of community-based
health clinics. A community-based health clinic shall provide
preventive health supports and services, be established in
communities with high social vulnerability and health disparities,
and be operated in cooperation with trusted community partners with
demonstrated experience in serving as an access point for
preventive health supports and services.
(b) Financial support for the operation of healthy community
zones. The healthy community zones must utilize long-term
strategies to address access to healthy food, affordable housing,
and safety networks.
(c) Financial support for the operation of mobile health units
to provide preventive health supports and services for individuals
residing in areas with high disparities in health care outcomes and
access.
(2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit to the standard report recipients a report
on the outcome of the community health programs described in
subsection (1). The report must include, but is not limited to, all
of the following:
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

143
(a) The list of communities served.
(b) The types of health services offered by grant recipients.
(c) A spending report from the grant recipients.

FAMILY HEALTH SERVICES
Sec. 1301. (1) Not later than April 1 of the current fiscal
year, the department shall submit to the standard report recipients
a report on planned allocations from the amounts appropriated in
part 1 for local MCH services, prenatal care outreach and service
delivery support, family planning local agreements, and pregnancy
prevention programs. Using applicable federal definitions, the
report must include information on all of the following:
(a) The funding allocations.
(b) The actual number of women, children, and adolescents
served and the amounts expended for each group for the previous
fiscal year.
(c) A breakdown of the expenditure of the funds between urban
and rural communities.
(2) The department shall ensure that the distribution of funds
through the programs described in subsection (1) takes into account
the needs of rural communities.
(3) As used in this section, "rural community" means any of
the following:
(a) A county, city, village, or township with a population of
30,000 or less.
(b) A county, city, village, or township described in
subdivision (a), if it is located within a metropolitan statistical
area.
Sec. 1302. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for special
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

144
projects, the department shall allocate $500,000.00 of TANF revenue
to purchase child restraint systems for newborn children who are
TANF eligible. The child restraint systems must meet the standards
of all applicable federal law and the laws of this state, be
purchased in volume by this state, and be distributed through
maternal infant health program providers.
Sec. 1306. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the
drinking water declaration of emergency, the department shall
allocate funds to address needs in a city in which a declaration of
emergency was issued because of drinking water contamination. The
funds allocated under this section may be used to support any of
the following activities:
(a) Nutrition assistance, nutritional and community education,
food bank resources, and food inspections.
(b) Epidemiological analysis and case management of
individuals at risk of elevated blood lead levels.
(c) Support for child and adolescent health centers, and the
children's health care access program.
(d) Nursing services, breastfeeding education, evidence-based
home visiting programs, intensive services, and outreach for
children exposed to lead coordinated through local community mental
health organizations.
(e) Department local office operations costs.
(f) Lead poisoning surveillance, investigations, treatment,
and abatement.
(g) Nutritional incentives provided to local residents through
the double up food bucks expansion program.
(h) Genesee County health department food inspectors to
perform water testing at local food service establishments.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

145
(i) Transportation related to health care delivery.
(j) Senior initiatives.
(k) Lead abatement contractor workforce development.
(l) Any other activity that the department considers
appropriate.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the drinking
water declaration of emergency, the department shall allocate
$500,000.00 for rides to wellness through the Flint mass
transportation authority.
Sec. 1308. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for prenatal
care outreach and service delivery support, the department shall
allocate not less than $500,000.00 for evidence-based programs to
reduce infant mortality. The funds must be used for enhanced
support and education to nursing teams or other teams of health
professionals that the department considers qualified, client
recruitment in areas designated as underserved for obstetrical and
gynecological services and in other high-need communities,
strategic planning to expand and sustain programs, and marketing
and communications of programs to raise awareness, engage
stakeholders, and recruit nurses.
Sec. 1311. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for prenatal
care outreach and service delivery support, the department shall
allocate not less than $2,750,000.00 of state general fund/general
purpose revenue for a rural home visit program. The department
shall give equal consideration to all eligible evidence-based
providers in all regions in contracting for rural home visitation
services.
Sec. 1313. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall continue developing an outreach program on fetal
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

146
alcohol syndrome services, targeting health promotion, prevention,
and intervention.
(2) The department shall explore federal grant funding to
address prevention services for fetal alcohol syndrome and to
reduce alcohol consumption among pregnant women.
Sec. 1314. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall enhance the department's education and outreach
efforts that encourage women of childbearing age to seek the
confirmation of a pregnancy at the earliest indication of a
possible pregnancy and to initiate continuous and routine prenatal
care on the confirmation of a pregnancy. The department shall
ensure that the department's programs, policies, and practices
promote prenatal and obstetrical care by doing all of the
following:
(a) Supporting access to care.
(b) Reducing and eliminating barriers to care.
(c) Supporting recommendations for best practices.
(d) Encouraging optimal prenatal habits, including, but not
limited to, prenatal medical visits, use of prenatal vitamins, and
the cessation of tobacco use, alcohol use, or drug use.
(e) Tracking birth outcomes to study improvements in
prevalence of neonatal substance exposure, fetal alcohol syndrome,
and other preventable neonatal disease.
(f) Tracking maternal increase in healthy behaviors following
childbirth.
Sec. 1315. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for dental
programs, $200,000.00 is allocated to the Michigan Dental
Association for the administration of a volunteer dental program
that provides dental services to the uninsured.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

147
Sec. 1316. The department shall use revenue from permit fees
for mobile dental facilities that the department receives under
section 21605 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL
333.21605, to offset the costs of processing and issuing permits
for mobile dental facilities.
Sec. 1325. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for prenatal
care outreach and service delivery support, the department shall
allocate $5,000,000.00 to support grants to local collaboratives to
enhance the ability of local collaboratives to coordinate and
improve maternal and infant health outcomes. To receive a grant
under this section, a local collaborative must be a part of a
perinatal quality collaborative.
Sec. 1341. The department shall use income eligibility and
verification guidelines established by the Food and Nutrition
Service agency of the United States Department of Agriculture to
determine eligibility of individuals for the special supplemental
nutrition program for women, infants, and children (WIC) as stated
in current WIC policy.
Sec. 1343. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
dental programs, the department shall allocate $4,260,000.00 of
state and local funds, plus any private contributions received to
support the program, to establish and maintain the dental oral
assessment program described in section 9316 of the public health
code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9316.
(2) Not later than December 31 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients
that provides a summary of the dental reports the department
receives from principals and administrators under section 9316 of
the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9316.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

148
Sec. 1348. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for prenatal
care outreach and service delivery support, the department shall
allocate $5,000,000.00 to support prenatal health care providers
operating in this state to provide services for existing group-
based prenatal care programs that include 1 or more health care
professionals leading small groups of expectant mothers in the same
phase of pregnancy in discussions and for other health services
that promote the well-being and health of mothers and babies.
Sec. 1349. Subject to federal approval, from the funds
appropriated in part 1 for immunization program, the department
shall allocate all of the following funds to support a statewide
media campaign for improving this state's immunization rates:
(a) $740,000.00 of general fund/general purpose revenue.
(b) Any available work project funds.
(c) Any available federal match through a contract
administered by the department with oversight from the behavioral
and physical health and aging services administration and the
public health administration.

CHILDREN'S SPECIAL HEALTH CARE SERVICES
Sec. 1360. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department may do 1 or more of the following:
(a) Provide special formulas for eligible individuals with
specified metabolic and allergic disorders.
(b) Provide medical care and treatment to eligible individuals
with cystic fibrosis who are 26 years of age or older.
(c) Provide medical care and treatment to eligible individuals
with hereditary coagulation defects, commonly known as hemophilia,
who are 26 years of age or older.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

149
(d) Provide human growth hormone to eligible individuals.
(e) Provide mental health care to eligible individuals for
mental health needs that result from, or are a symptom of, the
individual's qualifying medical condition.
(f) Provide medical care and treatment to eligible individuals
with sickle cell disease who are 26 years of age or older.
Sec. 1361. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for medical
care and treatment, the department may spend the funds to continue
developing and expanding telemedicine capacity to allow families
with children in the children's special health care services
program to access specialty providers more readily and in a more
timely manner. The department may spend funds to support chronic
complex care management of children enrolled in the children's
special health care services program to minimize hospitalizations
and reduce costs to the program while improving outcomes and
quality of life. As used in this section, "children's special
health care services program" or "program" means the program
established under section 5815 of the public health code, 1978 PA
368, MCL 333.5815.

AGING SERVICES
Sec. 1402. The department may encourage the Food Bank Council
of Michigan to collaborate directly with each area agency on aging
and any other organization that provides senior nutrition services
to secure the food access of older adults.
Sec. 1403. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department may implement a palliative care advisory task force. The
palliative care advisory task force shall do all of the following:
(a) Provide the legislature with a recommended definition for
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

150
palliative care in this state.
(b) Conduct research on palliative care.
(c) Make recommendations that will expand the provision of
palliative care.
(d) Identify palliative care services that are offered and
measures for reimbursement of the services.
(e) Develop key program metrics for palliative care services
and make recommendations to the department and the legislature.
(f) Collaborate with individuals who are able to improve and
expand high-quality palliative care services.
(g) Develop engagement strategies to educate the public on
access to palliative care and to improve an individual's ability to
make informed decisions on preferred care.
(h) Identify the capacity of palliative care providers to
provide palliative care services.
(2) If the department implements the task force described in
subsection (1), then not later than January 1 of the current fiscal
year, the palliative care advisory task force shall submit to the
standard report recipients a report that identifies the palliative
care services available in this state and any palliative care
services that are not offered in this state but would provide a
benefit.
Sec. 1404. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community
services, the department shall allocate $658,000.00 to area
agencies on aging for home and community-based services.
Sec. 1417. Not later than March 31 of the current fiscal year,
the department shall submit to the standard report recipients a
report that contains all of the following information:
(a) The total allocation of state resources made to each area
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

151
agency on aging by individual program and administration.
(b) Detailed expenditures by each area agency on aging by
individual program and administration, including both state-funded
resources and locally funded resources.
Sec. 1421. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community
services, $1,100,000.00 is allocated for locally determined needs
that are provided by area agencies on aging.

HEALTH AND AGING SERVICES ADMINISTRATION
Sec. 1505. Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year,
the department shall submit a report to the standard report
recipients on the actual reimbursement savings and cost offsets
that have resulted from the funds appropriated in part 1 for the
office of inspector general and third-party liability efforts in
the previous fiscal year.
Sec. 1507. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for office of
inspector general, the inspector general shall audit and recoup
inappropriate or fraudulent payments from Medicaid managed care
organizations to health care providers. Unless authorized by
federal law or a law of this state, the department shall not fine,
temporarily halt operations of, disenroll as a Medicaid provider,
or terminate a managed care organization or health care provider
from providing services due to the discovery of an inappropriate
payment found during the course of an audit.
Sec. 1512. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall maintain the Medicaid encounter quality initiative
report to separate nonclinical administrative costs from actual
claims and encounter costs.
Sec. 1518. The department shall coordinate with the department
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

152
of licensing and regulatory affairs to ensure that, on the issuance
of an order suspending the license of an adult foster care
facility, home for the aged, or nursing home, the department of
licensing and regulatory affairs provides a notice to the
department, to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on
the department budget, to the house and senate appropriations
subcommittees on the department of licensing and regulatory affairs
budget, and to the members of the house of representatives and
senate that represent the legislative districts of the county in
which the adult foster care facility, home for the aged, or nursing
home is located.

HEALTH SERVICES
Sec. 1605. The protected income level for Medicaid coverage
determined under section 106(1)(b)(iii) of the social welfare act,
1939 PA 280, MCL 400.106, is 100% of the related public assistance
standard.
Sec. 1606. For the purpose of guardian and conservator
charges, the department may deduct up to $83.00 per month as an
allowable expense against a recipient's income when determining
Medicaid eligibility and patient pay amounts.
Sec. 1607. (1) The department shall immediately presume that
an applicant for Medicaid whose qualifying condition is pregnancy
is eligible for Medicaid coverage, unless the preponderance of
evidence in the applicant's application indicates otherwise. The
applicant who is qualified as described in this subsection is
allowed to select or remain with the Medicaid participating
obstetrician of the applicant's choice.
(2) Each qualifying applicant is entitled to receive all
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

153
medically necessary obstetrical and prenatal care without
preauthorization from a health plan. All claims submitted for
payment for obstetrical and prenatal care must be paid at the
Medicaid fee-for-service rate if a contract does not exist between
the Medicaid participating obstetrical or prenatal care provider
and the managed care plan. The applicant must receive a listing of
Medicaid physicians and managed care plans in the immediate
vicinity of the applicant's residence.
(3) If an applicant, presumed to be eligible for Medicaid
under subsection (1), is subsequently found to be ineligible, a
Medicaid physician or managed care plan that has been providing
pregnancy services to the applicant is entitled to reimbursement
for the services until the Medicaid physician or managed care plan
is notified by the department that the applicant was found to be
ineligible for Medicaid.
(4) If the preponderance of evidence in an application under
subsection (1) indicates that the applicant is not eligible for
Medicaid, the department shall refer the applicant to the nearest
public health clinic or similar entity as a potential source for
receiving pregnancy-related services.
(5) The department shall develop an enrollment process for
applicants covered under this section that facilitates the
selection of a managed care plan at the time of application.
(6) The department shall require that Medicaid managed care
plans enroll women whose qualifying condition for Medicaid is
pregnancy.
(7) The department shall encourage physicians to provide an
applicant whose qualifying condition for Medicaid is pregnancy with
a referral to a Medicaid participating dentist at the applicant's
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

154
first pregnancy-related appointment.
Sec. 1611. (1) For care provided to Medicaid recipients with
other third-party sources of payment, Medicaid reimbursement shall
not exceed, in combination with such other resources, including
Medicare, those amounts established for Medicaid-only patients. The
Medicaid payment rate shall be accepted as payment in full. Other
than an approved Medicaid copayment, no portion of a provider's
charge shall be billed to the recipient or any person acting on
behalf of the recipient. This section does not affect the level of
payment from a third-party source other than the Medicaid program.
The department shall require a nonenrolled provider to accept
Medicaid payments as payment in full.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1), if a hospital service is
provided to a dual Medicare/Medicaid recipient with only Medicare
part B coverage, the Medicaid reimbursement must equal, when
combined with a payment for Medicare or other third-party source of
payment, the amount established for a Medicaid-only patient,
including a capital payment.
Sec. 1620. (1) If a Medicaid claim is a fee-for-service
Medicaid claim, the professional dispensing fee for a drug that is
listed as a medication on the Michigan pharmaceutical products list
is $20.02 or the pharmacy's submitted dispensing fee, whichever is
less.
(2) If a Medicaid claim is a fee-for-service Medicaid claim,
the professional dispensing fee for a drug that is not listed as a
specialty medication on the Michigan pharmaceutical products list
is as follows:
(a) If the drug is indicated as preferred on the department's
preferred drug list, $10.80 or the pharmacy's submitted dispensing
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

155
fee, whichever is less.
(b) If the drug is not on the department's preferred drug
list, $10.64 or the pharmacy's submitted dispensing fee, whichever
is less.
(c) If the drug is indicated as nonpreferred on the
department's preferred drug list, $9.00 or the pharmacy's submitted
dispensing fee, whichever is less.
Sec. 1621. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for health
plan services, Healthy Michigan plan, and pharmaceutical services,
the department shall utilize generic and biosimilar pharmaceuticals
on this state's preferred drug list for both Medicaid managed care
and fee-for-service.
Sec. 1622. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for health
plan services, Healthy Michigan plan, and pharmaceutical services
the department shall incorporate any applicable aspects of federal
Executive Order No. 14297, 90 Fed. Reg. 20749 (May 12, 2025)
"Delivering Most-Favored-Nation Prescription Drug Pricing to
American Patients", for both Medicaid managed care and fee-for-
service pharmaceutical products specifically seeking most-favored-
nation pricing for high-cost pharmaceuticals on this state's
preferred drug list.
Sec. 1626. (1) Not later than January 15 of the current fiscal
year, each pharmacy benefit manager that receives reimbursements
directly, through a department-administered fee-for-services
contract, or through a Medicaid health plan, from the funds
appropriated in part 1 for health services must submit all of the
following information to the department for the previous fiscal
year:
(a) The total number of prescriptions that were dispensed.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

156
(b) The aggregate fiscal year paid pharmacy claims repriced
using the wholesale acquisition cost for each drug on its
formulary.
(c) The aggregate amount of rebates, discounts, and price
concessions that the pharmacy benefit manager received for each
drug on its formulary. The aggregate amount of rebates must include
any utilization discounts the pharmacy benefit manager received
from a manufacturer.
(d) The aggregate amount of administrative fees that the
pharmacy benefit manager received from all pharmaceutical
manufacturers.
(e) The aggregate amount identified in subdivisions (b) and
(c) that were retained by the pharmacy benefit manager and did not
pass through to the department or to the Medicaid health plan.
(f) The aggregate amount of reimbursements the pharmacy
benefit manager paid to contracting pharmacies.
(g) Any other information considered necessary by the
department.
(2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit a report including the information provided
under subsection (1) to the standard report recipients.
(3) Any nonaggregated information submitted under this section
is confidential and must not be disclosed to any person by the
department. The information described in this subsection is not a
public record of the department.
Sec. 1628. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for hospital
services and therapy and Healthy Michigan plan, the department
shall continue to allocate $3,000,000.00 in general fund/general
purpose revenue and any associated federal match to maintain the
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

157
Medicaid reimbursement rate for dental services provided at
ambulatory surgical centers and outpatient hospitals. The funding
provided in this section must be used to maintain the minimum rate
of reimbursement for dental services provided in ambulatory
surgical centers at $1,495.00 and maintain the minimum rate of
reimbursement for dental services provided in outpatient hospitals
at $2,300.00.
Sec. 1629. The department shall utilize maximum allowable cost
pricing for generic drugs that is based on wholesaler pricing to
providers. The wholesaler pricing must be based on the price
available from at least 2 wholesalers who deliver drugs in this
state.
Sec. 1630. Not later than April 1 of the current fiscal year,
from the funds appropriated in part 1 for Medicaid dental services,
the department shall submit a report to the standard report
recipients on the dental service benefit. The report must cover all
of the following areas:
(a) Information on the implementation of the Adult Medicaid
dental benefit redesign including all of the following information:
(i) The number of dental providers, by Medicaid health plan in
this state, who provided 1 or more Medicaid dental services in the
fiscal year ending September 30, 2022, and the number of additional
providers who were added in the previous fiscal year, with a
delineation in the reported numbers based on the average payment
per visit and before and after the implementation of the Adult
Medicaid dental benefit redesign.
(ii) The status of enhanced care coordination.
(iii) The array of covered dental benefits and services before
the Adult Medicaid dental benefit redesign and how the available
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

158
benefits and services changed or expanded after the Adult Medicaid
dental benefit redesign.
(b) Information on the Healthy Kids Dental program including
all of the following information:
(i) The number of children enrolled in the Healthy Kids Dental
program who visited the dentist in the previous fiscal year broken
down by dental benefit manager.
(ii) The number of dentists who accept payment from the Healthy
Kids Dental program broken down by dental benefit manager.
(iii) The annual change in dental utilization of children
enrolled in the Healthy Kids Dental program broken down by dental
benefit manager.
(iv) Service expenditures for the Healthy Kids Dental program
broken down by dental benefit manager.
(v) Administrative expenditures for the Healthy Kids Dental
program broken down by dental benefit manager.
Sec. 1631. (1) The department shall require copayments on
dental, podiatric, and vision services provided to Medicaid
recipients, except as prohibited by federal law or a law of this
state.
(2) Except as otherwise prohibited by federal law or a law of
this state, the department shall require Medicaid recipients to pay
the following copayments:
(a) Two dollars for a physician office visit.
(b) Three dollars for a hospital emergency room visit.
(c) Fifty dollars for the first day of an inpatient hospital
stay.
(d) Two dollars for an outpatient hospital visit.
(e) One dollar for a generic drug or any drug indicated as
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

159
preferred on the department's preferred drug list and $3.00 for a
brand-name drug not indicated as preferred on the department's
preferred drug list.
Sec. 1633. (1) The department shall provide adequate guidance
to insurance providers to ensure compliance with section 71117 of
Public Law 119-21.
(2) For the first quarterly insurance provider assessment
payment due after the end of the transition period provided on
November 14, 2025 in CMS correspondence regarding a revised
insurance provider assessment tax structure, the department and the
department of treasury shall work with insurance providers to
establish a reasonable time period for submission of that payment.
Sec. 1640. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall maintain the rate increase for the home help
individual caregiver rate and the home help agency provider rate
specified in the department's Medicaid provider letters L 24-66, L
24-67, and L 24-74.
Sec. 1641. An institutional provider that is required to
submit a cost report under the Medicaid program shall submit cost
reports completed in full not more than 5 months after the end of
the institutional provider's fiscal year.
Sec. 1644. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall maintain wages at a level not less than the amount
in effect the previous fiscal year. This funding must include all
costs incurred by the employer, including, but not limited to,
payroll taxes, due to the wage increase. As used in this
subsection, "direct care workers" means a registered professional
nurse, licensed practical nurse, competency-evaluated nursing
assistant, and respiratory therapist.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

160
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department
shall maintain wages at a level not less than the amount in effect
during the previous fiscal year for direct care workers who are
employed by licensed adult foster care facilities and licensed
homes for the aged and who provide Medicaid-funded fee-for-service
personal care services that were not eligible for any direct care
worker pay adjustment under Medicaid-funded managed care. This
funding must include all costs incurred by the employer, including,
but not limited to, payroll taxes, due to the wage increase.
Sec. 1645. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall maintain the wages of eligible nonclinical staff
employed by skilled nursing facilities. The funding must include
all costs incurred by the employer, including payroll taxes, due to
prior wage increases.
(2) The nonclinical staff eligible for the wages described in
subsection (1) are those whose costs are reported in the following
job classifications in nursing facility institutional cost reports
shared with the department:
(a) Other housekeeping.
(b) Other maintenance worker.
(c) Other plant operations.
(d) Other laundry.
(e) Dining room assistants.
(f) Other dietary workers.
(g) Other medical records.
(h) Other social services.
(i) Other diversion therapy.
(j) Beauty and barber.
(k) Gift, flower, coffee, and canteen worker.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

161
Sec. 1646. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall maintain the Medicaid reimbursement rates for
orthotic and prosthetic providers in place in the previous fiscal
year.
Sec. 1647. By February 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit a comprehensive report to the standard
report recipients detailing the use of all home and community-based
services funds received under section 9817 of Public Law 117-2. The
report must include, but is not limited to, all of the following:
(a) Total funds received and total expenditures by fiscal
year.
(b) Expenditures by category and by vendor or grantee.
(c) Program accomplishments and progress.
(d) Any unspent balances and projected future spending.
(e) A list of active contracts and grants associated with home
and community-based services funding.
Sec. 1657. (1) The department shall not make reimbursement for
Medicaid to screen and stabilize a Medicaid recipient, including
stabilization of a psychiatric crisis, in a hospital emergency
room, contingent on obtaining prior authorization from the
recipient's HMO. If the recipient is discharged from the emergency
room, the hospital shall notify the recipient's HMO within 24 hours
of the diagnosis and treatment received.
(2) If the treating hospital determines that the recipient
will require further medical service or hospitalization beyond the
point of stabilization, that hospital shall receive authorization
from the recipient's HMO prior to admitting the recipient.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) do not require an alteration to an
existing agreement between an HMO and its contracting hospitals and
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

162
do not require an HMO to reimburse for services that are not
considered to be medically necessary.
Sec. 1662. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall require an annual external quality review of each
contracting HMO. The external quality review must analyze and
evaluate aggregated information on quality, timeliness, and access
to health care services that the HMO or its contractors furnish to
Medicaid beneficiaries. The department shall create a report
containing each quality review required under this subsection.
(2) The department shall require Medicaid HMOs to provide
EPSDT utilization data through the encounter data system, and HEDIS
well child health measures in accordance with the National
Committee for Quality Assurance prescribed methodology.
(3) The department shall submit a copy of the analysis of the
Medicaid HMO annual audited reports on HEDIS and the report under
subsection (1) to the standard report recipients within 30 days
after the department's receipt of the final information required
from the contractors.
Sec. 1670. (1) The appropriation in part 1 for the MIChild
program is to be used to provide comprehensive health care to all
children under age 19 who reside in families with an income at or
below 212% of the federal poverty level, who are uninsured and have
not had coverage by other comprehensive health insurance within 6
months of applying for MIChild benefits, and who are residents of
this state. The department shall develop detailed eligibility
criteria through the behavioral and physical health and aging
services administration public concurrence process. The eligibility
criteria must be consistent with the provisions of this part and
part 1.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

163
(2) The department shall provide up to 1 year of continuous
eligibility to a child eligible for the MIChild program unless the
child reaches age 19.
Sec. 1677. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the
MIChild program, the department shall provide, at a minimum, all
benefits available under the Michigan benchmark plan that are
delivered through contracted providers and consistent with federal
law, including, but not limited to, the following medically
necessary services:
(a) Inpatient mental health services, other than substance use
disorder treatment services, including services furnished in a
state-operated mental hospital and residential or other 24-hour
therapeutically planned structured services.
(b) Outpatient mental health services, other than substance
use disorder services, including services furnished in a mental
hospital operated by this state and community-based services.
(c) Durable medical equipment and prosthetic and orthotic
devices.
(d) Dental services as outlined in the approved MIChild state
plan.
(e) Substance use disorder treatment services that may include
inpatient, outpatient, and residential substance use disorder
treatment services.
(f) Care management services for mental health diagnoses.
(g) Physical therapy, occupational therapy, and services for
individuals with speech, hearing, and language disorders.
(h) Emergency ambulance services.
Sec. 1682. (1) In addition to the appropriations in part 1,
the department is authorized to receive and spend penalty money
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

164
received as the result of noncompliance with Medicaid certification
regulations. Penalty money, characterized as private funds,
received by the department shall increase authorizations and
allotments in the long-term care accounts.
(2) Any unexpended penalty money, at the end of the year, must
carry forward to the following year.
(3) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall report to the standard report recipients, and to
the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on the department
of licensing and regulatory affairs budget, on penalty money
received by the department as described in subsection (1). The
report must include, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(a) The amount of penalty monies received by the department in
the previous fiscal year listed by the assessed entity.
(b) A list of the entities that were assessed penalties in the
previous fiscal year with the rationale for each penalty.
Sec. 1692. (1) The department is authorized to pursue
reimbursement for eligible services provided in Michigan schools
from the federal Medicaid program. The department and the state
budget director are authorized to negotiate and enter into
agreements, together with the department of education, with local
and intermediate school districts regarding the sharing of federal
Medicaid services funds received for these services. The department
is authorized to receive and disburse funds to participating school
districts pursuant to agreements described in this subsection and
pursuant to federal law and a law of this state.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for health services
school-based services payments, the department is authorized to do
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

165
all of the following:
(a) Finance activities within the behavioral and physical
health and aging services administration related to eligible
services.
(b) Reimburse participating school districts pursuant to the
fund-sharing ratios negotiated in the state-local agreements
authorized in subsection (1).
(c) Offset general fund costs associated with the Medicaid
program.
Sec. 1694. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for special
Medicaid reimbursement, $2,628,500.00 of general fund/general
purpose revenue and any associated federal match must be
distributed for poison control services to an academic health care
system that has a high volume of providing care to indigent
individuals.
Sec. 1697. The department shall require that Medicaid health
plans administering adult dental benefits maintain a network of
dental providers in sufficient numbers, mix, and geographic
locations throughout their respective service areas in order to
provide adequate dental care for Healthy Michigan plan enrollees.
Sec. 1700. Not later than December 1 of the current fiscal
year, the department shall report to the standard report recipients
on the distribution of funding provided, and the net benefit if the
special hospital payment is not financed with general fund/general
purpose revenue, to each eligible hospital during the previous
fiscal year from the following special hospital payments:
(a) GME.
(b) Special rural hospital payments provided under section
1802(1)(b) of this part.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

166
(c) Lump-sum payments to rural hospitals for obstetrical care
provided under section 1802(1)(a) of this part.
Sec. 1702. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall allocate $2,830,000.00 in general fund/general
purpose revenue and any associated federal match to maintain the
rates in place in the previous fiscal year for private duty nursing
services for Medicaid beneficiaries under the age of 21. These
additional funds must be used to attract and retain highly
qualified registered nurses and licensed practical nurses to
provide private duty nursing services so that medically fragile
individuals can be cared for in the most homelike setting possible.
Sec. 1757. The department shall obtain proof from all Medicaid
recipients that they are United States citizens or otherwise
legally residing in this country and that they are residents of
this state before approving Medicaid eligibility.
Sec. 1764. The department's contracted actuaries shall
annually certify whether rates paid to Medicaid health plans and
specialty PIHPs are actuarially sound in accordance with federal
requirements. The department shall provide to the standard report
recipients a copy of the rate certification required under this
section and the approval of rates paid to Medicaid health plans and
specialty PIHPs for any fiscal year not later than October 1 for
Medicaid capitation rate certifications and not later than November
15, February 15, May 15, and August 15 for any Medicaid capitation
rate amendments. Following the rate certification, the department
shall ensure that any new or revised policies with a substantive
impact on capitation rates are reviewed by the contracted actuaries
and considered for future rate amendments.
Sec. 1786. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

167
department shall maintain Medicaid reimbursement for the
administration of injectable, nasal, and oral vaccines at $23.03.
Sec. 1787. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for health
plan services, Healthy Michigan plan, and long-term care services,
the department shall maintain the Medicaid reimbursement rates in
place in the previous fiscal year for CPT codes 31579, 92507,
92508, 92520, 92521, 92522, 92523, 92524, 92526, 92597, 92607,
92608, 92609, 92610, 92630, 92633, 92700, 94010, 97129, 97130,
97533, 97799, G2250, G2251, and S9152.
Sec. 1788. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall provide Medicaid reimbursement rates, including
Medicaid reimbursements from the ambulance provider quality
assurance assessment, for ground ambulance services at not less
than 100% of the Medicare base rates for Locality 01 for ground
ambulance services in effect on January 1, 2023.
Sec. 1789. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for federally
qualified health centers, the department shall allocate not less
than $11,300,000.00 in general fund/general purpose revenue and any
associated federal match to maintain Medicaid prospective payment
system reimbursement rates.
Sec. 1790. The department shall maintain the current
practitioner rates paid for CPT codes 90791 through 90899 for
psychiatric procedures through Medicaid fee-for-service and through
the comprehensive Medicaid health plans for psychiatric procedures
provided for Medicaid recipients under the age of 21.
Sec. 1791. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for health
plan services and physician services, the department shall provide
Medicaid reimbursement rates for neonatal services at 100% of the
Medicare rate received for those services in effect on the date the
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

168
services are provided to eligible Medicaid recipients. The neonatal
services and physician services eligible for reimbursement rates
under this section are described as CPT codes 99468, 99469, 99471,
99472, 99475, 99476, 99477, 99478, 99479, and 99480.
Sec. 1792. By April 30 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall evaluate pharmacy encounter data through the first
2 quarters of the fiscal year to determine, in consultation with
the Medicaid health plans, if rates must be recertified. By May 30
of the current fiscal year, the department shall report the
evaluation results to the standard report recipients and the
Medicaid health plans.
Sec. 1793. (1) The department shall follow the guidance of the
CMS regarding the medical loss ratio, capitation rate development,
community reinvestment, and other financial reporting.
(2) The department shall not require Medicaid health plans to
use investment income as part of its medical loss ratio, capitation
rate development, community reinvestment, and other financial
reporting.
Sec. 1794. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall provide Medicaid reimbursements for hospital-based
substance use disorder peer-supports.
(2) Not later than March 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall report to the standard report recipients on the
statewide amounts and each hospital amount for hospital-based
substance use disorder peer-supports during the first quarter of
the current fiscal year, including for all of the following:
(a) The number of individuals served.
(b) The Medicaid reimbursement utilization.
(c) The total expenditures.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

169
Sec. 1801. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for physician
services and health plan services, the department shall continue
the increase to Medicaid rates for primary care services provided
only by primary care providers. The department shall not provide
the increase to Medicaid rates under this section to primary care
providers whose primary practice is as a non-primary-care
subspecialty. As used in this section, "primary care provider"
means a physician, or a practitioner working in collaboration with
a physician, who is either licensed under part 170 or part 175 of
the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17001 to 333.17097 and
333.17501 to 333.17556, and who works as a primary care provider in
general practice or is board-eligible or certified with a specialty
designation of family medicine, general internal medicine, or
pediatric medicine, or is a provider who provides the department
with documentation of equivalency.
Sec. 1802. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
hospital services and therapy, the department shall provide for the
following:
(a) $8,470,200.00 in general fund/general purpose revenue as
lump-sum payments to noncritical access hospitals that qualified
for rural hospital access payments in fiscal year 2013-2014
proportional to Medicaid deliveries performed during the fiscal
year before the previous fiscal year. Payment amounts must be based
on the volume of obstetrical care cases and newborn care cases for
all such cases billed by each qualified hospital in the most recent
year for which data is available. The department shall make
payments not later than January 1 of the current fiscal year. For
the current fiscal year, a hospital that met established occupied
bed criteria based on Medicaid cost reports as of the fiscal year
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

170
ending September 30, 2011, and that is located within a county with
a population of not more than 195,000 and within a city, village,
or township with a population of not more than 15,000, according to
the 2020 federal decennial census, is eligible.
(b) $15,204,800.00 in general fund/general purpose revenue and
any associated federal match awarded as rural access payments to
noncritical access hospitals that meet criteria established by the
department for services to low-income rural residents. One of the
reimbursement components of the criteria established by the
department under this subsection must be assistance with labor and
delivery services.
(2) Payments under this section must be made by January 1 of
the current fiscal year.
(3) The department shall publish the distribution of payments
for the current fiscal year and the previous fiscal year.
Sec. 1804. The department may utilize the federal public
assistance reporting information system to continue to work to
identify Medicaid recipients who are veterans and who may be
eligible for federal veterans' health care benefits or other
benefits and shall continue to refer veterans to the department of
military and veterans affairs for assistance in securing additional
benefits.
Sec. 1809. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
health plan services and physician services, the department shall
allocate not less than $565,200.00 of general fund/general purpose
revenue and any associated federal matching funds to provide
perinatal and gynecological services if perinatal and gynecological
services are provided by a perinatal or gynecological professional
who is licensed, registered, or otherwise authorized to practice in
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

171
this state, including, but not limited to, a licensed midwife
acting within the scope of the licensed midwife's license. Medicaid
reimbursement must be paid when gynecological or perinatal care
service is provided in a medical care facility, hospital or
freestanding birth center licensed under article 17 of the public
health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20101 to 333.22260, midwifery
care facility, or home setting. The rates paid to perinatal or
gynecological professionals described in this section must be the
same as those paid to other perinatal or gynecological
professionals, regardless of the location of those services.
(2) The perinatal or gynecological care services described in
subsection (1) must meet all of the following:
(a) Promote high-quality, cost-effective, and evidence-based
care.
(b) Promote high-value, evidence-based payment models.
(c) Prevent risk in subsequent pregnancies.
Sec. 1810. In advance of the annual rate setting development,
Medicaid health plans must be given at least 60 days to dispute and
correct any discarded encounter data before rates are certified.
The department shall notify each contracting Medicaid health plan
of any encounter data that have not been accepted for the purposes
of rate setting.
Sec. 1812. Not later than June 1 of the current fiscal year,
and using the most recent available cost reports, the department
shall complete a report of all direct and indirect costs associated
with residency training programs for each hospital that receives
funds appropriated in part 1 for graduate medical education or
through the MiDocs consortium. The report shall be submitted to the
standard report recipients.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

172
Sec. 1820. (1) In order to avoid duplication of effort, if a
Medicaid health plan has been reviewed and accredited by a national
accrediting entity for health care services, the department shall
use applicable national accreditation review criteria to determine
compliance with corresponding requirements in this state.
(2) The department shall continue to comply with federal law
and laws of this state and shall not initiate an action that
negatively impacts beneficiary safety.
(3) As used in this section, "national accrediting entity"
means the National Committee for Quality Assurance, the URAC,
formerly known as the Utilization Review Accreditation Commission,
or another appropriate entity, as approved by the department.
Sec. 1831. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for hospital
services and therapy and prenatal care outreach and service
delivery support, the department shall allocate $10,000,000.00 to
continue to support hospitals in this state to improve maternal
safety and outcomes by administering and expanding a data-driven
maternal safety and quality improvement initiative that is based on
interdisciplinary and consensus-based practices. The initiative
expansion must focus on mitigating pregnancy-associated injury and
death, work to improve outcomes for underserved groups, and address
problems related to substance use disorders.
Sec. 1837. The department shall continue, and expand where
appropriate, utilization of telemedicine and telepsychiatry as
strategies to increase access to services for Medicaid recipients.
Sec. 1846. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for graduate
medical education, the department shall distribute the funds with
an emphasis on the following health care workforce goals:
(a) The encouragement of the training of physicians in
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

173
specialties, including primary care, that are necessary to meet the
future needs of residents of this state.
(b) The training of physicians in settings that include
ambulatory sites and rural locations.
(c) The training of practitioners providing pediatric
psychiatry services.
Sec. 1850. The department may allow Medicaid health plans to
assist with maintaining eligibility through outreach activities to
ensure continuation of Medicaid eligibility and enrollment in
managed care. The assistance may include mailings, telephone
contact, or face-to-face contact with beneficiaries enrolled in the
individual Medicaid health plan. Medicaid health plans may offer
assistance in completing paperwork for beneficiaries enrolled in
the Medicaid health plan.
Sec. 1854. The funds appropriated in part 1 for PACE must
support a current fiscal year enrollment cap that is not less than
9,590.
Sec. 1855. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for PACE, to
the extent that funding is available in the PACE line item and
unused program slots are available, the department may do the
following:
(a) Increase the number of slots for a local and already-
established PACE if the local PACE has provided appropriate
documentation to the department indicating its ability to expand
capacity to provide services to additional PACE clients.
(b) Suspend the 10 member per month individual PACE enrollment
increase cap in order to allow unused and unobligated slots to be
allocated to address unmet demand for PACE services.
Sec. 1856. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

174
hospice services, $5,000,000.00 shall be expended to provide room
and board for Medicaid-eligible individuals who meet hospice
eligibility requirements and receive services at Medicaid enrolled
hospice residences in this state. The department shall distribute
funds through grants based on the total beds located in all
eligible residences that have been providing these services as of
October 1, 2017. An eligible grant applicant may inform the
department of the applicant's request to reduce the grant amount
allocated for the applicant's residence and the funds must be
distributed proportionally to increase the total grant amount of
the remaining grant-eligible residences. Grant amounts shall be
paid out monthly with 1/12 of the total grant amount distributed
each month to the grantees.
(2) Not later than September 15 of the current fiscal year,
each Medicaid-enrolled hospice with a residence that receives funds
under this section shall provide a report to the department on the
utilization of the grant funding provided in subsection (1). The
report must be provided in a format prescribed by the department
and must include the following information:
(a) The number of patients served.
(b) The number of days served.
(c) The daily room and board rates for the patients served.
(d) If there is not sufficient funding to cover the total room
and board need, the number of patients who did not receive care due
to insufficient grant funding.
(3) If funds awarded under this section remain unused at the
end of the current fiscal year, the Medicaid-enrolled hospice with
a residence shall return those unused funds to this state.
Sec. 1859. The department shall partner with the Michigan
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

175
Association of Health Plans and Medicaid health plans to develop
and implement strategies for the use of information technology
services for Medicaid research activities. The department shall
make available state medical assistance program data, including
Medicaid behavioral data, to the Michigan Association of Health
Plans and Medicaid health plans or any vendor considered qualified
by the department to perform research activities consistent with
this state's goals of improving health; increasing the quality,
reliability, availability, and continuity of care; and reducing the
cost of care for the eligible population of Medicaid recipients.
Sec. 1862. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall maintain payment rates for Medicaid obstetrical
services at 95% of Medicare levels.
Sec. 1870. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
hospital services and therapy, the department shall allocate
$6,400,000.00 in general fund/general purpose revenue plus any
contributions from public entities, up to $5,000,000.00, and any
associated federal match to the MiDocs consortium to create new
primary care residency slots in underserved communities. The new
primary care residency slots must be in 1 of the following
specialties: family medicine, general internal medicine, general
pediatrics, general OB-GYN, psychiatry, or general surgery.
(2) The department shall seek any necessary approvals from CMS
to allow the department to implement the program described in this
section.
(3) Assistance with repayment of medical education loans, loan
interest payments, or scholarships provided by the MiDocs
consortium shall be contingent upon a minimum 2-year commitment to
practice in an underserved community in this state post-residency
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

176
and an agreement to forego any sub-specialty training for at least
2 years post-residency with the exception of a child and adolescent
psychiatry followship that must be integrated with a psychiatry
residency training program in a MiDocs consortium affiliated
institution.
(4) The MiDocs consortium shall work with the department to
integrate the Michigan inpatient psychiatric admissions discussion
(MIPAD) recommendations and, when possible, prioritize training
opportunities in state psychiatric hospitals and community mental
health organizations.
(5) The department shall maintain the MiDocs consortium
initiative advisory council to help support implementation of the
program described in this section, and to provide oversight. The
advisory council must be composed of the MiDocs consortium, the
Michigan Area Health Education Centers, the Michigan Primary Care
Association, the Michigan Center for Rural Health, the Michigan
Academy of Family Physicians, and any other appointees designated
by the department.
(6) Not later than September 1 of the current fiscal year, the
MiDocs consortium shall submit a report to the standard report
recipients that includes all of the following information:
(a) Audited financial statement of per-resident costs.
(b) Education and clinical quality data.
(c) Roster of trainees, including areas of specialty and
locations of training.
(d) Medicaid revenue by training site.
(7) The department shall monitor outcome and performance
measures for this program, including, but not limited to, the
following:
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

177
(a) Increasing this state's ability to recruit, train, and
retain primary care physicians and other select specialty
physicians in underserved communities.
(b) Maximizing training opportunities with community health
centers, rural critical access hospitals, solo or group private
practice physician practices, schools, and other community-based
clinics, in addition to the required training through rotations at
inpatient hospitals.
(c) Increasing the number of residency slots for family
medicine, general internal medicine, general pediatrics, general
OB-GYN, psychiatry, and general surgery.
(8) Unexpended and unencumbered funds up to a maximum
$6,400,000.00 in general fund/general purpose revenue plus any
contributions from public entities, up to $5,000,000.00, and any
associated federal match remaining in accounts appropriated in part
1 for hospital services and therapy are designated as work project
appropriations, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds must not
lapse at the end of the fiscal year and must be available for
expenditures for the MiDocs consortium to create new primary care
residency slots in underserved communities under this section until
the work project has been completed. All of the following are in
compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984
PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the work project is to fund the cost of the
MiDocs consortium to create new primary care residency slots in
underserved communities.
(b) The work project will be accomplished by contracting with
the MiDocs consortium to oversee the creation of new primary care
residency slots.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

178
(c) The total estimated completion cost of the work project is
$20,200,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date for the work project is
September 30, 2031.
Sec. 1872. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for personal
care services, the department shall maintain the monthly Medicaid
personal care supplement paid to adult foster care facilities and
homes for the aged that provide personal care services to Medicaid
recipients in place during the previous fiscal year.
Sec. 1874. The department shall ensure, in counties where PACE
services are available, that PACE is included as an option in all
options counseling and enrollment brokering for aging services and
managed care programs, including, but not limited to, Area Agencies
on Aging, centers for independent living, and the MiChoice home and
community-based waiver. The department must include approved
marketing and discussion materials for options counseling.
Sec. 1879. Not later than May 15 of the current fiscal year,
the department shall submit to the standard report recipients a
report with Medicaid pharmaceutical information. The report shall
include, for the previous fiscal year, the total Medicaid
pharmaceutical costs and the total Medicaid pharmaceutical rebates.
The report must categorize the total Medicaid pharmaceutical costs
and total Medicaid pharmaceutical rebates recognized by the
contracted health plans and the department. In addition, the report
must also include all of the following information:
(a) The total estimated pharmaceutical benefit expenses
incurred by contracted health plans from the previous fiscal year
and through the first 2 quarters of the current fiscal year.
(b) The total estimated pharmaceutical benefit expenses
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

179
included in approved initial rates for contracted health plans from
the previous fiscal year and total estimated pharmaceutical benefit
expenses included in approved initial rates for contracted health
plans for the first 2 quarters of the current fiscal year.
(c) The total Medicaid pharmaceutical rebates received by the
department in the previous fiscal year and the single preferred
drug list supplemental rebates invoices in the previous fiscal
year.
(d) Information as to whether the average benefit expense for
the composite average across all rate cells and service categories
included in capitation rates, based on actual enrollment and
anticipated recoveries, for the previous fiscal year and through
the first 2 quarters of the current fiscal year exceeded the
reported contracted health plan's experience, adjusted for
completion over the same reporting periods.
(e) The following information related to the current Medicaid
pharmacy carve-out of pharmaceutical products as provided for in
section 109h of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.109h:
(i) The number of prescriptions paid by the department during
the previous fiscal year.
(ii) The total amount of expenditures for prescriptions paid by
the department during the previous fiscal year.
(iii) The number of and total expenditures for prescriptions
paid by the department for generic equivalents during the previous
fiscal year.
Sec. 1880. The department shall align all pharmacy-related
policies with the United States Food and Drug Administration
quality and clinical standards. Any single preferred drug list
utilization management criteria will be established in consultation
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

180
with the Medicaid health plans and the Michigan pharmacy and
therapeutics committee described in section 9705 of the public
health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9705, with consideration given to
applicable United States Food and Drug Administration dosing
guidelines, subsequent evidence-based literature or studies, and
current treatment guidelines.
Sec. 1888. The department shall establish contract performance
standards associated with the capitation withhold provisions for
Medicaid health plans at least 3 months before the implementation
of those standards. The determination of whether performance
standards have been met must be based primarily on recognized
concepts such as 1-year continuous enrollment and the health care
effectiveness data and information set, HEDIS, audited data.
Sec. 1889. All quality assurance assessment program revenue
collected under section 20161 of the public health code, 1978 PA
368, MCL 333.20161, must only be expended on services provided
under the Healthy Michigan plan, under 2013 PA 107, or the state
Medicaid program, under Title XIX and Title XXI.

INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Sec. 1901. (1) The department shall submit a report on a
semiannual basis to the standard report recipients that lists the
projects approved in the previous 6 months and provides the purpose
for approving each project including any federal, state, court, or
legislative requirement for each project.
(2) Once an award for an expansion of information technology
is made, the department shall submit a report to the standard
report recipients that provides the projected cost of the expansion
broken down by use and type of expense.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

181
Sec. 1902. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
comprehensive child welfare information system, the department
shall submit a report not later than March 1 to the standard report
recipients. The report must include, but is not limited to, the
following:
(a) The total expenditures by fiscal year, from all sources,
on the development of the comprehensive child welfare information
system.
(b) The expenditure plan for the subsequent fiscal year for
the development, implementation, and maintenance of the
comprehensive child welfare information system.
(c) The details on upgrades, remediation of user-reported
issues, and other modifications to currently implemented modules of
the comprehensive child welfare information system that occurred
during the current fiscal year and are planned for the subsequent
fiscal year.
(d) The current timeline for the full implementation of the
comprehensive child welfare information system.
(2) The department shall continue to provide the report
described in subsection (1) after the implementation of the
comprehensive child welfare information system is complete and
operational.
Sec. 1903. (1) Not later than November 1 of the current fiscal
year, the department shall submit a report to the standard report
recipients that describes the status of an implementation plan
regarding the appropriation in part 1 to modernize the MiSACWIS.
The report must include, but is not limited to, an update on the
status of the settlement and efforts to bring the system in
compliance with the settlement and other federal guidelines set
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

182
forth by the United States Department of Health and Human Services
Administration for Children and Families.
(2) Not later than July 1 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall submit to the standard report recipients a report
on the department's efforts and recommendations to develop and
implement a simpler and more streamlined process for the annual
renewal of the licenses for family foster care homes, and the
development of a simpler and more efficient version of the
application form for renewal of the licenses for family foster care
homes.
(3) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan
statewide automated child welfare information system, the
department shall submit a report by not later than March 1 to the
standard report recipients. The report must include, but is not
limited to, the following:
(a) The current timeline for the phaseout of MiSACWIS and
MiSACWIS's replacement by the comprehensive child welfare
information system.
(b) Expenditures, from all funding sources, for maintenance,
upgrades, and remediation of user-reported issues in the previous
fiscal year.
(c) Any cost savings realized by decommissioning MiSACWIS.
Sec. 1906. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
information technology services and projects, the department shall
allocate $1,750,000.00 general fund/general purpose revenue, and
all associated federal matching revenue, to a public and private
nonprofit collaboration that is designated as this state's
statewide health information exchange by cooperative agreement, to
implement health information technology strategies for health
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

183
information exchange development, data management, and population
health at a statewide level.
Sec. 1909. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child
support automation, the department shall only encumber or expend
funds for the operation, maintenance, and improvements of the
Michigan child support enforcement system.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for bridges
information system, the department shall only encumber or expend
funds for the operation, maintenance, and improvements of Bridges
and MIBridges.
(3) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan
Medicaid information system, the department shall only encumber or
expend funds for the operation, maintenance, and improvements of
the community health automated Medicaid processing system.
(4) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan
statewide automated child welfare information system, the
department shall only encumber or expend funds for the operation,
maintenance, and improvements of MiSACWIS.
(5) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for comprehensive
child welfare information system, the department shall only
encumber or expend funds for the operation, maintenance, and
improvements to the comprehensive child welfare information system.
(6) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for comprehensive
child welfare information system, the department shall continue
development of a new information system to replace MiSACWIS
consistent with the plan provided by the department to the United
States District Court for Eastern District of Michigan as a part of
the settlement. The development of the comprehensive child welfare
information system must adhere to department of technology,
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

184
management, and budget and information technology investment fund
(ITIF) policies and practices, including use of the state unified
information technology environment methodology and agile
development. The project team shall also participate in and comply
with the enterprise portfolio management office process and product
quality assurance. To ensure full transparency, the project must be
included in the ITIF portfolio for executive, legislative, and
external reporting purposes. As a component of the ITIF portfolio,
the project is subject to governance and oversight by the
information technology investment management board.

ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 1930. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
opioid response activities, the department shall allocate
$75,500,000.00 from the Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund
created under section 3 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA
489, MCL 12.253, to programs and services to address the opioid
crisis in a manner consistent with the opioid judgment, settlement,
or compromise of claims pertaining to violations, or alleged
violations, of law related to the manufacture, marketing,
distribution, dispensing, or sale of opioids. The funds must be
allocated as follows:
(a) $4,000,000.00 for public health awareness and education
campaigns.
(b) $8,000,000.00 for evidence-based treatment programming, as
follows:
(i) $6,000,000.00 for workforce development programming.
(ii) $2,000,000.00 for access to treatment in jails.
(c) $41,000,000.00 for recovery investments, as follows:
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

185
(i) $10,000,000.00 as competitive grants for recovery community
organizations.
(ii) $17,000,000.00 for recovery and permanent housing
developments.
(iii) $4,000,000.00 to support transportation for individuals in
recovery.
(iv) $10,000,000.00 for job training.
(d) $5,000,000.00 for wraparound services to address social
determinants impacting health, education, and economic stability.
(e) $4,500,000.00 to support families impacted by the opioid
epidemic, as follows:
(i) $1,500,000.00 for prenatal and perinatal care coordination
and social supports.
(ii) $1,500,000.00 for family-based treatment and recovery
programs.
(iii) $1,500,000.00 for evidence-based home visiting programs.
(f) $1,000,000.00 to support local governments.
(g) $2,000,000.00 for law enforcement training.
(h) $10,000,000.00 for diversion programs.
(2) If any allocations remain after the completion of the
projects listed in subsection (1)(a) to (h), the department may
expend remaining funds for additional opioid response activities
that are consistent with the purposes outlined in this section.
Sec. 1931. Unexpended and unencumbered funds appropriated in
part 1 for nursing facility staffing initiative are designated as
work project appropriations. Any unencumbered or unallotted funds
do not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and are available for
projects under this section until the work project has been
completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

186
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the work project is to address chronic
workforce shortages in nursing homes.
(b) The work project will be accomplished using resources or
contracts with service providers, or both.
(c) The total estimated completion cost of the work project is
$10,000,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date for the work project is
September 30, 2031.
Sec. 1932. Unexpended and unencumbered funds appropriated as
one-time in part 1 for health services administration are
designated as work project appropriations. Any unencumbered or
unallotted funds do not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and are
available for projects under this section until the work project
has been completed. The following is in compliance with section
451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the work project is to support the home
help caregiver council and related activities, fulfilling the
requirements of the home help caregiver council act, 2024 PA 144,
MCL 400.801 to 400.805.
(b) The work project will be accomplished using state
resources or contracts with service providers or other entities.
(c) The total estimated completion cost of the work project is
$4,000,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date for the work project is
September 30, 2031.
Sec. 1934. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for uterine
fibroid study, the department shall allocate $250,000.00 to
commission a study to evaluate options to expand services for the
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

187
detection and treatment of uterine fibroids, increase awareness of
services for the detection and treatment of uterine fibroids, and
increase access to services for the detection and treatment of
uterine fibroids. The department shall provide the study
commissioned under this section to the standard report recipients
not later than 30 days after the department receives the study.
Sec. 1936. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan
agricultural surplus system, the department shall allocate
$12,045,000.00 for procuring and distributing the Michigan
agricultural surplus system to distribute surplus produce to low-
income residents of this state.
Sec. 1938. Not later than June 1 of the current fiscal year,
the department shall submit a report to the standard report
recipients on outcomes of the funds provided in part 1 to the
Michigan Clinical Consultation and Care program (MC3). The outcomes
reported must include, but are not limited to, the number of same-
day telephone consultations with primary care providers and the
number of local resource recommendations made to primary care
providers who are providing medical care to patients who need
behavioral health services.
Sec. 1940. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan
clinical consultation and care, the department shall allocate at
least $325,000.00 to address needs in a city in which a declaration
of emergency was issued because of drinking water contamination.
Sec. 1942. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for local
office staff travel, the department shall allocate up to
$100,000.00 annually toward reimbursing the out-of-pocket costs of
county board members and county department directors to attend
statewide meetings of the Michigan County Social Services
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

188
Association.
Sec. 1956. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
permanent supportive housing, the department shall allocate
$5,000,000.00 to expand supportive housing services. Organizations
that received funding under section 1983 of article 6 of 2023 PA
166, section 701 of article 16 of 2024 PA 121, or section 1956 of
article 6 of 2025 PA 22 are eligible to apply for and receive
funding under this section. The funds must be used for services to
households living in supportive housing who need additional
services to maintain stability and currently homeless households
moving into supportive housing.
(2) From the funds appropriated in this section, no more than
8% may be allocated as grants to organizations providing permanent
supportive housing for capacity building necessary to develop and
sustain high-quality service delivery and to build administrative
capacity to seek Medicaid reimbursement for eligible services.
(3) From the funds appropriated in this section, at least 1%
must be allocated for technical assistance and capacity building to
support organizations providing permanent supportive housing
services.
(4) Funds appropriated in part 1 for permanent supportive
housing are considered work project funds, do not lapse at the
close of the fiscal year, and are available for expenditures for
projects under this section until the projects have been completed.
The following are in compliance with section 451a of the management
and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the work project is to provide funding for
grants to eligible entities to provide permanent supportive housing
services for eligible households.
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

189
(b) The work project will be accomplished through partnerships
with community-based agencies that provide supportive housing
services, the Michigan state housing development authority, and
local governments.
(c) The total estimated cost of the work project is
$5,000,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date for the work project is
September 30, 2031.
Sec. 1965. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for water
affordability, the department shall allocate $10,000,000.00 as
grants to qualified providers to assist eligible residents who have
a financial burden, have accumulated a balance on their water
utility bill, have had their water service shut off, and/or are at
risk of having their water service shut off. Eligible expenditures
from these funds must be income-based and must include all of the
following:
(a) Restoring residential water service.
(b) Paying down water bills currently in arrears.
(c) Supporting reasonable water affordability plans that are
based on an individual's ability to pay, including capped payments
based on household income to prevent accumulating a balance on
future water bills and funding to qualified providers to cover the
remaining cost of service.
(d) Protecting participating residents from water shutoffs.
(2) To be considered a qualified provider under this section,
the provider must be 1 of the following:
(a) A community water system.
(b) A community action agency.
(c) A nonprofit, community-based organization organized under
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

190
the laws of this state that is exempt from federal income tax under
section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501,
with a history of doing utility assistance work.
(3) Qualified providers receiving grants under this section
may spend not more than 3% of the total grant award for
administrative services related to the implementation of this
section.
(4) Qualified providers receiving grants under this section
shall report to the department by September 30 of the current
fiscal year on outcomes and performance measures for the program,
including, but not limited to, all of the following:
(a) The total grant award received by the qualified provider.
(b) The percentage of the grant award that was used for
administrative costs.
(c) The total dollars spent broken down by type of assistance
provided.
(d) The number of individuals helped broken down by type of
assistance provided.
(e) The number of individual applicants denied assistance.
(5) Upon receipt of the information required under subsection
(4), the department shall compile and forward the report to the
standard report recipients.
(6) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for water
affordability are designated as a work project appropriation, and
any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of
the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for
projects under this section until the projects have been completed.
The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management
and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n

191
(a) The purpose of the project is to provide grants to
qualified providers that assist eligible residents who have a
financial burden, have accumulated a balance on their water utility
bill, have had their water service shut off, and/or are at risk of
having their water service shut off.
(b) The project will be accomplished through competitive
grants to qualified providers.
(c) The total estimated cost of the project is $10,000,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2031.
Final Page
EMR S06108'26 (S-1) zthm8n